Privacy Policy
Last modified: February 2025
PLEASE READ THE FOLLOWING PRIVACY POLICY, FOR INFORMATION REGARDING THE WAYS YOUR PERSONAL DATA MAY BE
          PROCESSED,
          CAREFULLY. WHEN YOU USE THE APP YOU ACKNOWLEDGE THAT YOU HAVE READ, UNDERSTOOD, AND AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THIS
          PRIVACY
          POLICY.
I. INTRODUCTION
AIBY Inc. (“we,” “us” or “our”) takes your privacy seriously. This Privacy Policy (“Privacy Policy”) explains
          our data protection policy and describes the types of information we may process when you install and/or use
          “Plantum” software application for mobile devices (the “App”, “our App”).
When we refer to personal data (or personal information) we mean any information of any kind relating to a
          natural person who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to such data.
It is a natural person who can be identified directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an
          identification number or to one or more factors specific to his or her physical, physiological, mental,
          economic, cultural or social status.
This Privacy Policy (except for Annex below - “U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice”) applies to all users of the App
          regardless of where they are located. The U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice included in the Annex to this Privacy Policy
          supplementary applies to those users who:
a) are residents of U.S. states where corresponding U.S. State Privacy Laws were enacted; and
b) fall within the scope of the U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice applicability.
II. INFORMATION WE PROCESS
There are several categories of information that can be processed.
Functional Information
We ask for and process the following personal information when you use the App. This information is necessary
          for the adequate
performance of the contract
between you and us. Without such information it
          is impossible to provide complete functionality of the App and perform the requested services.
Activity Information
directly related to your use of the App. After you set the relevant
            settings on your device we may have technical access to your camera or camera roll - to analyze the picture
            that you take or upload through the App. However, we cannot collect, store or use the data contained in your
            camera roll unless you upload such data to the App or otherwise share it. We may also have access to your
            geolocation data upon your consent in order to show more precise results corresponding to your search
            request.
User Content
(i. e. the photos or other images and text you send to the App, as well as
            any text, or other content generated by AI via the App as part of AI-based features). Subject to your
            compliance with certain rules and restrictions outlined in our
Terms of Use
, you may dispose of, use, share,
            otherwise exploit your User Content for your own purposes. However, any use of User Content is at your sole
            risk, i. e. you assume and bear all risks and responsibility associated with your use of User Content. It is
            your sole responsibility to ensure compliance with the applicable laws while using the User Content. Please
            note that we engage third party service providers, such as Plant.id (for the purpose of providing you with
            the plant search and recognition feature) and OpenAI, L.L.C. (for the purpose of providing you with the
            AI-generated plant treatment recommendations feature). Please check Section IV to learn more about the
            privacy policies and practices of Plant.id and OpenAI, L.L.C.
Authorization Data
You may create an Account and register within the App by choosing the option Sign in
            with Apple / Facebook / Google and providing your email address and photo (if you choose to add them to your Account).
            Having an Account will enable you to sign in to the App using your Apple ID, Facebook or Google account and sign out at
            any time. If you log out of your Account within the App, your history will be deleted from your device. You will be able
            to access your history when you log in to the same Account again. You can also choose to delete your Account within the
            App at any time, in this case all your data within the App will be lost and you will no longer be able to access such
            data. Bear in mind that if you have a valid subscription, deleting your Account within the App will not cancel it.
Note that all your
User Content
and
Authorization Data
are processed exclusively to the extent necessary to operate the
            App services and provide you with the App functionality. Only you can exercise full control over your
User Content
and
Authorization Data
, as well as over your
Activity Information
. If you choose to delete your Account within the App, you
            will no longer be able to access and/or restore all above listed categories of Functional Information that were
            previously available to you within the App. If you remove the App from your device but do not delete your Account within
            the App, we will continue to store the information associated with your Account for a certain period of time (see
            Section VI).
Contact Information
(name, e-mail address, as well as any other content included in the
            email), which you may fill in by yourself when you contact us via email, support form. We collect, store and
            process it by our cloud storage provider (Amazon.com, Inc.). We use such information to respond effectively
            to your inquiry, fulfill your requests, and send you communications that you request and perform the
            requested services.
Information That Is Processed Automatically
On the basis of your
permission
we use third-party automatic data processing technologies
          (advertising or analytics tools) to analyze certain information sent by your device via our App
          (
Identity For Advertisers
). Some integrated advertising or analytics tools (check Section IV
          to see the list of them) launch automated processing of your personal data, including profiling, which means
          any form of automated processing of personal data used to evaluate certain personal aspects relating to you,
          in particular to analyze or predict aspects concerning your personal preferences, interests, behavior,
          location or movements (see the list of data described below). Processing information through automatic data
          processing technologies starts automatically once you allow our App to track your activity. You can withdraw
          your permission at any time - please check opt-out options in Section VIII below.
We may process some information about your device and your user behavior on the grounds of our legitimate
          interest. This information falls within categories of data described above in Subsection “Information That Is
          Processed Automatically”, it is generally non-personal, i.e. it does not, on its own, permit direct
          association with any specific individual, and we may access it only in aggregated form. We use this
          information for improving our App and giving our users the best experience.
Device Details.
When you use a mobile device (tablet / phone / smartwatch) to access our
            App, some of the details about your device are reported, including “device identifiers”. Device identifiers
            are small data files or similar data structures stored on or associated with your mobile device, which
            uniquely identify your mobile device (but not your personality). Device identifier enables generalized
            reporting or personalized content and ads by the third parties.
What data can be processed:
Information about the device itself: type of your device, type of operating system and its version,
              model and manufacturer, screen size, screen density, orientation, audio volume and battery, battery life,
              loading time, latency, framerate, device memory usage.
Information about the internet connection: mobile carrier, network provider, network type, IP address,
              timestamp and duration of sessions, speed, browser.
Location-related information: IP address, the country code/ region/ state/ city associated with your SIM
              card or your device, language setting, time zone, neighboring commercial points of interest (eg. “coffee
              shop”).
Other device identifiers: e.g. user identifiers (if they are set up by the App’s developer).
Information about the applications.
Name, API key (identifier for application), version,
            properties of our App can be reported for automated processing and analysis. Some services also record the
            list of applications and/or processes which are installed or run on your device.
Cookies and similar technologies.
When you use the App, cookies and similar technologies
            may be used (pixels, web beacons, scripts). A cookie is a text file containing small amounts of information
            which is downloaded to your device when you access the App. The text file is then sent back to the server
            each time you use the App. This enables us to operate the App more effectively. For example, we will know
            how many users access specific areas or features within our App and which links or ads they clicked on. We
            use this aggregated information to understand and optimize how our App is used, improve our marketing
            efforts, and provide content and features that are of interest to you. We may ask advertisers or other
            partners to serve ads or services to the App, which may use cookies or similar technologies.
Log file information.
Log file information is automatically reported each time you make a
            request to access the App. It can also be provided when the App is installed on your device. When you use
            our App, analytics tools automatically record certain log file information, including time and date when you
            start and stop using the App, and how you interact with the App.
Ad-related information.
The following data might be reported about the ads you can view:
            the date and time a particular ad is served; a record if that ad was “clicked” or if it was shown as a
            “conversion” event; what the ad offer is about; what type of ad it is (e.g., text, image, or video); which
            ad placement is involved (where the ad offer is displayed within the App); whether you respond to the ad.
In-app events.
When you use our App, analytics tools automatically record your activity
            information (taps, scrolls, screens you visited in the App, tutorial steps, leveling up, payments, in-app
            purchases, custom events, progression events, method of limiting the processing of user data).
Information provided automatically to advertising or analytics tools does not generally come to our control,
          therefore we cannot be responsible for processing such information. Please mind that some services are engaged
          in personal data profiling and may obtain information related to your personality and/or your device by using
          technologies that do not belong to our scope of responsibility. In case when your user ID is linked to your
          Facebook account, Facebook may use your device information in association with categorized data that were
          already recorded in its databases (eg. your age, gender or other demographic indication). We do not control,
          supervise or stand surety for how the third parties process your personal data that might be collected by
          their own means (not through our App). Any information request regarding the disclosure of your personal
          information should be directed to such third parties (see Section IV).
Payment Information
Our e-commerce providers are responsible for billing, processing and charging for in-app purchases, handle
          your personal information and keep it absolutely safe and secure. This information is processed as part of the
          performance of the contract between you and us. We cannot access or use your credit or debit card information.
You may access the applicable “in-app” purchase rules and policies directly from the app stores.
Email newsletters
When you register within the App and provide your email information by choosing the option “Sign In with Apple /
          Facebook / Google” we may use such email information to send you communications (“newsletters”) regarding special
          subscription offers, new features and functionalities and other news related to the App on the grounds of our
legitimate interest
. To receive newsletters about the App, you may also leave
          information about your email address in the App Settings (if available) or we may request your email address
          in a separate popup window within the App (if available). Sending you newsletters will allow you to stay up to
          date and receive the latest news about our App, including about the best price offers. Note that when you
          provide your email information by using “Sign In with Apple” you may choose either to share your email or to
          keep your personal email address private and to hide it (“Hide my email” option, if available), in the latter
          case Apple will generate and provide us with a unique, random email address that automatically forwards to
          your personal inbox. You also hereby acknowledge and accept the treatment of some categories of your personal
          data (i. e. the information about your name that you provide us, date of registration within the App,
          subscription purchase date, geolocation data, activity information, etc.) for market analysis activities,
          particularly for the purpose of delivering you targeted newsletters that most align with your needs and
          interests. The information about your email address that we have received may be transferred to the email
          marketing tool for the purposes of optimization and automation of the email delivery process (please check
          Section IV to learn more about the tool’s privacy policies and practices). You may also opt-out of receiving
          communications to your email address at any time by using the resignation link provided in each email you
          receive from us. Your unsubscribe request shall be honored within a reasonable period of time.
III. THE PURPOSES OF PROCESSING YOUR PERSONAL DATA
Our mission is to constantly improve our App and provide you with new experiences. As part of this mission,
          we use your information for the following purposes:
(a)
To make our service available.
We use functional information and information that is
            processed automatically to provide you with all requested services.
(b)
To improve, test and monitor the effectiveness of our App.
We use the information
            that is processed automatically to better understand user behavior and trends, detect potential outages and
            technical issues, to operate, protect, improve, and optimize our App.
(c)
To provide you with interest-based (behavioral) advertising or other targeted
              content.
We may use the information that is processed automatically for marketing purposes (to
            show ads that may be of interest to you based on your preferences). We provide personalized content and
            information to you, which can include online ads or other forms of marketing.
(d)
To communicate with you.
We use the information we have to communicate with you
            through newsletters, i.e. to send you marketing notifications, receive your feedback about our App
            experience, and let you know about our policies and terms. We also use your information to respond to you
            when you contact us.
(e)
To prevent fraud and spam, to enforce the law.
We really want our App to be free of
            spam and fraudulent content so that you feel safe and free. We may use your information to prevent, detect,
            and investigate fraud, security breaches, potentially prohibited or illegal activities, protect our
            trademarks and enforce our Terms of Use.
If any new purposes for processing your personal data arise we will let you know we start to process
          information on that other purpose by introducing the corresponding changes to this Privacy Policy.
IV. SHARING OF YOUR INFORMATION
We will share your information with third parties only in the ways that are described in this Privacy Policy.
          We adhere to the U.S. Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for the Mobile Environment.
Please note that while we partner solely with third parties that gave us assurance of application of
          necessary technical and organizational measures to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the
          security of any information transmitted from the App directly to any such third party. We are not responsible
          for any accidental loss or unauthorized access to your personal data through a fault of third parties.
We will not rent or sell your personal data to any third parties, but we may share your information from
          tools like cookies, log files, and device identifiers and location data, with third-party organizations that
          provide automatic data processing technologies for the App. We do not control or influence these third
          parties’ tracking technologies or how they may be used.
We may also share certain information such as cookie data with third-party advertising partners. This
          information allows third-party ad networks, inter alia, to deliver targeted advertisements that they believe
          will be of most interest to you.
We may engage the following third-party service providers in order to provide us with necessary
          infrastructure for delivery and improvement of our services:
Entity name
Services performed
Entity location
Link to Privacy Policy
Amazon.com, Inc.
Cloud storage provider, content filtering tool
U.S.A.
https://services.amazon.com/privacy-policy.html
Amplitude Inc.
Analytics service provider
U.S.A.
https://amplitude.com/privacy
AppsFlyer Inc.
Analytics service provider
U.S.A.
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/
https://www.appsflyer.com/legal/services-privacy-policy/
Facebook (Meta Platforms, Inc.)
Analytics / ad management service provider
U.S.A.
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation
Firebase Crashlytics (Google LLC)
Analytics service provider
U.S.A.
https://policies.google.com/privacy
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy
Gardyn, Inc.
Retail Partner under Affiliate Program
U.S.A.
https://mygardyn.com/policy/privacy/
Google Analytics (Google LLC)
Analytics service provider
U.S.A.
https://policies.google.com/privacy
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245
                  (see section ‘Information for Visitors of Sites and Apps Using Google Analytics’)
Mindbox USA LLC
Email marketing tool
U.S.A.
https://maestra.io/documents/privacy-policy/
OpenAI, L.L.C.
AI services provider
U.S.A.
https://openai.com/privacy/
Plant.id (FLOWERCHECKER, S.R.O.)
Image reference database
Czech Republic
https://www.plant.id/
Qonversion Inc.
Analytics service provider
U.S.A.
https://qonversion.io/page/privacy
StackSocial, Inc.
Product discovery and native commerce platform
U.S.A.
https://www.stackcommerce.com/privacy/
Tableau Software LLC
Analytics service provider
U.S.A.
https://www.salesforce.com/company/privacy/
YouTube LLC (subsidiary of Google LLC)
API Services that enable the App to access certain YouTube content and features
U.S.A.
https://policies.google.com/privacy
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites?hl=en
                  (how Google uses information from sites or apps that use its services)
In case you want to learn more about these services and their privacy options (including opt-out) please
          consult the correspondent websites and privacy policies. We are not responsible for any usage of your personal
          data by the abovementioned third parties in violation of our instructions.
Our App may contain links to third-party websites / services or you may access the App from a third-party
          site. We are not responsible for the privacy practices of these third-party sites or services linked to or
          from our App, including the information or content contained within them.
YouTube Data API Service as well as the IFrame Player API are used in order to add certain YouTube content
          and features to the App. Inter alia, certain audiovisual and other YouTube Content is available for viewing
          via the App. By using our App you are automatically agreeing to be bound by the
YouTube Terms of Service
, available at:
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
. As our App integrates some
          YouTube API Services, we may share your information with Google. For more details about the categories of
          information that may be collected and used by Google, as well as about the legal grounds for such collection
          and use, check
Google Privacy Policy
, available
          at:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
. For further
          clarifications on how Google can use information shared by your device when you use our App and how you can
          manage such information, please visit this link:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites?hl=en
.
We may disclose your personal information if it is needed for objective reasons, due to the public interest
          or in other unforeseen circumstances:
as required by law;
when we believe, in good faith, that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, protect your safety or
            the safety of others, investigate fraud, or respond to a government request;
if we are involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of all or a portion of our assets, you will be
            notified via email and/or a prominent notice in our App of any change in ownership or your personal
            information usage, as well as any choices you may have regarding your personal information.
V. INTERNATIONAL DATA TRANSFERS
We work in the cross-border area and provide our App to our Users around the world.
We and third-party organizations that provide automatic data processing technologies for the App or our
          third-party advertising partners may transfer the automatically processed information across borders and from
          your country or jurisdiction to other countries or jurisdictions around the world.
If you are located in the European Union or other regions with laws governing data processing that may differ
          from U.S. law, please note that we may transfer information, including personal information, to a country and
          jurisdiction that does not have the same data protection laws as in your jurisdiction.
This means that your personal information can be transferred to a third country, a territory or one or more
          specified sectors within that third country, or to the international organization where data protection and
          confidentiality regulations may not provide the same level of protection of a personal data as your country
          does.
We try to make sure that the recipient of any personal data provides a proper protection of the personal data
          received, in accordance with the current legislation on the protection of such information. By using the App,
          you agree that we may transfer your personal data to any third country, a territory or one or more specified
          sectors within that third country, or to the international organization.
For the purposes of data storage, we recourse to the services of the hosting organizations. We take your
          privacy seriously and, therefore, encrypt your personal data - if possible - before sending it to the hosting
          organizations for the purposes of its storage. Please note that we cooperate only with those hosting
          organizations that have passed our security and reliability check.
VI. HOW LONG WE USE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
We generally retain your personal information for as long as is necessary for performing the functional
          service of the App and to comply with our legal obligations. If you no longer want us to use your information
          that we physically access and store, you can request that we erase your personal information and close your
          account.
However, some data may still be stored for a certain time period (but no longer than the storage purpose
          requires) if information is necessary to comply with legal obligation (taxation, accounting, audit) or in
          order to maintain safety and data backup settings, prevent fraud or other malicious acts.
VII. USER PRIVACY RIGHTS
Applicable data protection laws give you the following rights regarding your personal information:
The Right to Know
(also referred to as the Right to Access). You have the right to obtain a
            confirmation as to whether or not personal data concerning you is being processed. Additionally, you can request a
            copy of personal data we hold about you and additional details on how such data is processed.
The Right to Data Portability.
You are entitled to request your personal information in a
            portable, structured and machine-readible format that makes it easier to reuse such information or transfer it
            directly to another service, move it wherever you want.
The Right to Correct Inaccuracies
(also referred to as the Right to Rectification). Where you
            cannot update your data by yourself through your account (if available) or the App settings, you can ask us to
            correct, change, complete or rectify your data.
The Right to Data Deletion
(also referred to as the Right to Erasure or the Right to Be
            Forgotten). You have the right to request the deletion of all or some pieces of your personal data we process. In
            this
            regard you should bear in mind that applicable data protection laws may provide exceptions to the Right to Data
            Deletion, which means that under certain circumstances we may need to keep some pieces of your data to comply with
            legal obligations, detect fraud, exercising or defence of legal claims, for other legal reasons. Therefore, upon
            receiving your verified request, we’ll delete your personal data and direct our service providers to do the same
            unless a legal exception applies.
The Right to Restriction of Processing.
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to
            limit the ways in which your personal information is processed. These specific circumstances are addressed in data
            protection laws that may apply to you. For example, you can ask for restriction of data processing in the case of
            disputed accuracy: if you believe that the personal data we hold about you is inaccurate, you can request a
            restriction of processing while we verify its accuracy.
The Right to Object to Processing of Personal Data.
When your personal information is processed
            automatically with the involvement of third party service providers, you may object to such processing in some
            circumstances. Additionally, when your personal information is processed for direct marketing purposes, you may ask
            to cease processing your data for these direct marketing purposes. In order to exercise your right to object please
            submit us the corresponding request. You may also contact the third party service providers listed in the Section IV
            of this Privacy Policy to learn how you can object to their processing of your data. Most of them have clear
            instructions on their privacy pages, functional API or other options.
To exercise any of the rights described above, you can contact us through
contact form
. Please bear in mind that we
          ensure the above mentioned rights only with respect to the information that we physically access and store.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection or a supervisory authority if you
          reasonably believe that your rights under applicable data protection laws have been breached. Please note that
          when you exercise your right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection or a supervisory authority,
          you may be required to provide additional information and support your complaint with sufficient objective
          evidence. By lodging a complaint you agree to provide sufficient explanation as to what you believe impaired
          your rights. Additionally, in some cases prior to lodging a complaint with your local data protection or a
          supervisory authority, you may be required to send your initial claim directly to us and ask for
          clarifications if necessary.
If you are located in the European Union, you may address our representative when you have questions on
          privacy issues: Konrad Gutowski,
privacy@aiby.com
.
VIII. HOW TO OPT OUT
Opt-out of marketing tracking
You can manage your activity tracking permissions. Inter alia, if you do not want third-party service
          providers to use the personalized ads on the basis of your interests please follow the instructions below:
For iOS devices:
go to Settings > Privacy & Security (or “Privacy” in earlier versions of iOS) > Tracking, then tap to turn
            off or turn on permission to track for a specific app.
            You can also control whether apps can ask for permission to track your activity. If you don’t want to be
            asked for your permission, or do not want apps to access your device’s Advertising Identifier, go to
            Settings > Privacy > Tracking and then disable the “Allow Apps to Request to Track” switch. If you turn off
            "Allow Apps to Request to Track", you won't get prompts from apps that want to track your activity. Each app
            that asks for permission to track while this setting is turned off will be treated as if you tapped “Ask App
            Not to Track”.
Please find additional information here:
https://support.apple.com/en-us/HT212025
or in the
            Settings > Privacy > Tracking section on your device.
If you want to disable Apple’s ad targeting, go to Settings > Privacy > Apple Advertising, then set the
            “Personalized Ads” switch to the “off” position. Please find additional information here:
https://support.apple.com/en-us/HT202074
Advertising Industry Opt-out Tools
You may also limit the collection of cross-app data for interest-based ads and exercise your right to opt out using
          the following Advertising Industry Opt Out Tools:
Digital Advertising Alliance for Mobile Apps:
https://youradchoices.com/appchoices
;
Digital Advertising Alliance for Websites:
https://optout.aboutads.info
;
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA)
https://youronlinechoices.eu/
;
Network Advertising Initiative:
https://optout.networkadvertising.org/
.
Please mind that when you opt out of certain interest based advertising, you may still continue to receive
          contextual ads based on other non-personal information, such as ads related to the content of other digital
          products you are using.
Opt-out of Location Data Processing
If you do not want third-party service providers to use your precise location data, or street-level location
          information about you please follow the instructions below:
For iOS devices
: turn Location Services off for the applicable Product via the menu “Settings > Privacy &
            Security (or “Privacy” in earlier versions of iOS) > Location Services”. Then select the applicable App and
            set the “Share My Location” status to “Never”. Please see additional information here:
https://support.apple.com/en-us/HT203033
.
IX. SECURITY
The security of your personal information is highly important to us. We follow generally accepted industry
          standards to protect the personal information submitted to us, both during transmission and once we receive
          it.
We take reasonable and appropriate measures to protect personal information from loss, misuse and
          unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration and destruction, taking into account the risks involved in the
          processing and the nature of the personal information.
We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures, which are designed to implement
          data-protection principles, such as data minimization, in an effective manner and to integrate the necessary
          safeguards into the processing. We seek your personal data to be encrypted with proper and strong encryption
          algorithms, including hashing where possible.
Unfortunately, no method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage, is 100% secure.
          We do our best to protect your personal data, nevertheless, we cannot guarantee its absolute security. In the
          event that your personal information is compromised as a breach of security, we will promptly notify you in
          compliance with applicable law.
If you have any questions about the security of our App, you can contact us through the email or contact form
          displayed below.
X. CHILDREN’S PRIVACY
Our App is not intended for children. Therefore, we do not knowingly or intentionally collect or solicit any
          personal information from children. For the purposes of this Section X the terms “child” and/or “children” in
          the context of data processing activities may be interpreted on a case-by-case basis as prescribed by
          applicable data protection laws. No one who is considered a “child” under applicable data protection laws is
          allowed to directly provide any personal information to the App.
As a general rule we consider a person under the age of 16 to be regarded as “a child” until we have legal
          grounds to conclude that a person under 16 should be treated as an adult as per provisions of local data
          protection rules or based on the parent authorization provided to us directly.
Solely the holders of parental responsibility are liable for preventing their children from providing personal
          information via the App without relevant verifiable parental consent. If we learn that we have collected
          personal information from a child without verification of parental consent, we will erase that information as
          quickly as possible. If you reasonably believe that we might have any information from or about a child, or a
          child has directly provided us with personal information via the App without verifiable parental consent,
          please contact us.
XI. CHANGES TO THE PRIVACY POLICY
This Privacy Policy is updated regularly.
Whenever we change this Privacy Policy, we will post those changes to this Privacy Policy and other places
          that we consider appropriate. Additional forms of notice of modifications or updates as appropriate under the
          circumstances may be provided to you.
XII. HOW TO CONTACT US
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please feel free to contact us via
support form
.
Annex to Privacy Policy
U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice
INTRODUCTION. THE SCOPE OF APPLICATION
This U.S. Multistate Privacy Notice (“
Notice
”) supplements the information contained in Privacy Policy and may apply to
          individual residents of the U.S. states (“
Covered U.S. Individual Residents
”) that have enacted comprehensive data
          privacy laws including but not limited to California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (CCPA) as amended by California
          Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (CPRA), Texas Data Privacy and Security Act of 2023 (TDPSA), Virginia Consumer Data
          Protection Act of 2021 (VCDPA), Colorado Privacy Act of 2021 (CPA), Connecticut Data Privacy Act of 2022 (CTDPA) and
          others (collectively referred to as “
U.S. State Privacy Laws
” and separately as “
U.S. State Privacy Law
”). Notice
          addresses specific requirements common to U.S. State Privacy Laws and outlines additional information on the rights of
          Covered U.S. Individual Residents. It also describes how we collect, use, disclose and protect your personal information
          in compliance with these U.S. State Privacy Laws.
Applicability.
Please note that if you are a user of our App and a resident of one of the U.S.
          states where the corresponding U.S. State Privacy Law was enacted, you’ll be regarded a Covered U.S. Individual
          Resident and this Notice shall apply to you only if the processing of your personal data in connection with your use
          of the App falls within the scope of such U.S. State Privacy Law. Please refer to the corresponding U.S. State Privacy
          Law for further details. If you are still unsure whether this Notice is applicable to you, please do not hesitate to
          contact us and we will spare no effort to assist you.
The correlation between Privacy Policy and Notice.
This Notice does not replace and cannot be used interchangeably with Privacy Policy. On the contrary, Notice serves as a
          supplemental part of Privacy Policy for Covered U.S. Individual Residents.
The concept of personal data under U.S. State Privacy Laws.
Applying Notice, you should also bear in mind that it pertains only to the processing of personal data which is
        understood as information linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable individual. Generally U.S.
        State Privacy Laws do not apply to the processing of de-identified, aggregated data or publicly available information,
        as these categories fall outside the scope of personal data.
THE CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA PROCESSED. PURPOSES OF PROCESSING
Detailed information about the categories of personal data that may be processed when you use the App is contained in
        Section II of Privacy Policy
>>
To learn about the purposes of personal data processing please review Section III of Privacy Policy
>>
SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION WITH SERVICE PROVIDERS (PROCESSORS). CLARIFICATIONS ON ISSUES OF DATA SELLING
U.S. State Privacy Laws require us to provide you with information about who we share your personal data with and for
        what purposes. You can find comprehensive data in this regard in Section IV of Privacy Policy
>>
. The legal entities indicated in Section IV of our
        Privacy Policy act as our “service providers” or “processors” within the meaning of U.S. State Privacy Laws and process
        your information on our behalf for business purposes. The examples of business purposes are the following: auditing
        related to current interaction with users, including, but not limited to, counting ad impressions to unique visitors,
        verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions; providing customer service, advertising, marketing, analytic
        services; detecting security incidents; debugging; provision of App services to users; improving, enhancing, upgrading
        the App functionality. Please refer to the table in Section IV of our Privacy Policy to learn what specific services the
        processors/service providers perform for the App. When we use the services of our processors/service providers and
        disclose your information for business purposes, we enter into corresponding written contracts with them. These
        contracts incorporate data processing provisions, parts, sections or annexes that require our processors/service
        providers not to use personal information transferred by us other than for the purpose of performing the services
        specified in the contracts. Additionally, the contracts with our processors/service providers specifically prohibit them
        from and/or do not contain permissions for selling the personal information transferred by us.
We do not “sell” you personal information for monetary gain, which means that we do not and will not disclose your
        personal information to third parties in direct exchange for money or some other form of payment. However, certain U.S.
        State Privacy Laws provide expansive definition of the term “sell”, which leads to cases where some disclosures of
        personal information to a third party even for non-monetary benefit of the disclosing party (“valuable consideration”)
        may qualify as data selling. In particular, sharing of personal information with third parties for the purposes of
        “interest-based advertising”/ “cross-context behavioral advertising” may constitute a sale under broad definition and
        interpretation of this and similar terms (“sell”/”selling”/”sold”) according to some U.S. State Privacy Laws. Even if
        such kind of data sharing qualifies as sale under U.S. State Privacy Law applicable to you, you’ll always have an option
        to opt out (see the subsection
Instructions on Online Tracking Opt Out
below for more details on available opt out
        mechanisms).
PRIVACY RIGHTS
If you are a Covered U.S. Individual Resident and this Notice applies to you, you’ll be able to exercise all user
        privacy rights specified in Section VII of Privacy Policy
>>
, particularly:
the Right to Know (also referred to as the Right to Access);
the Right to Data Portability;
the Right to Correct Inaccuracies (also referred to as the Right to Rectification);
the Right to Data Deletion (also referred to as the Right to Erasure or the Right to Be Forgotten);
the Right to Restriction of Processing;
the Right to Object to Processing of Personal Data.
User privacy rights listed above have similar content and exceptions in different jurisdictions. Their general meaning
        is addressed in Section VII of Privacy Policy. However, some minor aspects related to these rights may vary slightly
        from one jurisdiction/state to another, therefore, you may want to consider these differences when submitting your user
        privacy request.
Besides the rights referred to above, U.S. State Privacy Laws specifically mention the following additional data
        privacy rights you have:
The Right to Opt Out
of the processing of the personal data for purposes of (a) targeted advertising, sometimes also
        referred to as “cross-contextual behavioral advertising” or “interest-based advertising”; (b) the “sale” or “sharing” of
        your personal data; (c) profiling in furtherance of solely automated decisions that produce legal or similarly
        significant effects concerning you. The specified Right to Opt Out is exercised with due regard to the context of our
        interaction with you as with the user of our App and accompanying data processing activities. To learn the details on
        how you can exercise your Right to Opt Out, please refer to the subsection
Instructions on Online Tracking Opt Out
below.
The Right to Non-Discrimination
. This right means that you will not receive discriminatory treatment for exercising your
        privacy right(s). Inter alia, we will not deny you the App services, charge different prices or rates, or provide a
        different level or quality of services for you if you choose to exercise your user privacy right(s).
The Right to Appeal
. If we deny and refuse to take an action on your initial user privacy request, you may have the
        right to appeal that decision under some U.S. State Privacy Laws. See the subsection
How to Appeal Initial Decision
        Regarding Privacy Request
below for more details.
HOW TO EXERCISE YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
Depending on the specific user privacy right you choose to exercise, different methods may be available to you.
        In particular, when appropriate technical capabilities are accessible to you within the App and/or in your device
        settings, some rights (e.g. the Right to Correct Inaccuracies, the Right to Data Deletion, the Right to Opt Out) can
        be exercised by you independently without our assistance and the need to submit us the corresponding request. For
        instance, in certain circumstances the App may provide you with a possibility to change, update, correct inaccuracies
        or delete certain pieces of your personal data via your App account settings.
Instructions on Online Tracking Opt Out.
Further, there are a number of ways you can exercise the Right to Opt Out of data processing for the purposes of
        activities that under U.S. State Privacy Laws may qualify as targeted advertising; “sale” (under broad interpretation)
        or “sharing” of personal data; profiling. Follow the instructions below to stop online tracking activities across
        third party apps and websites and sharing your data with third parties for personalized ads.
Blocking Advertising ID use in your mobile device settings. Your mobile device settings enable you to make choices
        about the collection, use or transfer of your Advertising ID to third parties for the purposes of targeted advertising
        and/or ad measurement. To manage your activity tracking permissions and the use of your Advertising ID, please follow
        the relevant instructions in Section VIII of our Privacy Policy
>>
Advertising Industry Opt Out Tools. Even if you block the access to and use of your Advertising ID, you might still
          see personalized ads from other companies and ad networks. You have an opportunity to send your opt out request to
          some of such other companies and ad networks who participate in self-regulatory programs using special Advertising
          Industry Opt Out Tools. See Section VIII of our Privacy Policy to know which Advertising Industry Opt Out Tools you
          may choose to use
>>
Ad and Analytics Platforms Opt Out Mechanisms. Some third party ad platforms and analytics service providers have
          their own privacy management tools that allow you opt out and/or make your privacy choices directly. Here there are
          some examples:
Google My Ad Center
“About Facebook Ads” page
AppsFlyer
              Opt Out page
Therefore, we recommend you to check the privacy options of our service providers (processors) regularly. The up to date
        list of our service providers (processors) is presented in Section IV of Privacy Policy
>>
Submission of a user privacy request to exercise privacy right(s)
To exercise any user privacy right that cannot be managed by you independently, please contact us anytime through our
contact form
with the corresponding privacy request. When submitting your request, please include in its text the
          phrase “Exercising my rights to maintain confidentiality in ... State”, replacing '...' with the name of the state
          of your residence. We will make every effort to satisfy any request you make to exercise any of your privacy rights.
AUTHENTICATION OF USER PRIVACY REQUESTS. INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO APPEAL OUR INITIAL DECISION REGARDING YOUR PRIVACY
            REQUEST
When you submit any user privacy request via our
contact form
in order to exercise your privacy right(s), the
          relevant procedure of request authentication shall be put in place. The details and rules for such authentication
          procedure are provided below.
We shall comply with your user privacy request only if we are able to authenticate you as the user of our App and as a
          Covered U.S. Individual Resident. Therefore, when submitting a verifiable user privacy request, you should be ready
          to:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected
            personal information or such person’s authorized agent, which (depending on the circumstances) may include: name,
            address, city, state, zip code and email address. We may use this information to surface a series of security
            questions to you to verify your identity. If you are making a request through an authorized agent acting on your
            behalf, such authorized agent must provide written authorization confirming his/her authority to represent your
            interests or a power of attorney, signed by you.
Describe your privacy request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to
            it.
We will not be able to respond to your privacy request or provide you with personal information if we cannot: (i)
          verify your identity or authority to make the request; or (ii) confirm that the personal information relates to you.
          We may ask you for additional information or documents to verify your identity before taking any action with your
          privacy request. This is regarded as a safeguard measure to prevent disclosure of your personal information under a
          fake or scam request.
We ensure that personal information provided in a verifiable user privacy request will be used only to verify the
          requestor’s identity or authority to make the request and not for any other purpose. We will keep it for the adequate
          term reasonably needed for the purpose described above and delete after the purpose is fulfilled.
We try to respond to a verifiable user privacy request within forty-five (45) days of its receipt. If we require more
          time and it is reasonably necessary, we may extend the response period. In this case we will inform you of the reason
          and the applicable extension period in writing.
How to Appeal Initial Decision Regarding Privacy Request.
In cases when we have a reasonable basis, we may choose to decline to take an action regarding the user privacy
          request. For example, this may happen when we are unable to authenticate a request, or when the request is manifestly
          unfounded or fraudulent. In this particular case we’ll inform you of the justification for declining to take action
          within a reasonable period of time after receiving your initial request.
If we decline to take action with respect to your initial request, you may be entitled to appeal our decision under
          some U.S. State Privacy Laws. To do so, you will need to provide us with the missing information and explanations
          reasonably necessary to address your request effectively. Within the term prescribed by the applicable U.S. State
          Privacy Law we’ll inform you in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to your appeal, including a
          written explanation of the reasons for our decision.
CHANGES TO THIS NOTICE. FINAL PROVISIONS
We may update this Notice from time to time. To stay informed of updates, please review the latest published version
          of Notice regularly.
If you reasonably believe that certain U.S. State Privacy Law provides you with additional rights or options not
          outlined or referred to in this Notice, please contact us through our
contact form
. We will do our best to address
          all your concerns and reply to your request effectively.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://services.amazon.com/privacy-policy.html:
Privacy policy
Amazon Services Privacy Notice
Amazon Services knows that you care how information about you is used and shared, and we appreciate your trust that we will do so carefully and sensibly.
Please note that Amazon Services LLC owns and operates this website and is a subsidiary of Amazon.com, Inc. If you have an account on one or more Amazon sites and Amazon cookies corresponding to those sites, information gathered by Amazon Services, as described in this Privacy Notice, may be correlated with any personally identifiable information that Amazon has and may be used by Amazon to improve the services we offer.
As a subsidiary of Amazon.com, Amazon Services follows the same information practices as Amazon.com, and information we collect is subject to the Amazon.com Privacy Notice. By visiting the Amazon Services site, you are accepting the practices described in the
Amazon.com Privacy Notice
.
Sub-policy 1
https://amplitude.com/privacy:
Privacy Notice
Table of Contents
1. Introduction
2. What This Privacy Notice Covers
3. Personal Data We Collect And How We Use The Personal Data
4. When Amplitude Discloses Personal Data
5. Customer End User Data
6. International Transfer
7. Our Commitment To Data Security
8. Your Choices About How We Use And Disclose Information We Collect From You
9. Other Information About Our Privacy Practices
10. Updates And Changes To The Privacy Notice
11. Disputes
12. California Privacy Rights
13. Contact Us
14. Cookies
15. Previous Privacy Version
Last Updated: September 26, 2023
1. Introduction
Amplitude, Inc. ("
Amplitude
," "
we
," or "
us
") is a cloud-based product-analytics platform that helps customers build better products. Amplitude respects the privacy of individuals and is committed to protecting the information of visitors to the website ("
Visitors
") and individuals or entities that register to use the Amplitude products and services ("
Customers
"). This Privacy Notice describes Amplitude’s practices for collecting, storing, using, disclosing, and otherwise processing information in relation to Visitors of the website, amplitude.com, including our Community Forum and Amplitude Academy ("
Website
"), Amplitude’s marketing activities, and Customers accessing and using our products and services (collectively, "
Product
").
Please read the following carefully to understand our policies and practices regarding your information collected through the Website, through your use of the Product, and through our marketing activities. If you do not agree with the below policies and practices, your choice is not to use our Website or register to use our Product, or to unsubscribe from our marketing.
2. What This Privacy Notice Covers
This Privacy Notice covers how we treat Personal Data that we gather about you in the course of our business, including when you access or use our Website or Product and through our or our partner’s events and marketing activities. Specifically, Amplitude is the controller of your Personal Data as described in this Privacy Notice, when it collects personal information from: (i) Visitors to Amplitude’s publicly available Website; (ii) Customers and their employees or other authorized users of their Amplitude instance when registering to use and using the Product; and (iii) when we receive personal information from or about you through our sales and marketing activities or events.
Throughout this Privacy Notice, "Personal Data" means any information that identifies or relates to a particular individual and also includes information referred to as "personally identifiable information" or "personal information" under applicable data privacy laws, rules or regulations.
For clarity, this Privacy Notice does not apply to Customer End User Data (as defined below) submitted by our customers to the Product. In those circumstances, Amplitude is processing Customer End User Data on behalf of that customer and that customer is responsible for the collection and use of your data. In addition, this Privacy Notice does not apply to the mobile applications, websites or services offered by our Customers or other third-parties. You should refer to that customer’s or third party’s privacy notice and direct any inquiries to them.
3. Personal Data We Collect And How We Use The Personal Data
3.1
PERSONAL DATA WE COLLECT
The Personal Data you provide to us directly
You provide your Personal Data to us when you voluntarily fill in forms on our Website such as when you request a demo or to contact sales. This Personal Data may include: first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, country and/or state, phone number and the content of your request.
You may also share Personal Data with us through our Website when you register for an event or online webinar or training; sign up to receive our newsletter; subscribe to our blog; register to contribute and participate in our Community Forum or use Amplitude Academy; download a white paper or playbook; or complete a survey. This Personal Data may include: first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, country and/or state, phone number and the content of your request.
In order to access and use the Product, you are required to register for an account with us. When you register for an account, you may provide Personal Data to us, including first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, country and/or state, phone number, and username and password.
You may also provide Amplitude with your personal information at a marketing event or through marketing activities. This Personal Data may include: first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, work address, phone number and the content of your request.
If you attend an in-person or virtual event or agree to be recorded in a telephone or video meeting, we may record some or all of that event or meeting. For events, we may also document the event by taking photos or interviewing you at the event. We use this information for business and marketing purposes and training purposes.
You may choose to participate in an Amplitude program that allows you to pay fees with a credit or debit card, in which case you may provide your credit card or other payment details information directly to our third party payment processor. As explained below, Amplitude does not store this information.
The Personal Data we collect from third party sources
Amplitude may obtain Personal Data about you from third parties, including, but not limited to, marketing event organizers, partners, resellers, and public databases and websites.
Service providers
. For example, we may use third party providers of business contact information. The Personal Data provided to Amplitude by these Service providers about you may include your first and last name, company name, job title, business mailing addresses, business email addresses and business phone numbers, and LinkedIn URLs for purposes of delivering relevant Product updates and information, email content, advertisements and events.
Advertising partners.
We receive information about you from some of our service providers who assist us with marketing or promotional services, related to how you interact with our Website, event promotions, advertisements or communications. Amplitude requires that any third party providing us with Personal Data contact information has obtained the information lawfully and has the appropriate consent to share the information with Amplitude.
Google’s API Services.
Amplitude integrates Google’s Application Programming Interface (API) Services to allow users the option of logging into our platform with their Google credentials. If you choose to login to the Amplitude platform with Google’s API services, Google may share with us your email, name, and your unique Google ID so we can identify and authenticate you as a user. We do not share your data with any other parties, other than as may be necessary to provide our services to you. Amplitude’s use of information received from Google’s APIs will adhere to the
Google API Services User Data Policy
.
Targeted Online Advertisements:
We use third party service providers to help us understand our marketing efforts and to reach potential customers across the web. These third parties may use targeting and advertising cookies to track your online activity and across different channels, including our websites, email, and other websites and applications, to understand your interests, to display an advertisement for Amplitude, or email you with a marketing communication for Amplitude.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to, and we are not responsible for, cookies in third party ads. You should check the privacy policies of advertisers and/or ad services to learn more about their use of cookies and your information.
Information We Collect Automatically:
As you navigate through and interact with our Website or Product, we may use cookies, which are small files placed on your computer or mobile device, and web beacons, which are small electronic files located on pages of the Website or in email communications, to collect certain information about your equipment, browsing actions and events, and patterns. You can learn more about cookies and how we use them
here
.
We also use cookies to access information when you sign in, store your preferences, interact with certain functionality in the Product, to keep you logged in, and to store a limited amount of behavioral data.
The data automatically collected from cookies and web beacons may include information from your Web browser (such as browser type and browser language) and details of your visits to our Website, including traffic data, logs about your login history, identity confirmation, page views, length of visit and website navigation paths as well as information about your computer and internet connection, including your IP address and connecting software. We collect this data in order to help us provide, support and improve our Website, the Product and the user experience with our Website and Product, and for network and information security purposes. You can learn more about cookies and how we use them
here
.
Additionally, Amplitude may use cookies and similar technologies to collect information about our Customers' interactions with the Product in a manner that allows us to reproduce and fix issues and to identify areas of improvement for our Product. Customers can opt out of the use of this software during their use of the Product by contacting us at privacy@amplitude.com.
The information we collect automatically may also include statistical and performance information arising from our Customers’ use of our Product and Visitors to our Website. This type of data will only be used by us in an aggregated and anonymized manner.
3.2
THE WAY AMPLITUDE USES YOUR PERSONAL DATA
We use Personal Data that we collect about you or that you provide to us as is necessary to run our business and to carry out day-to-day business activities. How we use the Personal Data we collect depends in part on how you choose to communicate with us, how you use our Website and/or Product and interact with us, and any preferences you have communicated to us. In general, we use the Personal Data in order to respond to a request from you, to carry out our legal obligations, to fulfill a contract with you, to provide the Product or other services to you, to make improvements to the Product, to protect your vital interests, to provide you with notices and for other purposes with your consent as described below.
We use the Personal Data you provide to us when you fill in forms on our Website to respond to your request, provide requested information, and to contact you about that request. Our legal basis for processing this personal information is our legitimate interest in communicating with you and fulfilling your requests.
We may use your Personal Data to provide the Product to you, including to make improvements to the Product and understand your preferences to personalize your experience, as well as for non-marketing or administrative purposes (such as notifying you of major changes to the Website, the Product or for customer service purposes). Our legal basis for processing this Personal Data is in the performance of our contract to provide the Product or other services to you.
We also use the Personal Data you provide to us for the purpose of operating our Website and Product; to detect bugs, report errors and to maintain the quality and safety of our Website and Product; and for ensuring the security and integrity of our Website and Product. Our legal basis for processing this personal information is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of and security of our Website and Product.
For Personal Data that we collect through tracking technologies about your interaction with our Website and Product, we use this information for analyzing the use of the Website and Product in order to improve the quality and design, user experience, and performance of our Website and Product. Our legal basis for processing this type of data is our legitimate interests, namely, to provide you with a better user experience.
For Personal Data we collect through targeted or online advertising cookies, we use this information to display and measure engagement with advertisements across different devices and sites and to serve you with marketing materials.
We may use the Personal Data you provide to us at marketing events, when you register for an online webinar or download a whitepaper for the purpose of offering, marketing and selling products and services to you or to communicate with you about an event. Our legal basis for processing this Personal Data is consent, which you can withdraw at any time.
We may also use any of your Personal Data identified in this Privacy Notice for the purposes of: (i) enforcing our agreements and policies, including Terms of Service or Main Service Agreement, (ii) protecting or defending Amplitude’s legal rights; (iv) protecting your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person; or (v) complying with a legal obligation.
We may use your Personal Data for any other business purpose stated when collecting your Personal Data or as otherwise set forth in applicable data privacy laws.
We will not collect additional categories of Personal Data or use the Personal Data we collect for materially different, unrelated, or incompatible purposes without providing you notice.
As noted in the list above, we may communicate with you if you’ve provided us the means to do so. For example, if you’ve given us your email address, we may send you promotional email offers or email you about your use of the Product or Website. Also, we may receive a confirmation when you open an email from us, which helps us improve our Website and Product. If you do not want to receive communications from us, you can unsubscribe from marketing communications or email us with your preferences at privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com.
3.3 LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA FOR EEA, UK, AND SWISS VISITORS AND CUSTOMERS
If you are an individual in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), United Kingdom, Switzerland, or another relevant jurisdiction, we collect and process Personal Data about you only where we have a legal basis or bases for doing so under applicable laws. The legal bases depend on how you use the Website and/or Product, the Product your organization has purchased or uses, how you choose to interact and communicate with Amplitude’s Website and Product, and whether you attend Amplitude events. However, we will collect Personal Data only where we have your consent to do so, where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you and we will endeavor to make that clear at collection.
4. When Amplitude Discloses Personal Data
We may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide to us as described below.
We may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide to us to our subsidiaries and affiliates.
We may share your Personal Data collected from you as described in this Privacy Notice with third-party service providers who need to access the Personal Data in order to perform services on behalf of Amplitude, such as processing or storing such information, securing our Website or Product, or providing analytics services on our behalf. The third-party service providers are limited to using the Personal Data solely to provide the services to us and are bound by contractual obligations to keep Personal Data confidential and secure and to use it only for the purposes for which we disclose it to them.
If you are part of an Amplitude program that allows you to pay fees with a credit card or debit card and you choose to pay such fees with a credit card or debit card, your credit card or debit card information is provided directly to our third-party payment processor, Stripe, to process the payments. The payment information is transmitted directly via an encrypted connection to Stripe. Stripe uses, processes and stores your Personal Data and payment information in accordance with Stripe’s privacy policy available at stripe.com/us/privacy. Amplitude does not collect or store your payment information. Stripe maintains that it is PCI compliant and you can learn more about Stripe’s security measures available at stripe.com/help/security.
We may share your Personal Data if we believe disclosure is necessary to comply with applicable laws, regulations, respond to a court order, subpoena or a government request (such as a search warrant). If a government request or other legal process requires Amplitude to disclose your personal data, then Amplitude will use reasonable efforts to provide you with prior notification of the disclosure unless Amplitude is prohibited by law from doing so.
Amplitude also reserves the right to disclose your Personal Data that Amplitude believes, in good faith, is appropriate or necessary to: (i) enforce our agreements and policies, including for billing and collection purposes, (ii) protect the security or integrity of the Website or Product; or (iii) protect or defend Amplitude’s legal rights.
In the event that Amplitude is acquired by or merged with a third party entity, we reserve the right, in any of these circumstances, to transfer or assign your Personal Data as part of such merger, acquisition, sale, or other change of control. In the unlikely event of our bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, receivership, or assignment for the benefit of creditors, or the application of laws or equitable principles affecting creditors rights generally, we may not be able to control how your personal information is treated, transferred, or used.
Amplitude may disclose anonymized and/or aggregated information about Visitors to the Website or our Customers’ use of the Product that does not identify any individual.
Amplitude makes available our Community Forum and other resources or materials where you may post user generated content. The information you choose to post is publicly available and may be read and collected by others that visit these sections of the Website. Except for the details in your profile (e.g., username), the categories of data disclosed in these circumstances will depend on what information you choose to provide.
Amplitude may disclose Personal Data to third-party business partners at your direction, if you access or request contact from the third-party business partners through the Product or Website or at a marketing event.
Amplitude may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide to us for any purpose disclosed by us when we collect the information or with your consent, such as advertising or marketing providers.
5. Customer End User Data
This Privacy Notice does not apply to Customer End Users, Customer End User Data or Customer Applications.
With respect to the Personal Data collected by our Customers and submitted to the Amplitude platform, Amplitude is a processor and only processes such Personal Data in accordance with the instructions of our Customers. Our Customers may integrate into their mobile applications, websites or other services (collectively, "
Customer Applications
") certain aspects of our Product in order to understand how their own users ("
Customer End Users
") engage with the Customer Applications ("
Customer End User Data
").
Our Customers, not Amplitude, choose the type of Customer End User Data collected by Customer Applications, and submitted and processed through our Customers’ use of the Products. We process the Customer End User Data only according to the instructions of Customers and our legal obligations with respect to the Customer End User Data is set forth in the agreement between us and our Customers. The collection of Customer End User Data through Customer Applications is governed by our Customers’ privacy policies, and if you are a Customer End User then you should review the Customer’s privacy policy to learn more about the Customer’s data handling practices.
While Amplitude recognizes that an individual has the right to access, delete and amend the data collected about that individual, Amplitude only has a relationship with our Customers and does not interact with the Customer End Users. As such, if you are a Customer End User and you would like to access, amend or delete your data, you need to contact the Customer directly with your request which Customer may process. Amplitude will respond within a reasonable period of time to any such request or assistance requested by our Customer.
Amplitude only retains the Customer End User Data we process on behalf of our Customers for as long as necessary to provide the Product to our Customers or as required to comply with legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce any agreement.
6. International Transfer
By interacting with the Website or using the Product or otherwise providing information to Amplitude, you understand that your Personal Data may be transferred to the United States or another country other than your country of residence and you consent to such transfer. In order to ensure that your Personal Data receives an adequate level of protection and security, Amplitude has implemented appropriate safeguards for cross-border transfers of Personal Data, as required by applicable data protection laws. These safeguards may include using the European Commission-approved standard contractual clauses to protect the transfer of your Personal Data to Amplitude’s corporate affiliates or service providers, if required by applicable law.
Amplitude complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Amplitude has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Amplitude has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles (together, the “DPF Principles”), the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (“DPF”) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
For the actions of third party agents Amplitude engages to process data on our behalf, Amplitude remains responsible and liable under the DPF Principles if a third party agent processes the Personal Data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Amplitude proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
7. Our Commitment To Data Security
Amplitude uses commercially reasonable physical, managerial, and technical safeguards designed to secure your Personal Data from accidental loss and from unauthorized access, use, alteration, and disclosure. These measures include, for example, physical access controls, encryption, firewalls, and detection and monitoring. Our personnel who may have access to your Personal Data are required to keep that information confidential and trained on their security and privacy obligations.
You, however, are also responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your password and other information used by you to access the Website or use the Product. While Amplitude does its best to protect your Personal Data, any transmission of your Personal Data is done at your own risk and Amplitude cannot guarantee that such Personal Data may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards. Except as expressly required by law, we are not responsible for the theft, destruction, loss or inadvertent disclosure of your Personal Data or information. If Amplitude learns of a security systems breach, then we may attempt to notify you electronically so that you can take appropriate protective steps. Amplitude may post a notice on the Website or in Product if a security breach occurs. Depending on where you live, you may have a legal right to receive notice of a security breach in writing.
8. Your Choices About How We Use And Disclose Information We Collect From You
We strive to provide you with choices regarding your Personal Data and we understand that you have the right to access, correct, delete, object to and restrict our use of your Personal Data. We also understand that you have the right to obtain a copy of your Personal Data from us and to withdraw your consent to the processing of your Personal Data by us. Please note that the rights set forth in this Section 8, unless otherwise noted, apply globally to all Visitors and Customers, whether or not you are a California resident or a resident of the EEA, United Kingdom, or Switzerland. We have created mechanisms to provide you with the following control over your Personal Data:
You may choose not to provide Personal Data through our Website or when you register for the Product, in which case Amplitude may not be able to provide certain services to you or respond to your requests.
You can access, review, correct and/or change your Personal Data by logging into your account on the Website or Product and visiting your account profile page. You may also send us an email at privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com to request access to, correct or delete any Personal Data that you have provided to us. In some cases, we may not be able to delete your Personal Data except by also deleting your user account.
If you do not wish to have your email address or other contact information used by us to promote our own products or services, you can opt-out by checking the relevant box located on the form on which we collect your Personal Data, by updating your user or subscription preferences in your account profile(s), or by sending us an email stating your request to privacy@amplitude.com. If we have sent you a promotional email, you may unsubscribe to receive future emails via the unsubscribe link in that email or adjust your user preferences in your account profile as noted above. The opt out specified above does not apply to information provided to us as a result of a purchase, product service experience or other transactions. You cannot unsubscribe from non-promotional and transactional communications.
You may also request a copy of your Personal Data that you have provided to us directly by sending an email to privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com. We will provide you a copy of your Personal Data in a commonly used electronic form.
If we collected and processed your Personal Data with your consent, where required by law, you can withdraw your consent at any time by emailing privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com.
Depending on your country or state of residence, including if you are a California resident, you have the right to opt out of the sale of Personal Data, certain sharing of Personal Data with third party ad partners, and the right to limit the use or disclosure of sensitive personal information. We do not sell your Personal Data or use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those permitted by the CCPA. We may share Personal Data with third party ad partners, such as through cookies or by providing lists of email addresses for potential customers so we can reach them across the web with relevant ads. If you wish to opt out of sharing, you may adjust your preferences in the Cookie Settings.
If you wish to opt out of this sharing of your Personal Data with cookies on this domain, please update your Cookie Settings.
Please note to exercise the rights set forth above we may ask you to: (1) provide sufficient information to allow us to verify that you are the person about whom we have collected Personal Data, and (2) describe the request in sufficient detail to allow us to understand, evaluate, and respond to it. Each request that meets both of these criteria will be considered a "Valid Request." We may not respond to requests that do not meet these criteria. We will only use Personal Data provided in a Valid Request to verify you and complete your request. You do not need an account to submit a Valid Request.
We will work to respond to your Valid Request within 30 days of receipt. We will not charge you a fee for making a Valid Request unless your Valid Request(s) is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that your Valid Request warrants a fee, we will notify you of the fee and explain that decision before completing your request.
You may submit a Valid Request, or appeal our response to a valid request, by emailing us at privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com with the appropriate information and detail.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights under the GDPR, CCPA or other applicable data privacy laws or regulations. We will not deny you our goods or services, charge you different prices or rates, or provide you a lower quality of goods and services if you exercise your rights under the GDPR, CCPA or other applicable data privacy laws or regulations.
9. Other Information About Our Privacy Practices
9.1
Our Retention Practices
Personal Data that Amplitude collects and processes as a controller for the purposes identified in this Privacy Notice are not kept by Amplitude for longer than is necessary for the specific purpose identified in this Privacy Notice, unless required to comply with our legal obligations (for example, if we are required to retain your Personal Data to comply with applicable laws or regulations), resolve disputes, and enforce our legal agreements and policies. When we no longer have a legitimate business need to retain your Personal Data, we will either delete or anonymize it.
9.2
Children’s Privacy
Amplitude’s Website and Product are not directed at children. We do not knowingly collect or solicit Personal Data directly from individuals that are under the age of 13. If you are under 13, please do not provide or send us any Personal Data or attempt to register for or otherwise use the Product. If we learn that a child under 13 has directly provided us with their Personal Data through the Website or Product, or that we have collected information for a child under 13 through our marketing activities, then we will delete that information. If you believe a child under 13 has registered for an account on the Website or Product, or is receiving marketing materials from Amplitude, please contact us at privacy@amplitude.com.
9.3
Automated Decision-Making
Amplitude does not use any Personal Data provided by you for the purpose of automated decision-making or profiling.
9.4
Other Websites; Links
Our Website, Product or marketing materials may contain links to other third party websites or applications (such as Facebook, LinkedIn or Twitter). This Privacy Notice does not apply to any third party websites, including through any application that may link to or be accessible from or on the Website or Product, and Amplitude is not responsible for the privacy policies and the content of the third party websites or applications.
10. Updates And Changes To The Privacy Notice
Please note that we reserve the right, at any time, to add to, change, update, or modify this Privacy Notice, to reflect changes in our practices, technologies, additional factors, and to be consistent with applicable data protection and privacy laws or other legal requirements. The modified Privacy Notice will be posted on this website along with the effective date. If, in our reasonable discretion, the changes are material, we will provide you with additional notice (such as adding a notice on our Website, in the Product, or sending you an email notification). Changes to this Privacy Notice are effective when they are posted on this page.
11. Disputes
As part of our commitment to the DPF Principles, if you are a resident of the European Union, UK, or Switzerland and you have a privacy or data use concern, please contact Amplitude directly at privacy@amplitude.com and Amplitude will use its best efforts to address your concern within 45 days of receipt of your complaint. For an unresolved privacy or data use concern that Amplitude has not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
.
For any DPF disputes that cannot be resolved by the methods above, you may be able to invoke a binding arbitration process under certain conditions. To find out more about the DPF's binding arbitration scheme, please see Annex I of the DPF Principles, here:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/Participation-Requirements-Data-Privacy-Framework-DPF-Principles-dpf
.
The Federal Trade Commission has investigation and enforcement authority over Amplitude’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF
12. California Privacy Rights
Under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 and its amendments (“CCPA”), California residents have certain rights to disclosures about how we collect, use, retain and disclose your Personal Data. This section addresses those requirements. For a description of all of our data collection, use and disclosure practices, please read this Privacy Notice in its entirety.
Personal Data Collection and Disclosure
Amplitude does not sell Personal Data as we understand the term “sell” to be defined by the CCPA. We share Personal Data, as we understand the term “share” to be defined by the CCPA, as set forth below.
The categories of Personal Data we may collect from you, from third parties, and from your interactions with us, and categories of third party recipients to whom we disclose such Personal Data for business purposes are set forth below. For additional detail about the Personal Data we collect and use and with whom we share this Personal Data and for what purpose, please review Sections 3 and 4 above.
Identifiers (such as name, email address, work address, and phone number)
Service providers; third parties
Commercial information (such as account records and transaction data)
Service providers; third parties
Internet or other network or device activity (such as browsing history or Website or Product usage)
Service providers
Geolocation data (such as country, city, or approximate location inferred from your IP address)
Service providers
Professional or employment-related data
Service providers; third parties
The following categories of Personal Data have been shared in the preceding 12 months with third party advertising partners and advertising technology providers so that we can reach you with advertisements for our products and services and make them more relevant to you:
Identifiers and contact information
Analytics or other electronic network activity.
Amplitude does not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those permitted purposes under the CCPA. Amplitude does not have actual knowledge that it sells or shares Personal Data of individuals under the age of 16.
We retain Personal Data as described in Section 9.1 above.
California law gives California residents the right to make certain requests with regard to their Personal Data. Please see Section 8 for a description of your choices and how you may make a request.
13. Contact Us
If you have any comments, concerns or questions about this Privacy Notice or our privacy practices in general, please send an email to
privacy@amplitude.com
,
ccpa@amplitude.com
, or send mail to:
Amplitude, Inc.
Attn: Privacy
201 Third Street, Suite 200
San Francisco, CA 94103
EFFECTIVE DATE
This Privacy Notice was last updated on September 26, 2023.
14. Cookies
Amplitude uses cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies to collect certain information about your equipment, browsing actions, and patterns. Below we describe what cookies and web beacons are, why we use cookies and web beacons, the types of cookies and web beacons that we use, as well as what you can do in order to manage and delete cookies and web beacons.
What are cookies and web beacons?
Cookies are small text files that websites often store on computer hard drives or mobile devices of visitors to their websites. A cookie contains a unique number, which is used to recognize your computer or mobile device when you return to our Website. Cookies can remain on your computer or mobile device for different periods of time. The cookies can be either "persistent" cookies or "session" cookies. Persistent cookies are stored by a web browser and remain valid until a set expiration date. Session cookies only exist while your internet browser is open and are automatically deleted once you close your browser.
Web beacons (also referred to as clear gifs, pixel tags, and single-pixel gifs) are small electronic files contained on pages of websites that permit companies to count users who have visited certain webpages on a website and are used for other related website statistics (e.g., recording the popularity of certain website content and verifying system and server integrity).
What does Amplitude
use cookies and web beacons for?
Amplitude uses a variety of cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies for different purposes. Specifically, Amplitude uses cookies and web beacons to enhance the experience of our visitors to our Website (for example, by remembering your preferences and letting you navigate between pages efficiently) and to better understand how the Website and Product are used. Cookies may tell us, for example, whether you have visited the Website before or whether you are a new visitor.
What types of cookies and web beacons are used by Amplitude?
Amplitude uses both first-party and third-party cookies and web beacons. First-party cookies and web beacons are cookies and web beacons that are served directly by Amplitude to your computer or mobile device. Third-party cookies and web beacons are served by a third-party service provider on behalf of Amplitude. Third-party cookies are most commonly used for advertising and analytics purposes.
There are four categories of cookies and web beacons used by Amplitude. Specifically, Amplitude uses essential, performance, functionality and advertising cookies and web beacons.
Essential cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies are necessary for the operation of the Website and Product. These tracking technologies enable you to move around on the Website and use the Website’s features. You may not opt-out of these types of cookies because they are required to operate the Website and Product.
Performance cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies collect information about how you have used the Website and Product. We use performance cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies to improve the user experience with our Website and Product.
Functionality cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies allow us to remember how you are logged into our Website, when you logged in or out and the actions you have taken while you have been logged into the Website.
Advertising cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies are used by our third-party service providers to deliver advertising to you on other third-party websites as well as help measure the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns. We also use these types of cookies to analyze Website visits and ad conversions from third-party websites.
The table below lists the types of cookies and third party service providers currently used by Amplitude but may not include all cookies or third party service providers. In addition, the below list of cookies and third party service providers is subject to change at any time.
Performance
Amplitude
We use our own products and services to analyze the user behavior within our website and our own products and services.
For more information about our privacy practices, see
https://amplitude.com/privacy
Performance
Google Analytics
We use Google Analytics to analyze the use of our website.
For more information about Google’s privacy practices, see
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Functional
Intercom
We use Intercom to power chat functionality.
For more information about Intercom’s privacy practices, see
https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy
Advertising
Marketo
We use Marketo for marketing automation services.
For more information about Marketo’s cookie policy, see
https://documents.marketo.com/legal/cookies/
Advertising
Doubleclick
We use Doubleclick to track advertisements and measure website visits and conversions.
For more information about opting out of the ads, see
https://adssettings.google.com/u/0/authenticated
Advertising
LinkedIn
We use LinkedIn to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on LinkedIn.
For more information about LinkedIn’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Advertising
Facebook
We use Facebook to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on Facebook.
For more information about Facebook’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.facebook.com/help/www/213802165366955
Advertising
AddThis
We use AddThis for their website tools like social sharing buttons.
For more information about AddThis’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.oracle.com/legal/privacy/addthis-privacy-policy.html
Advertising
StackAdapt
We use StackAdapt to track advertisements and measure website visits and conversions.
For more information about StackAdapt’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.stackadapt.com/platform-and-services-privacy-policy
Advertising
Bing
We use Bing to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on Bing.
For more information about Bing’s privacy practices, please see
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-us/privacystatement
Advertising
Reddit
We use Reddit to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on Reddit.
For more information about Reddit’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.reddit.com/policies/privacy-policy
What are your choices about cookies?
You can decide whether or not to accept cookies through our Cookie Settings link on our Website. Most browsers allow you to configure the browser settings so that cookies from websites cannot be placed on your computer or mobile device. If you choose not to accept cookies, then you may be able to continue browsing our Website but we may not be able to provide you with certain features. If you want to opt out of advertising or performance cookies, then you may do so by reviewing the privacy policies of the third party service providers who serve the advertising and performance cookies identified above. If you would like further information about cookies and how to manage and delete them, please visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
or
www.youronlinechoices.eu
.
You can also delete all cookies that are already on your computer. If you do this, however, you may have to manually adjust some preferences every time you visit a site and the Product, Website and functionalities may not work.
What are your choices about cookies and interest-based advertisements?
Through the Digital Advertising Alliance and Network Advertising Initiative, several media and marketing associations have developed an industry self-regulatory program to give consumers a better understanding of, and greater control over, ads that are customized based on a consumer’s online behavior across different websites and properties. To make choices about internet-based ads from participating third parties, including to opt-out of receiving behaviorally targeted advertisements from participating organizations or to learn more about opting out of advertising cookies, please visit the Network Advertising Initiative’s or Digital Advertising Alliance’s consumer opt-out pages, which are located at
http://networkadvertising.org/choices/
or
www.aboutads.info/choices
. For those users located in the European Union, you can visit the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance’s user information website a
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
.
15. Previous Privacy Version
August 28, 2023
December 30, 2022
Sub-policy 2
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/:
Platform
Measure
Measurement suite
Measure every action on mobile, web and CTV
ROI measurement
Understand your true mobile marketing ROI
Creative Optimization
Unlock creative performance with the power of AI
Analyze
Marketing analytics
Turn insights on campaign performance into action
Incrementality
Prove the real value of your marketing campaigns
Engage
CX & deep linking
Boost revenue with exceptional customer experience
Audience segmentation
Create meaningful conversations with your customers
Protect
Fraud protection
Protect your marketing budget from mobile ad fraud
Collaborate
Privacy Cloud
Collaborate with your partners in a privacy-centric way
AppsFlyer Data Collaboration Platform
First-party data monetization that fuels retail media growth
Partner marketplace
Connect to over 10,000 tech and media partners
Interactive product tours
iOS 14+ solutions
Data feeds & APIs
Solutions
Team
Marketing
Product
Data & Analytics
R&D
Goal
Regain iOS visibility
Kickstart app growth
Scale user acquisition
Increase engagement & LTV
Maximize ROAS
Industry
Gaming
Shopping
Finance
Food & drink
Health & fitness
Travel
Platform
iOS
Android
PC & console
CTV & OTT
Web
Mobile
Web3
Partnerships
Tech and media partners
Agency partners
Partner Program
Interactive product tours
Customer stories
The AppsFlyer difference
Learn
Resources
Stay informed with industry insights, the latest trends, original content, and all things AppsFlyer
Ecosystem
Blog
Reports & guides
Events & webinars
Tools & templates
Industry benchmarks
Videos
Podcasts
Glossary
Metrics comparison
Customers
Customer stories
Product news
Use cases
Help center
Developer Hub
AppsFlyer Learning
Come to MAMA
Company
Who we are
Find out more about our history, our team, what we stand for, and why we do what we do
About us
Newsroom
CEO blog spot
Trust hub
Careers
Social impact
Contact
From our CEO
The future of our ecosystem and web
On privacy and user experience
Aggregated advanced privacy
Pricing
Login
Sign up free
Contact sales
Legal hub
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Documentation
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Website Privacy Policy
Last updated May 28, 2024
This Privacy Policy applies to: (i) use of the AppsFlyer owned and operated Websites (appsflyer.com, onelink.me and their subdomains); (ii) our marketing activities including, registrations as part of webinars, conference events, emails etc.; and (iii) any other product or activity that links to, or otherwise references, this privacy policy (collectively, the “Marketing Platforms“). We respect your privacy rights and value your trust. This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, receive, use, store, share, transfer, and process your personal information, as well as your rights in determining what we do with the information that we collect or hold about you.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected through use by customers of the AppsFlyer service, which is described under our
Services Privacy Policy
.
Information We Collect
When using or interacting with our Marketing Platforms, we may collect or receive the following types of information (collectively, “Information”).
“Personal Information” such as name, email, contact details or any other personal content that you provide to us whether through a form or field on our website or any other communication (e.g. email, phone, post etc.).
“Technical Information” such as browser type, operating system, device type, IP address and other similar technical information typically received from a browser or device automatically when visiting or interacting with our Marketing Platforms. This may include the referring URL that led you to our website.
“Usage Information” such as the pages you visited on our website, where you clicked, searches performed on our website and other similar information related to how you have used our website. It may also include information related to whether you receive, opened or clicked on any links in an email sent to you.
We understand that certain Technical information or Usage Information may, either alone or when combined with other data, be deemed personal data under various laws and jurisdictions and we are committed to treating such data in compliance with applicable laws.
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
Depending on the type of Information, we may collect or receive Information in the following ways:
When you voluntarily share Information with us. For example, when you register to one of our events, request that we contact you through our online forms, submit your CV, or when you request to receive certain content that we may make available (e.g. research and white papers).
Through use of cookies and other similar technologies (e.g. HTML5 Local Storage, LSO, web beacons, JavaScript, etc.). These technologies help us to analyze how our Marketing Platforms are used and to tailor content that is relevant to you. It also helps us to deliver more relevant advertisements to you on our own or third party sites. For more information on such technologies, including how to manage your cookie preferences please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Information obtained from third party sources. This includes Information received through the various business support tools and services that we use (e.g. marketing platforms, analytics services etc.) and public sources such as social media sites. We may combine the Information received through these sources with other Information we have in order to ensure our records are up to date and so that we are able to provide you with relevant content.
You have choices in how we collect and use Information. See the “
Your Choices
” section below for more information.
The Purposes
We use Information for the following purposes:
To process your inquiries and to respond to your requests. For example, when you contact us to learn more about our products or services or when you request to receive certain materials from us (e.g. white papers, research papers, product and services information). Additionally, if you submit your CV to us, we use it to evaluate your candidacy (including by assessing your qualifications and skills).
To send you information related to our services and products that we believe may interest you, such as newsletters or product and service updates. Such communications will be sent to you when you have chosen to receive such communication or when we have a legitimate interest to market our products and services. In any event, you will always be able to opt-out of receiving such communications. Opting out may be done either directly in the communication received or through the ways described in the instructions in the “
Your Choices
” section below.
To understand how you have used our Marketing Platforms and to customize them in accordance with your interests and past actions and choices. We do this based on our legitimate interest to operate our Marketing Platforms, diagnose any problems with the Marketing Platforms and to improve the Marketing Platforms and your experience when navigating through them.
In our legitimate interest to prevent fraud or harm to us or to any third party, and ensure the security of our network and services.
Where it is necessary for AppsFlyer to comply with its legal obligations and to exercise and enforce its legal rights.
We may use certain third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Who We Share Information With
In order to conduct our business and operate our Marketing Platforms, we may share Information with various third parties, such as:
Our subsidiary companies and global branches.
Third parties that help us operate our Marketing Platforms (e.g. hosting company, recruitment platforms and agencies, payment processors, business management and email distribution service providers and other similar service providers). These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
When required by law, such as to comply with court orders, search warrants, regulatory orders, subpoenas, and other lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
Legal authorities, consultants, advisors or service providers when required to investigate, respond to, or prevent, fraud; or when required to ensure the security of our network and services and protect the safety of AppsFlyer or the public.
As part of any merger or acquisition of AppsFlyer, Information may be transferred to the merging or acquiring company, as well as to any advisors representing a party during discussions of such merger or acquisition.
AppsFlyer resellers, agents, partners or service providers acting on our behalf in connection with the offering of AppsFlyer’s products or services.
Third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Without derogating from the foregoing, AppsFlyer may publish general aggregate and unidentifiable information (e.g. statistical information) relating to use of its Marketing Platforms.
Cross Border Data Transfers and Mechanisms
We may need to transfer Information to countries where we and/or our service providers operate. Such countries may be different from the country in which the data originated and where data protection laws may not be equivalent to, or offer the same protection as, those in your country. By using our Marketing Platforms, you agree to any such transfers. In any event, where appropriate given the nature of services, we will put in place agreements with our service providers to ensure a level of privacy consistent with the terms of this policy.
With regards to the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Economic Area to the United States, please be assured that AppsFlyer continues to comply with all applicable laws in respect of such transfers and any data transfers to the United States will be governed by the Standard Contractual Clauses as set forth in our DPA with the relevant service provider.
AppsFlyer Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. AppsFlyer Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as well as to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view AppsFlyer’s certification, please visit
Data Privacy Framework website
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over AppsFlyer Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, and in case of onward transfer of data to third parties, AppsFlyer maintains liability.
In compliance with the DPF Principles, AppsFlyer is committed to resolving any complaints arising regarding our processing of your personal data. You may direct your queries to privacy@appsflyer.com and, in compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we are committed to referring unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPF to Truste, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://trustarc.com/dispute-resolution/
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of Truste are provided at no cost to you and allow for binding arbitration.
Protecting Your Information
We strive to meet the highest standards of security measures across our business units. We have implemented appropriate technical and organizational measures based on industry-leading standards. Such measures are designed to protect against unauthorized access or unlawful processing of Personal Information and against accidental loss, destruction or damage of Personal Information. As part of such measures, we have established various policies and procedures that guide us, including in respect of asset management, access management, physical security, people security, product security, cloud and network infrastructure security, third-party security, vulnerability management, security monitoring, and incident response.
Information Storage and Retention
We may store Information on our own servers as well as those operated by third party data hosting providers. As specified in Section 5 above (Cross Border Transfers), such servers may be located worldwide. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary to pursue the purpose of the collection. We may also retain your Personal Information for such time needed to pursue our legitimate business interests, in connection with any legal claims and compliance with legal obligations. When we use your information for direct marketing purposes, we will retain your data until you opt-out from receiving the marketing materials; provided that we will need to retain certain information to maintain a record of your request.
Modifications to This Policy
AppsFlyer may amend this Privacy Policy at any time, provided that in the event of a material change we shall provide notice on this page and/or a note near the link to this page. The updates shall apply immediately for new Information collected or provided as of the day of the update and following thirty (30) days for any Information collected or provided to AppsFlyer prior to the update date. If you do not agree to the terms of the new policy you are requested to contact the Legal Department using the contact details listed in Section 11 below. We encourage you to periodically review this page for any updates.
Your Choices
We provide you with various choices on how we may use Information in connection with: (i) our marketing activities; and (ii) our use of cookies and similar technologies to serve your interest-based advertisements and to analyze usage of our Marketing Platforms.
You may choose to stop receiving our newsletter or marketing emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails, accessing the email preferences in your account settings page, or you can contact us at
https://www.appsflyer.com/company/contact/
. You can manage your preferences related to our use of cookies and similar technologies that we use, among other things, to provide you with targeted interest-based advertisements and to analyze your use of our Marketing Platforms – please see our
Cookie Policy
for instructions. Additionally, certain advertisers (including Google) we work with may be members of NAI and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance. You may opt-out from such advertisers’ services here or at the following link:
https://youradchoices.com/
In addition, the laws of some jurisdictions may provide you with various rights in connection with our processing of certain Information. Such rights may include:
The right to withdraw any previously provided consent;
The right to access certain information about you that we process;
The right to have us correct or update any Personal Information;
The right to have certain Information erased;
The right to have us temporarily block our processing of certain Information;
The right to have Information exported into common machine-readable format;
The right to object to our processing of Information in cases of direct marketing, or when we rely on legitimate interests as our lawful basis to process your information; and
The right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority.
We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law. For any additional information regarding such rights or to exercise any such rights please contact AppsFlyer at: privacy@appsflyer.com
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Social Media and Third Party Services
Our website may offer a blog with ‘comments’ section and various social media features, such as a ‘share’ button or links to third party websites and services, including Twitter, LinkedIn, Google+ and Facebook. When using any such features, certain information may be collected by such third parties, including your IP address or which page you are visiting on our website, and such third parties may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Any data collected by such third parties is governed by such third party’s privacy policy. You are encouraged to carefully review such third party privacy policies.
Children’s Privacy
AppsFlyer does not knowingly collect or process personal data from or with respect to children under the age of 16, and you must be 16 years of age or older in order to establish an account for AppsFlyer’s Services. If you are a parent or legal guardian and believe that your child under the age of 16 has submitted his or her personal data or other data without your consent, permission, or authorization – please let us know immediately, and we will promptly act to remove your child’s data from our database, cease the use of such data and inform any other party we suspect to have access to such data to do the same.
California Privacy Rights
We may collect personal information about California residents who are afforded additional rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 et seq. (the “CCPA“). If you are a California resident, you can see more details about the types of personal information we have collected from you in the past 12 months and may collect from you in Section 1 above (
Information We Collect
) and how we collect such personal information in Section 2 above (
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
). The purposes for which we collect your personal information are further described in Section 3 above (
The Purpose
). We do not share your personal information with any third party except as further described in Section 4 above (
Who We Share Information With
). Please refer to the other terms of this Privacy Policy to see further rights afforded to you and how we use your personal information.
We do not “Sell” (as defined in the CCPA) your personal information which we have collected or may collect and in the event we will Sell your personal information, we will notify you by updating this Privacy Policy in accordance with Section 8 above (
Modifications to this Policy
) and we will provide you with the option of opting out of such “sale”.
You, as a California resident, have certain rights regarding your personal information pursuant to the CCPA, subject to certain restrictions under applicable laws, including the rights to access your personal information, to delete your personal information, and to opt out of the “sale” of your personal data. You may request any of these by contacting us via email at
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. Upon your request, we will verify that you are the person making this request and in order to do so, we may request identification documents from you.
Contacting Us
If you have any questions or concerns about this Website Privacy Policy, the information we collect, the practices of AppsFlyer, or your dealings with the Marketing Platforms, please contact us or our Data Protection Officer by sending an email to:
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. For the purposes of Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation, the representative within the EU of AppsFlyer is AppsFlyer Germany Schönhauser Allee 180, 10119 Berlin, Germany (contact
privacy@appsflyer.com
; +49 30 166373500).
Our Cookies Policy
AppsFlyer respects your privacy as our website user. We use cookies to improve your user experience and for remarketing. Some of this data may be shared with select partners. See our
cookies policy
for more information.
Reject all cookies
Accept all cookies
Customize
Cookie Preference Center
AppsFlyer uses Cookies to provide, maintain, and improve our websites, to optimize our offerings and marketing activities, and to provide our visitors and users with a better experience, for example, in order to maintain your preferences, to better secure our websites, to identify technical issues, and to monitor and improve the overall performance of our websites.
More information
Allow All
Please select which Cookies you approve, you may choose all options.
Always Active
Necessary Cookies are enabled for the assurance and function of a properly run website, and they cannot be disabled. They are usually only set in response to actions permitted by you, such as, enabling functions like navigation and access to secure areas of the website. These Cookies do not store personal information that will be used for other purposes.
Performance Cookies
These Cookies provide us with aggregated (anonymous) insights into website enhancement and performance improvement. These cookies allow us to measure and improve the performance of our Sites. They help us know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the website.
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Functional Cookies
These Cookies enable us to provide enhanced functionality and personalization through our Sites and allow for a better user experience. These may be set by us (first-party Cookies) or by third-party providers who work with us (third-party Cookies).
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 3
https://www.appsflyer.com/legal/services-privacy-policy/:
Platform
Measure
Measurement suite
Measure every action on mobile, web and CTV
ROI measurement
Understand your true mobile marketing ROI
Creative Optimization
Unlock creative performance with the power of AI
Analyze
Marketing analytics
Turn insights on campaign performance into action
Incrementality
Prove the real value of your marketing campaigns
Engage
CX & deep linking
Boost revenue with exceptional customer experience
Audience segmentation
Create meaningful conversations with your customers
Protect
Fraud protection
Protect your marketing budget from mobile ad fraud
Collaborate
Privacy Cloud
Collaborate with your partners in a privacy-centric way
AppsFlyer Data Collaboration Platform
First-party data monetization that fuels retail media growth
Partner marketplace
Connect to over 10,000 tech and media partners
Interactive product tours
iOS 14+ solutions
Data feeds & APIs
Solutions
Team
Marketing
Product
Data & Analytics
R&D
Goal
Regain iOS visibility
Kickstart app growth
Scale user acquisition
Increase engagement & LTV
Maximize ROAS
Industry
Gaming
Shopping
Finance
Food & drink
Health & fitness
Travel
Platform
iOS
Android
PC & console
CTV & OTT
Web
Mobile
Web3
Partnerships
Tech and media partners
Agency partners
Partner Program
Interactive product tours
Customer stories
The AppsFlyer difference
Learn
Resources
Stay informed with industry insights, the latest trends, original content, and all things AppsFlyer
Ecosystem
Blog
Reports & guides
Events & webinars
Tools & templates
Industry benchmarks
Videos
Podcasts
Glossary
Metrics comparison
Customers
Customer stories
Product news
Use cases
Help center
Developer Hub
AppsFlyer Learning
Come to MAMA
Company
Who we are
Find out more about our history, our team, what we stand for, and why we do what we do
About us
Newsroom
CEO blog spot
Trust hub
Careers
Social impact
Contact
From our CEO
The future of our ecosystem and web
On privacy and user experience
Aggregated advanced privacy
Pricing
Login
Sign up free
Contact sales
Legal hub
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Documentation
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Services Privacy Policy
Last updated August 6, 2021
Introduction
AppsFlyer provides attribution and marketing analytics services (“
Services
“) that enable advertisers and developers (collectively, “
Customer(s)
“) to: (i) measure and analyze the effectiveness of their marketing campaigns by understanding which marketing campaigns contributed to the download/installation of their mobile applications (“
Applications
“) or such other conversion metric (e.g. relaunch of Application); and (ii) measure and analyze certain events and actions within their Application or websites, such as in-app purchases made by End Users (as defined below). The Services also help our Customers identify and protect against fraudulent behavior related to their marketing campaigns.
This Services Privacy Policy describes AppsFlyer’s privacy practices in relation to the information collected from Customers and End Users and received by AppsFlyer when Customers use our Services. This Services Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected through use of AppsFlyer’s publicly accessible website or marketing activities, which is described under our Privacy Policy. To view the Privacy Policy, please
click here
. Furthermore, AppsFlyer and its Customers have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by AppsFlyer and their use by Customers (“
Agreement(s)
“). Such Agreements may contain additional obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information. Nothing in this Services Privacy Policy derogates from such additional obligations.
For the purpose of this Services Privacy Policy: (i) any reference to “
End User(s)
” means end users who have interacted with, or viewed, Customer’s advertising and marketing materials, or use or have used Customer’s Applications, websites, products and services; and (ii) any reference to “
AppsFlyer
” “
we
” “
us
” or “
our
” shall mean AppsFlyer Ltd. and its affiliates.
End User Data Received and Processed by AppsFlyer
When a Customer uses the Services, the following End User information may be received and processed by AppsFlyer (collectively, “
End User Data
”).
“
Technical Information
”: this refers to technical information related to an End User’s mobile device or computer, such as: browser type, device type and model, CPU, system language, memory, OS version, Wi-Fi status, time stamp and zone, device motion parameters and carrier.
“
Technical Identifiers
”: this refers to various unique identifiers that generally only identify a computer, device, browser or Application. For example, IP address (which may also provide general location information), User agent, IDFA (identifier for advertisers), Android ID (in Android devices); Google Advertiser ID, Customer issued user ID and other similar unique identifiers.
“
Engagement Information
”: this refers to information relating to the Customer’s ad campaigns and End User actions, such as: clicks on Customer ads, ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, the type of ads and the webpage or Application from which such ads were displayed, the webpages on Customer’s website visited by an End User, the URL from the referring website, downloads and installations of Applications, and other interactions, events and actions Customers choose to measure and analyze within their Application or website (e.g. add to cart, in-app purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
While End User Data does not generally contain any information that directly identifies an individual, such as names, addresses, credit cards or other similarly regulated financial information, health information, or any other type of sensitive personal information (“
PII
“), we acknowledge that under certain jurisdictions the End User Data we do receive when a Customer uses the Services may be deemed personal data and therefore, where applicable, will be treated as such. Within the scope of the engagement between Customers and AppsFlyer, Customers are contractually prohibited from collecting PII, unless otherwise agreed by AppsFlyer. However, Customers have sole control over their properties (including their websites and Application) and configuration of the Services and thus Customers have the technical ability to configure the Services to collect PII. This includes, for example, a Customer using an End User’s email address as a Customer issued user ID Technical Identifier. If a Customer has configured the Services to collect PII then we may receive and process such data.
Registration Information Received and Processed by AppsFlyer
When a Customer registers to use the Services, we may collect certain information related to such Customer (“
Registration Information
” and together with the End User Data, “
Customer Data
”), including Customer name and Customer details, billing information and names and contact details of Customer employees and representatives who are using the Services (e.g. email, phone number and address). When a Customer uses the Services, AppsFlyer may also collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Customer is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g. browser type, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Customer (“
Log Data
”).
How Data is Collected
Customer Data may be collected through various methods, including:
When provided voluntarily (e.g. Customer’s Registration Information).
When the Customer integrates AppsFlyer’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Applications, websites and/or ads (“
Collection Technologies
”). For explanations on cookies and similar technologies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Customer in connection with the measurement and analysis of Customer’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with AppsFlyer (“
Partners
”).
How Data is Used by AppsFlyer
When AppsFlyer receives End User Data from a Customer, it uses such End User Data as follows:
to provide such Customer with the Services they have subscribed for. Such services may include, without limitation, attribution, analytics and ad fraud protection services. Please visit
https://www.appsflyer.com
for more information regarding the Services.
to establish: (i) matches between devices used by an End User; and (ii) to detect fraud (such matched data and fraud data, collectively, the, “
Platform Data
”) in order to ensure more accurate attribution measurement and ad fraud protection for Customers using the Services. Platform Data does not contain PII such as End User names, physical addresses, phone numbers or other similar personal data that can directly identify an individual.
With regards to Registration Information and Log Data, we use such information to authenticate login to the Services, to communicate with the Customer and to process any payments in connection with the Services. Additionally, we may use: (i) Registration Information to inform Customers of any updates to the Services, including new features and functionalities; and (ii) Log Data to understand how Customers are using the Services so that we may efficiently audit, maintain and improve the Services provided to Customers.
AppsFlyer may use information derived from the aggregation of End User Data and/or Log Data with other data for research and analytics purposes and improvement and marketing of the Services (“
Aggregated Data
”). Aggregated Data shall be anonymous and in no way reveal the identity of the Customer or any End User.
Sharing Data
AppsFlyer does not share or disclose Customer Data with any third party, except:
Upon our Customer’s request– (e.g. to Partners);
To our subsidiaries and global branches as necessary to help us support and maintain the Services provided to Customers;
To our service providers who help to support our Services – such as data hosting providers and payment processors; Transfers to subsequent third parties are covered by the service agreements with our Customers. These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
When legally required (e.g. court orders or other lawful requests by public authorities), including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To respond to, or prevent, fraud or to protect the safety of AppsFlyer, its Customers, End Users or the public;
As part of any merger or acquisition of AppsFlyer, in which case End User Data may be transferred to the surviving or acquiring entity.
Cross Border Data Transfers
AppsFlyer may need to transfer Customer Data to countries other than the country from which the Data originated. Any such transfer shall be done in compliance with all applicable laws. With regards to the collection, use and retention of personal data transferred from the European Economic Area to the United States, please be assured that AppsFlyer continues to comply with all applicable laws in respect of such transfers and any data transfers to the United States will be governed by the Standard Contractual Clauses as set forth in our DPA with the relevant service provider.
Protecting Data and Retention
AppsFlyer implements appropriate technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Customer Data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.appsflyer.com/trust/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Services Privacy Policy.
AppsFlyer will not retain: (i) End User Data for more than twenty-four months except where otherwise directed by Customers or required or allowed by law; and (ii) Registration Information, Log Data or Platform Data for more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected.
Relationship, Lawful Basis and End User Choices
Under the laws of certain jurisdictions, when processing End User Data in connection with the provision of Services to a Customer, AppsFlyer is deemed a ‘data processor’ while its Customers are deemed ‘data controllers’.
Therefore, End Users should closely review the Privacy Policies of the Applications and websites they use in order to learn about the privacy practices of our Customers.
Where AppsFlyer may be deemed a data controller under the laws of certain jurisdictions (e.g. in connection with its processing of Log Data or Registration Information), AppsFlyer shall comply with all applicable laws related to its status as a data controller and shall only use the data as described in this Services Privacy Policy. With regards to Registration Information and Log Data, the lawful basis AppsFlyer relies on is its need to perform its obligations under the Agreement between AppsFlyer and Customer and on its legitimate interests to maintain, analyze and improve the Services. The laws of certain jurisdictions may provide End Users with various rights in connection with the processing of End User Data, including:
The right to withdraw any previously provided consent;
The right to access certain information about you that we process;
The right to have us correct or update any Personal Information;
The right to have certain Information erased;
The right to have us temporarily block our processing of certain Information;
The right to have Information exported into common machine-readable format;
The right to object to our processing of Information in cases of direct marketing, or when we rely on legitimate interests as our lawful basis to process your information; and
The right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority.
Where AppsFlyer is deemed a data processor, End Users should contact our Customers to pursue any such legal data subject rights. AppsFlyer will cooperate with its Customers to support and comply with any such data subject rights requests.
Where AppsFlyer is deemed a data controller, End Users may exercise their rights by contacting AppsFlyer at:
privacy@appsflyer.com
. We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law. In any event, AppsFlyer provides End Users with the ability to opt-out of being measured by the Services by emailing a request to
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by completing the form
here
. You may also send any question regarding your exercise of data subject rights to
privacy@appsflyer.com
.
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Updates and Questions
We may update this Services Privacy Policy from time to time. Any material changes will be notified to the Customer either through the Services, email or as otherwise agreed by the parties in the Agreement. We will also indicate that an update has occurred on the top of this page so Customers and End Users are encouraged to review this Services Privacy Policy from time to time. For any questions relating to this Services Privacy Policy or to contact our data protection officer please send us a mail to:
privacy@appsflyer.com
. You may also send us or our data protection officer regular mail:
AppsFlyer – Attn: Legal Team/Data Protection Officer,
14 Maskit St.
Herzliya, Israel
4673314
For the purposes of Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation, the representative within the EU of AppsFlyer is AppsFlyer Germany GmbH Kurfürstendamm 11, c/o WeWork, 10719 Berlin, Germany (contact
privacy@appsflyer.com
; +49-30-3119-9129)
Our Cookies Policy
AppsFlyer respects your privacy as our website user. We use cookies to improve your user experience and for remarketing. Some of this data may be shared with select partners. See our
cookies policy
for more information.
Reject all cookies
Accept all cookies
Customize
Cookie Preference Center
AppsFlyer uses Cookies to provide, maintain, and improve our websites, to optimize our offerings and marketing activities, and to provide our visitors and users with a better experience, for example, in order to maintain your preferences, to better secure our websites, to identify technical issues, and to monitor and improve the overall performance of our websites.
More information
Allow All
Please select which Cookies you approve, you may choose all options.
Always Active
Necessary Cookies are enabled for the assurance and function of a properly run website, and they cannot be disabled. They are usually only set in response to actions permitted by you, such as, enabling functions like navigation and access to secure areas of the website. These Cookies do not store personal information that will be used for other purposes.
Performance Cookies
These Cookies provide us with aggregated (anonymous) insights into website enhancement and performance improvement. These cookies allow us to measure and improve the performance of our Sites. They help us know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the website.
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Functional Cookies
These Cookies enable us to provide enhanced functionality and personalization through our Sites and allow for a better user experience. These may be set by us (first-party Cookies) or by third-party providers who work with us (third-party Cookies).
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 4
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 5
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 6
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy:
Skip to main content
firebase.google.com uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Build
More
Run
More
Solutions
Pricing
Docs
More
Community
More
Support
Go to console
Developer Support
Contact Support
Scope of no-cost support
Support Guides
Overview
FAQ
Security checklist
Launch checklist
Firebase-related service accounts
Troubleshoot initialization options
Enable the AdSupport framework
Dynamic Links deprecation
Deprecation FAQ
Export Dynamic Links metadata
Migrate to App Links & Universal Links
Migrate from Parse
Android
iOS+
Cloud Audit Logs
Firebase Management
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase App Check
Firebase Security Rules
Firebase Realtime Database
Android Device Streaming
Recent Changes and Updates
Release Notes
iOS Release Notes
Android Release Notes
JavaScript Release Notes
Flutter Release Notes
C++ Release Notes
Unity Release Notes
Admin Node.js Release Notes
Admin Java Release Notes
Admin Python Release Notes
Admin Go Release Notes
Admin .
NET Release Notes
Security Rules Release Notes
Firebase CLI Release Notes
Policies for changes and versioning
Overview
Introducing and communicating changes
Versioning and maintenance
Legal Information
Terms of Service
Paid Services Terms
Data Processing and Security Terms
Firebase: Standard Contractual Clauses
Service Level Agreement for Hosting and Realtime Database
Cloud Storage for Firebase Service Level Agreement
Firebase App Indexing User Data Policy
Crashlytics and App Distribution Terms
Firebase Subprocessors
Privacy and Security Information
Privacy and Security in Firebase
Designate Data Protection Officers and EU Representatives
Firebase Data Privacy Inquiries
Manage Instance ID data
Clear and export users' data
Storing privacy settings with Firebase
Build
Go to Build
Build Products
App Check
App Hosting
Authentication
Cloud Functions
Cloud Storage
Data Connect
Extensions
Firebase ML
Firestore
Genkit
Hosting
Realtime Database
Vertex AI in Firebase
Generative AI
Run
Go to Run
Run Products
A/B Testing
App Distribution
Cloud Messaging
Crashlytics
Google Analytics
In-App Messaging
Performance Monitoring
Remote Config
Test Lab
Overview
Fundamentals
Build
Run
Reference
Samples
Learn
Events
Stories
Firebase
Support
Send feedback
Privacy and Security in Firebase
bookmark_border
bookmark
Stay organized with collections
Save and categorize content based on your preferences.
On this page
Data protection
Firebase support for GDPR and CCPA
Firebase Data Processing and Security Terms
Firebase is certified under major privacy and security standards
Data processing information
Examples of end-user data processed by Firebase
Guides for enabling opt-in for end-user data processing
Data storage and processing locations
Security information
Data encryption
Security practices
Firebase Service Data
Examples of how Firebase Service Data is processed by Firebase
Firebase Service Data use by non-Firebase Google services
This page outlines Firebase's key security and privacy information. Whether
you're looking to kick off a new project with Firebase, or curious about how
Firebase works with your existing project, read on to see how Firebase can help
protect you and your users.
Last modified: February 20, 2025
Data protection
Firebase support for GDPR and CCPA
On May 25th, 2018, the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) replaced the
1995 EU Data Protection Directive. On January 1, 2020, the California Consumer
Privacy Act (CCPA) took effect. On January 1, 2023, the California Privacy
Rights Act (CPRA), which is a data privacy law that amends and expands upon the
CCPA, took effect. Google is committed to helping our customers succeed under
these privacy regulations, whether they are large software companies or
independent developers.
The GDPR imposes obligations on data controllers and data processors, and the
CCPA/CPRA imposes obligations on businesses and their service providers.
Firebase customers typically act as the "data controller" (GDPR) or "business"
(CCPA/CPRA) for any personal data or information about their end-users they
provide to Google in connection with their use of Firebase, and Google generally
operates as a "data processor" (GDPR) or "service provider" (CCPA/CPRA).
This means that data is under the customer's control. Customers are
responsible for obligations like fulfilling an individual's rights with respect
to their personal data or information.
Firebase Data Processing and Security Terms
When customers use Firebase, Google is generally a data processor under GDPR and
processes personal data on their behalf. Similarly, when customers use Firebase,
Google generally operates as a service provider under the CCPA/CPRA handling
personal information on their behalf. Firebase terms include
Data Processing
and Security Terms
detailing these
responsibilities.
Certain Firebase services governed by the
Google Cloud Platform (GCP) Terms of Service
are already covered by associated data processing terms, the
Cloud Data Processing Addendum
.
A complete list of Firebase services currently governed by the GCP Terms of
Service is available in the
Terms of Service for Firebase Services
.
Google Analytics is a separate service that can be used together with Firebase,
and is subject to separate
terms
.
Firebase is certified under major privacy and security standards
ISO and SOC compliance
All Firebase services (aside from App Indexing) have successfully completed the
ISO
27001
and
SOC
1
,
SOC
2
,
and
SOC 3
evaluation
process, and some have also completed the
ISO
27017
and
ISO
27018
certification
process. Compliance reports and certificates for Firebase services governed by
the GCP Terms of Service may be requested via the
Compliance Reports
Manager
.
Service name
ISO 27001
ISO 27017
ISO 27018
SOC 1
SOC 2
SOC 3
Cloud Firestore
check
check
check
check
check
check
Cloud Functions for Firebase
check
check
check
check
check
check
Cloud Storage for Firebase
check
check
check
check
check
check
Firebase A/B Testing
check
check
check
check
Firebase App Check
check
check
check
check
Firebase App Distribution
check
check
check
check
Firebase Authentication
check
check
check
check
check
check
Firebase Cloud Messaging
check
check
check
check
Firebase Crashlytics
check
check
check
check
Firebase Dynamic Links
check
check
check
check
Firebase Hosting
check
check
check
check
Firebase In-App Messaging
check
check
check
check
Firebase ML
check
check
check
check
Firebase Performance Monitoring
check
check
check
check
Firebase Platform
check
check
check
check
Firebase Realtime Database
check
check
check
check
Firebase Remote Config
check
check
check
check
Firebase Test Lab
check
check
check
check
check
check
Gemini in Firebase
check
check
check
check
Vertex AI in Firebase
check
check
check
check
International Data Transfers
As described in our
Data Privacy Framework
certification
,
we comply with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks (DPF) and the
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF as set forth by the US Department of Commerce
regarding the collection, use and retention of personal information from the
EEA, Switzerland and the UK, respectively. Google LLC (and its wholly-owned US
subsidiaries unless explicitly excluded) has certified that it adheres to the
DPF Principles. Google remains responsible for any of your personal information
that is shared under the Onward Transfer Principle with third parties for
external processing on our behalf, as described in the
"Sharing your
information" section of our Privacy
Policy
. To learn more about
the DPF, and to view Google's certification, please visit the
DPF
website
.
If you have an inquiry regarding our privacy practices in relation to our DPF
certification, we encourage you to
contact
us
. Google is
subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade
Commission. You may also refer a complaint to your local data protection
authority and we will work with them to resolve your concern. In certain
circumstances, the DPF provides the right to invoke binding arbitration to
resolve complaints not resolved by other means, as described in
Annex I to the
DPF
Principles
.
Data processing information
Examples of end-user data processed by Firebase
Some Firebase services process your end users' data to provide their service.
The chart below has examples of how various Firebase services use and handle
end-user data that may potentially be identifying. In addition, many Firebase
services offer the ability to request deletion of specific data or control how
data is handled.
Firebase service
End-user data
How data helps provide the service
Cloud Functions for Firebase
IP addresses
How it helps:
Cloud Functions uses IP addresses to
            execute event-handling functions and HTTP functions based on end-user actions.
Retention:
Cloud functions only saves IP addresses temporarily, to
            provide the service.
Firebase App Check
Attestation material from supported attestation providers
App Check tokens from successful attestations
How it helps:
Firebase App Check uses attestation
            material required by the corresponding attestation provider and
            received from end-user's devices to help establish the integrity of
            the device and/or the app. Attestation materials are sent to the
            corresponding attestation provider for validation based on the
            developer's configuration. App Check tokens obtained from successful
            attestations are sent with every request to supported Firebase
            services to access resources protected by App Check.
Retention:
Attestation material is not retained by
            App Check, but when it is sent to attestation providers, it is
            subject to the terms of those attestation providers. App Check
            tokens returned from successful attestations are valid throughout
            their TTL duration, which cannot be longer than 7 days. For
            developers who use replay protection features, App Check stores the
            App Check tokens used with these features for at most 30 days. Other
            App Check tokens not used with replay protection features are not
            retained by Firebase services.
Firebase App Distribution
Users' names
Email addresses
iOS UDIDs
Secure Android IDs
Firebase
installation IDs
Tester feedback (screenshots and text)
How it helps:
Firebase App Distribution uses the data to distribute
            app builds to testers, monitor tester activity, enable tester features like in-app
            feedback, and associate data with tester devices.
Retention:
Firebase App Distribution retains user information
            until the Firebase customer requests its deletion, after which data is removed from live
            and backup systems within 180 days.
Firebase Authentication
Passwords
Email addresses
Phone numbers
User agents
IP addresses
How it helps:
Firebase Authentication uses the data to enable end-user
            authentication, and facilitate end-user account management. It also uses user-agent
            strings and IP addresses to provide added security and prevent abuse during sign-up and
            authentication.
Retention:
Firebase Authentication keeps logged IP addresses for a few
            weeks. It retains other authentication information until the Firebase customer initiates
            deletion of the associated user, after which data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Firebase Cloud Messaging uses
Firebase
installation IDs to determine which devices to deliver messages to.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs
            until the Firebase customer
            makes an API call to delete the ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase Crashlytics
Crashlytics Installation UUIDs
Firebase installations ID
Crash traces
Breakpad minidump formatted data
(NDK crashes only)
How it helps:
Firebase Crashlytics uses crash stack
            traces to associate crashes with a project, send email alerts to
            project members and display them in the Firebase Console, and help
            Firebase customers debug crashes. It uses Crashlytics Installation
            UUIDs to measure the number of users impacted by a crash and
            minidump data to process NDK crashes. The minidump data is stored
            while the crash session is being processed and then discarded. The
            Firebase installation ID enables upcoming features that will enhance
            crash reporting and crash management services. Refer to
Examples of stored device information
for more detail on the types of user information gathered.
Retention:
Firebase Crashlytics keeps crash stack traces,
            extracted minidump data, and associated identifiers (including
            Crashlytics Installation UUIDs and Firebase installation IDs) for 90 days before
            starting the process of removing it from live and backup systems.
Note:
Firebase Crashlytics stores minidump data only temporarily in order to
            process NDK crashes.
Firebase Dynamic Links
Device specs (iOS)
IP Addresses (iOS)
How it helps:
Dynamic Links uses device specs and IP addresses on iOS to open
            newly-installed apps to a specific page or context.
Retention:
Dynamic Links only stores device specs and IP addresses temporarily, to
            provide the service.
Firebase Hosting
IP addresses
How it helps:
Hosting uses IP addresses of incoming requests to detect
            abuse and provide customers with detailed analysis of usage data.
Retention:
Hosting retains IP data for a few months.
Firebase In-App Messaging
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Firebase In-App Messaging
uses
Firebase
installation IDs to determine which devices to deliver messages to.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs
            until the Firebase customer
            makes an API call to delete the ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase ML
Uploaded Images
installation auth tokens
How it helps:
The Cloud based APIs store uploaded images temporarily,
            to process and return the analysis to you. Stored images are typically deleted within a
            few hours. See the Cloud Vision
Data Usage FAQ
for more
            information.
installation auth tokens
are used by
Firebase ML
for device authentication when interacting with app
            instances, for example, to distribute developer models to app instances.
Retention:
installation auth tokens remain valid until their
            expiration date. The default token lifetime is one week.
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Firebase
installation IDs
IP addresses
How it helps:
Performance Monitoring
uses
Firebase
installation IDs
            to calculate the number of unique Firebase installations that access network resources,
            to ensure that access patterns are sufficiently anonymous. It also uses
Firebase
installation IDs with
Firebase Remote Config
to manage the rate of performance event reporting. Additionally, it uses IP
            addresses to map performance events to the countries they originate from. For more
            information, see
Data collection
.
Retention:
Performance Monitoring
keeps IP-associated
            events for 30 days, and it keeps installation-associated and de-identified performance
            data for 60 days before starting the process of removing it from live and backup
            systems.
Firebase Realtime Database
IP addresses
User agents
How it helps:
Realtime Database uses IP addresses and user agents to
            enable the
profiler
            tool
, which helps Firebase customers understand usage trends and platform
            breakdowns.
Retention:
Realtime Database keeps IP addresses and user agent
            information for a few days, unless a customer chooses to save it for longer.
Firebase Remote Config
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Remote Config
uses
Firebase
installation IDs
            to select configuration
            values to return to end-user devices.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs until the Firebase customer makes an API call to delete the
          ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup systems within 180 days.
Vertex AI in Firebase
Customer's inputs and outputs data sent and received from the AI model
How it helps:
Vertex AI in Firebase
uses Vertex AI's Generative AI
            API to predict content.
Retention:
During prediction, Google doesn't log Customer Data to
            generate a customer's output or train foundation models. By default, Google caches a
            customer's inputs and outputs for the Gemini models to accelerate responses to
            subsequent prompts from the customer.
See more details at
Generative
              AI and Data Governance | Generative AI on Vertex AI | Google Cloud
.
Examples of information collected by Crashlytics
An RFC-4122 UUID which permits us to deduplicate crashes
The Crashlytics Installation UUID
The Firebase installations ID (FID)
The Firebase session ID, which is a random UUID generated to tag events
      with a session
The timestamp of when the crash occurred
The app's bundle identifier and full version number
The device's operating system name and version number
A boolean indicating whether the device was jailbroken/rooted
The device's model name, CPU architecture, amount of RAM and disk
      space
The uint64 instruction pointer of every frame of every currently running
      thread
If available in the runtime, the plain-text method or function name
      containing each instruction pointer.
If an exception was thrown, the plain-text class name and message value
      of the exception
If a fatal signal was raised, its name and integer code
For each binary image loaded into the application, its name, UUID, byte
      size, and the uint64 base address at which it was loaded into RAM
A boolean indicating whether or not the app was in the background at the
      time it crashed
An integer value indicating the rotation of the screen at the time of
      crash
A boolean indicating whether the device's proximity sensor was
      triggered
The contents of
version-control-info.textproto
(only for Android apps
configured
        to use the version control system (VCS) integration
)
Examples of information collected by Performance Monitoring
The Firebase installations ID (FID)
The Firebase session ID, which is a random UUID generated to tag events
      with a session
General device information, such as model, OS, and orientation
RAM and disk size
CPU usage
Carrier (based on Mobile Country and Network Code)
Radio/Network information (for example, WiFi, LTE, 3G)
Country (based on IP address)
Locale/language
App version
App foreground or background state
App package name
Firebase
installation IDs
Duration times for automated traces
Network URLs (not including URL parameters or payload content)
      and the following corresponding information:
Response codes (for example, 403, 200)
Payload size in bytes
Response times
See a
full list
of the
    automatic traces collected by
Performance Monitoring
.
Note:
For more info on deleting data associated with installations, see
Delete a Firebase installation
.
Guides for enabling opt-in for end-user data processing
Services in the table above need some amount of end-user data to function. As a
result, it's not possible to entirely disable data collection while using those
services.
If you're a customer who would like to offer users a chance to opt-in to a
service, and the data collection that comes with it, in most cases that just
requires adding a dialog or settings toggle before using the service.
Some services, however, start up automatically when included in an app. To give
users a chance to opt-in before using those services, you can choose to disable
auto-initialization for each service, and manually initialize them at run time
instead. To find out how, read the guides below:
Cloud Messaging
:
Prevent Auto-initialization (Android)
or
Prevent Auto-initialization (iOS+)
Crashlytics
:
Enable Opt-in Reporting (iOS+)
or
Enable Opt-in Reporting (Android)
Performance Monitoring
:
Enable Opt-in Monitoring
If you integrate Firebase with Google Analytics, learn how to
configure Analytics data collection
.
Data storage and processing locations
Unless a service or feature offers data location selection, Firebase may process
and store your data anywhere Google or its agents maintain facilities. Potential
facility locations vary by service.
US-only services
The
Firebase Authentication
service is run only from US data centers. As a result,
Firebase Authentication
processes data exclusively in the United States.
Global services
The majority of Firebase services run on global Google infrastructure.
They could process data at any of the
Google Cloud Platform locations
or
Google data center locations
.
For some services, you can make a specific data location selection, which
restricts processing to that location (for more information, see the
service specific terms
of the Google Cloud Platform Terms of Service).
Cloud Firestore
Firebase Crashlytics
Firebase ML
Cloud Functions for Firebase
Firebase Dynamic Links
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Hosting
Firebase Remote Config
Firebase App Check
Firebase App Distribution
Firebase In-App Messaging
Firebase Test Lab
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Security information
Data encryption
Firebase services encrypt data in transit using HTTPS and logically isolate
customer data.
In addition, several Firebase services also encrypt their data at rest:
Cloud Firestore
Firebase Authentication
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Cloud Functions for Firebase
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase Realtime Database
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Crashlytics
Firebase Test Lab
Firebase App Check
Firebase App Distribution
Security practices
To keep personal data safe, Firebase employs extensive security measures to
minimize access:
Firebase restricts access to a select employees who have a business purpose to access personal data.
Firebase logs employee access to systems that contain personal data.
Firebase only permits access to personal data by employees who sign in with Google Sign-In and
2-factor authentication
.
Firebase Service Data
Firebase Service Data is personal information that Google collects and generates
during the provision and administration of the Firebase services
*
,
excluding Customer Data
**
as defined in our customer agreements
covering Firebase services and
Google Cloud Service Data
.
Examples of Firebase Service Data include information about service usage,
resource identifiers like application IDs and package name/bundle IDs, technical
and operational details of usage such as IP addresses, and direct communications
with developers from feedback and support related conversations.
*Services covered include Firebase A/B Testing, Firebase App Distribution,
  Firebase Cloud Messaging, Firebase Crashlytics, Firebase Dynamic Links,
  Firebase Hosting, Firebase In-App Messaging, Firebase ML,
  Firebase Performance Monitoring, Firebase Realtime Database,
  Firebase Remote Config, and Firebase User Segmentation Storage.
**For more information about how we process Customer Data, see our
Firebase Data Processing and Security
  Terms
.
Examples of how Firebase Service Data is processed by Firebase
Google uses Firebase Service Data in accordance with our
privacy policy
and applicable terms.
Firebase Service Data is used, for example, to:
Provide Firebase services you request
Make recommendations to optimize use of Firebase services
Maintain and improve Firebase services
Provide and improve other services you request
Understand your use of Firebase and other Google services
Provide better support to and communicate with you
Protect you, our users, the public and Google
Comply with legal obligations
Firebase Service Data use by non-Firebase Google services
You can control whether your Firebase Service Data may be used by Google to
provide more in depth analysis, insights, and recommendations about
non-Firebase
Google services and improve
non-Firebase
Google services.
You can configure this in your Firebase data privacy settings page.
If this control is disabled, Firebase Service Data will continue to be used
for other purposes, such as those mentioned above, in accordance with our
privacy policy
and applicable terms, including
to make recommendations about and improve
Firebase
services, and to deliver
and improve other services you request, such as Google products you link to your
Firebase project.
Still have questions? Contact us
For any privacy-related questions you have that aren't covered here,
reach out to Firebase Support
. If you're a Firebase developer, include your Firebase App ID. Find your Firebase App ID in the
Your apps
card of your
settings
Project
settings
.
Send feedback
Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the
Creative Commons Attribution 4.0 License
, and code samples are licensed under the
Apache 2.0 License
. For details, see the
Google Developers Site Policies
. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.
Last updated 2025-03-04 UTC.
Info
Chat
Sub-policy 7
https://mygardyn.com/policy/privacy/:
Marketing
These cookies are set by our advertising partners to provide behavioral advertising and re-marketing analytical data. Marketing cookies are used to identify visitors between different websites (e.g., content partners or banner networks). Those cookies may be used by companies to build a profile of visitor interests or show relevant ads on other websites.
Performance
These cookies are used to see how visitors use the website (e.g., analytics cookies). Information collected with these cookies is used in operations to measure website or software KPIs, such as performance. With the usage of these cookies we are able to count visits and traffic sources to improve the performance of our site and application. If you do not allow these cookies, we will not know when you have visited our site.
Necessary
These cookies are necessary for the core functionality of our website and some of its features. The website cannot be used properly without strictly necessary cookies. These cookies are usually set to manage actions made by you, such as requesting website visual elements, pages resources, or user login/off. We can also use these cookies to set up essential functionalities to guarantee the security and efficiency of the service requested.
Confirm My Choices
Cookies help us deliver the best experience on our website. By clicking Accept you are agreeing to the placement and use of cookies as described in our
privacy policy
.
Customize
Accept all
LIMITED QUANTITIES
Gardyn Home is back in stock - order today!
--
Day
--
Hrs
--
Min
--
Sec
×
Gardyn Privacy Policy
Last updated: July 31, 2024
Introduction
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) tells You how Gardyn, Inc., a company formed under the laws of Delaware having an address at 8120 Woodmont Avenue #640, Bethesda, MD 20814 (“Gardyn” “us” “ours” or “we”) collects, uses, shares, secures, and eventually deletes, information collected from and about Users of our Website and App. This Policy also describes how our Product collects, uses, shares, and secures, information collected from and about our Customers.
If You are applying for a job with us, please click on the
Careers link
at the bottom of our Website. This will take you to our LinkedIn page, which contains the list of jobs. Use the “Easy Apply” feature to apply.
Scope of this Policy
This Policy covers both our online and offline data collection activities, including information that we collect through our Website, as well as our offline via our Products.
By continuing to visit and use our Website and App, You are agreeing to the terms of this Policy. If You do not agree, then please exit this Website, close Your browser, and delete our App.
Definitions
“Customer” means a natural person that purchases our products via our Website or via one of our Affiliates or that signs up for our App to use our products.
Please note that we sell our products via independent retailers as well. When You purchase our products from an independent retailer, You may be considered that retailer’s customer and not our Customer. That retailer may be collecting Your Personal Information in connection with the sale as well. We do not share or receive Your Personal Information with or from these independent retailers, and thus, You should review that retailer’s privacy policy for more details on the Personal Information that they are collecting from You.
“Personal Data” means Personal Information.
“Personal Information” means any information relating to an identified or identifiable individual that is collected from our Customers and Users via our Website and App or offline via collection from our Products. Personal Information may include a Customer’s or a User’s: full name, physical address, email address, IP address, or other identifier such as from a Cookie.
Personal Information does not include any aggregate or anonymized data that may have been created from Personal Information but can no longer be used to identify, relate to or could reasonably be linked to a Customer or a User.
“Product(s)” means our artificial intelligence powered indoor garden that You have bought from our Website.
“Sensitive Personal Information” means any information collected from our Customers and Users that reveals a racial or ethnic origin, political opinion, religious belief, philosophical belief or trade union membership. It also may include a natural person’s genetic and biometric data, financial information, and data concerning their health, sex life or sexual orientation.
“User” means a natural person that visits and interacts with our Website.
“You” or “Your” means a Customer or User.
“Website and App” including those terms individual, means our website
https://mygardyn.com
and our Gardyn application available on most app stores.
Gardyn’s Information Collection Practices Overview
Gardyn offers a range of products and services via our Website and App. It is our policy to only obtain Personal Information that is absolutely necessary to provide our products and services to You and to limit the access to customer Personal Information to only those individuals who need it to serve our Customers’ and Users’ needs.
To provide You with the most comprehensive and personalized Customer experience possible, and in connection with Your preferences, we may combine information collected via one method (e.g., via our Website) with information collected via another method (e.g., from our Product). Additionally, as we strive to provide the best service and experience, certain information may also be used to maintain and improve our customer service to You; be used to create and develop new products, offerings, and events; and otherwise support the provision of our products and services to our Customers. We have outlined all of the different ways that we share and use Your information in this Policy.
Information that We Collect from You When You Visit Our Website:
We collect certain Personal Information from You in order to operate our Website and App effectively and provide You with the best experiences when You visit and use them.
Information Provided By You
When You register for a Customer account online or sign up for a membership with us after purchase of a new Product,  purchase of a used Product, or being given a gift, we will collect certain Personal Information about You such as Your name, address, e-mail address, date of birth or age range, telephone number, general geographic location (such as Your zip code or city and state), or other lifestyle information. We may use a third party to collect this information. We may also collect information via a questionnaire about how you heard about Gardyn, your reasons for purchasing the Product and to personalize your Product, among other questions. We may use a third party to collect this information. You have the option to modify certain demographic information stored under Your account profile and if You choose, You can have Your purchase history and other related preferences stored as well).
When You make a purchase with us directly online, a third party  may collect Your financial information on our behalf, which is also considered Sensitive Personal Information. A third party, on our behalf,  would also need to collect any information that You use to make a purchase, such as Your credit card details (cardholder name, card number, expiration date, etc.), gift card information, check, or other forms of payment (if such are made available). This also includes the billing name and address associated with Your form of payment.
When You make a purchase directly with us online, we may collect your contact information: name, physical address, email address, social media handles, and phone numbers.
Please note that we do not collect and maintain your payment information directly, instead we utilize a third-party payment processor to collect and facilitate all online payments on our behalf. Additionally, if You choose to store Your payment information on Your account, such information will be stored by the Payment Processor and not with us directly.
Please see the section on how we share information with our Payment Processor below for more information. To review or edit Your demographic or billing information, go to the relevant “My Account” section of our site or contact Customer Service.
We will also collect certain Personal Information about You, such as Your email address and name, when You sign up to receive our marketing communications and if You provide us with a review or feedback about our Products.
Influencer Program
If You apply to be in our Influencer Program, we will collect certain Personal Information about You such as Your name, physical address, email address, social media handles, website, and phone numbers. If You are chosen for a collaboration, we will also collect additional Personal Information from You, such as Your biometric information via Your video review(s) and other content developed, and require you to enter into a contract with us. If you enter into that contract, You will receive monetary or other compensation such as a free Product.
Gardyn’s Retail Partner Affiliate Program
If You are applying for our Gardyn’s Retail Partner Affiliate Program, we will collect Your Personal Information, such as Your name, physical address, email address, social media handles, website, phone number, and information about Your employment (if You are applying on behalf of Your employer). This may also be considered Your Sensitive Information if You work at an employer that is unionized and Your position is in the union.
Gardyn Grows for Good Program
If You are applying for our Gardyn Grows for Good Program, we will collect Your Personal Information, such as Your name, email address, physical address, social media handles, website, and phone numbers, and information about Your employment (if You are applying on behalf of Your employer). We will also collect other information, such as why You are applying for the program, and details on how the program will help You and the organization on whose behalf You are applying.
Gardyn for Schools
If You are applying for our Gardyn for Schools, we will collect Your Personal Information, such as Your name, email address, physical address, social media handles, website, phone numbers, and information about Your employment (if You are applying on behalf of Your employer). This may also be considered Your Sensitive Information if You work at a school that is unionized and Your position is in the union. We will also collect other information, such as how the program will help the school on whose behalf You are applying. Please note that we do not collect any information regarding children or students at the schools that participate in this program unless we have written consent from the parents or guardians.If we receive text, photographs, or video or audio content from teachers, parents, or guardians, we shall not use it unless we receive written consent.
Information collected from Gift Givers
If You have received a new or used
Product and/or its accessories as a gift, then we may have collected Your name,
physical
address
, social media handles, website,
email address
, and phone numbers
from the person that bought it for You
. You may be able to register for a Customer account online via the Website or the App or via Customer Support or sign up for a membership with us online via the Website or the App or via Customer Support. If you are given a new or used Product as a gift, you may be able to purchase plants without registering for a Customer account or signing up for a membership.
When You
complete the signup or membership process, we will then consider You a Customer and
will then collect Your information
as a Customer as outlined in
this Policy
.
Information collected on Our Website
We also may use various technologies and methods to collect information directly from You or from Your computer or device and about Your activities on our Website.
Information collected automatically:
We may automatically collect information from You when You visit Our Website and App. This information may include Your IP address, location data, Your browser type and language, access times, the content of any undeleted cookies that Your browser previously accepted from us, referring or exit website address, internet service provider, date/time stamp, operating system, locale and language preferences, and system configuration information.
We may use Google Analytics to collect information about Your use of Our Website and App as well. To research disabling Google Analytics, please find information here:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/181881?hl=en
. We may use other means of analytics. To research enabling other privacy controls, please find information here:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/
.
We may also collect information from You automatically through any site or web application that we may develop and run on a third-party social network such as Facebook. This could also include any site or application that we specifically design for use on a cell phone or other mobile device, such as a mobile-enabled site (i.e., WAP site) or mobile application (e.g., iPad/iPhone app).
Cookies:
When You visit our Website, we may assign Your device one or more cookies to facilitate access to our site and to personalize Your online experience. Through the use of a cookie, we also may automatically collect information about Your online activity on our site, such as the web pages You visit, the links You click, and the searches You conduct on our site. Most browsers automatically accept cookies, but You can usually modify Your browser setting to decline cookies.
A cookie is a small text file that is stored on a user’s computer for record keeping purposes. Cookies can be either session cookies or persistent cookies. A session cookie expires when You close Your browser and is used to make it easier for You to navigate our website. A persistent cookie remains on Your hard drive for an extended period of time.
We use cookies to personalize content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyze our traffic. We also share information about Your use of Our site with Our social media, advertising and analytics partners, who may combine it with other information that You’ve provided to them or that they’ve collected from Your use of their services.
When You first visit our site, we provide You with a choice to either accept or deny certain cookies. If You choose to decline cookies please note that some of the features and services of our Website and App and Appmay not function as well as intended. Even if You choose to accept cookies, You are always free to change Your mind and revoke that consent.
Also, to opt-out from third-party cookies that are used for advertising purposes, You can do so on the NAI website at
https://www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp
.
Other technologies:
We may use standard Internet technology, such as web beacons and other similar technologies, to track Your use of our Website. We also may include web beacons in promotional e-mail messages or newsletters to determine whether messages have been opened and acted upon. The information we obtain in this manner enables us to customize the services we offer to Customers and Users of our Website, to deliver targeted advertisements, and to measure the overall effectiveness of our online advertising, content, programming, or other activities. Web beacons (also known as clear gifs, pixel tags or web bugs) are tiny graphics with a unique identifier, similar in function to cookies, and are used to track the online movements of web users or to access cookies. Unlike cookies, which are stored on Your device, web beacons are embedded invisibly on the web pages (or in emails) and are about the size of the period at the end of this sentence. Web beacons may be used to deliver or communicate with cookies, to count visitors to certain pages, and to understand usage patterns. We also may receive an anonymous identification number if You come to our Website from an online advertisement displayed on a third-party website.
Customer Surveys and Feedback Forms:
We may ask You to voluntarily share with us comments on and aspects of Your experience in using our products or services, via customer surveys online and feedback forms that we may e-mail or mail to You. We may also collect comments and suggestions about our products, App and Website, testimonials, or other feedback You send us about what You may have liked (or disliked) about Your experience in using our products or services.
Additionally, we may use a third-party provider to collect certain feedback, such as testimonials or reviews about our products. Our third-party provider may collect Your Personal Information and Your Sensitive Personal Information directly from You in order to obtain these testimonials or reviews from You. We do not receive Your Personal Information or Your Sensitive Personal Information from the third party provider unless You include the same within the text of the review or testimonial. You may request information about the third party provider by emailing
privacy@mygardyn.com
.
Please note that we welcome and appreciate Your feedback and suggestions. But if You send the same to us, we reserve the right to use the same freely without any restrictions, credit to You, or compensation to You. Additionally, we are under no obligation to keep any such suggestions confidential.
Information Collected from You Over via Text Messaging, Live Chat, and E-Mail
Text Messaging
If You have signed up to receive text messages from us, we may collect information from You through one of our inbound text messaging programs. For example, we may periodically allow customers to send us inbound text messages using a short code that we create and advertise in connection with a special offer or promotion. In addition to the message itself, we may also collect Your geolocation information as well and use that information to send You personalized marketing messages. We do not share Your mobile telephone number with any third parties to use for their own promotional/marketing purposes. We utilize third parties to support our text messaging communications with You. You may request information about the third-party provider by emailing
privacy@mygardyn.com
. You may opt-out of direct messaging by following the instructions you receive to stop messages, typically by replying STOP to any message received.
Live Chat with Customer Care Team
If You use the live chat feature on our Website, we will collect certain information from You such as Your name, email address, and information about why You are chatting with us. We only collect this information in order to communication with You, address why You are chatting with us, and ensure that You have a great customer experience. Please note that we may use automated means, such as chat bots and other generative artificial technologies to communicate with you via our live chat. The information collected through the live chat is shared with the third party operator of the chat in accordance with this Policy.
Contact via Email
If You contact us via email, we will collect certain Personal Information from You, such as Your name, e-mail address, and any information You provide in the email such as why You are contacting us. We may need to request additional Personal Information from You or further contract You in response to any email that You send to us. We only collect this information to address why You are emailing us and to respond to that communication.
Information Collected from or about You from our App and Gardyn Smart Assistant Kelby
If You download our App, You will not only have access to all of our App features and if You have a Gardyn membership, also to Your own Gardyn smart assistant Kelby. Our App connects directly to our Products and will allow You to control Your Product(s) remotely. Our App will collect Your Personal Information, such as Your name, IP Address, home address, and email address. It will also collect information about the device that You are accessing the App from, such as its make, model and operating system.
If You have a Gardyn Membership and are using our App, You are automatically signed up to use Kelby. If you do not want to use Kelby, you can disable this feature through the App or by calling Customer Support immediately upon purchasing your membership to terminate Kelby. If you wish to terminate membership after 72 hours after device pairing, you will not receive a refund absent good cause. If You use the smart assistant Kelby, it will have access to all of the information collected via our App and our Products to analyze the relevant data and make suggestions based on the same. Kelby will contact You via messages from the App which provide tips, alerts, and personalized guidance for Your use of our Products.
Information Collected from or about You from our Products
When You purchase and register one of our Products, we will collect Your Personal Information, such as your name, email address, physical address, and, if you choose to provide it to us, certain demographic information, such as your age, gender, and income level. Additionally, our Products require access to the Internet to operate properly, and thus, we will also collect Your IP Address and geolocation.
Product Cameras
Gardyn devices contain cameras which are used to help support the growth of the plants and also provide important information about the health and progress of the plants that our Products are growing. The cameras collect the location of the Product, humidity, temperature, and lighting information. The focal length of the cameras is 12 inches, and outside of that length, all images are blurred. The default settings on the device provide for the cameras to be turned on and capture still photographs of the plants to support their growth and development. The cameras do not record videos or any sound, and there are no microphones included on any of our Products.
Depending on where You place our Product, it is possible that these cameras may capture certain Personal Information such as pictures of You and Your family, the inside of Your home, and other information. We do not intend to capture this information, and we recommend that our Product be placed in a location that will avoid unintentional capture of personal or sensitive photos.
You can access the latest picture taken by your device on your Gardyn app. We recommend that You do so as soon as You first set up the Product and if you reposition or move the Product, to ensure that it is not capturing any unintended images. If You realize that the cameras are capturing images that You do not want them to capture, You should move the Product to a different location as soon as possible to avoid any further image capture and call Customer Support to request deletion of the images. If it is not possible to move the Product to avoid capturing such images, then You can disable the cameras at any time by putting the privacy sticker over the camera or going to the settings section of our App. The photos are processed by our proprietary artificial intelligence to gather information about the plants, and we do not process or store any of Your biometric information, including facial geometry, that might be inadvertently captured by the camera. Gardyn is not responsible for any image or information that the cameras may capture inadvertently.
While the cameras are enabled and taking pictures, they are stored both in the App and in our systems as well in order to support the functioning of the Product and our customer support services. We store these images for as long as needed to support the growth of the plants. As noted above, You can also delete these images at any time bycalling Customer Support. We never post a photo on our website or social media that has been captured from the device without your explicit consent.
Information Collected from or about You from Third Party Payment Processors
Gardyn utilizes third-party payment processors to collect and process Your payment for our Products. We may use a variety of third parties to facilitate our payments, such asAmazon and PayPal. These companies will collect Your Personal Information directly to complete the sale and provide us with confirmation that the payment has been processed so we can finalize Your order. You can learn more about their privacy practices here:
Amazon
https://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=GX7NJQ4ZB8MHFRNJ
PayPal
https://www.paypal.com/us/legalhub/privacy-full
Affirm
Gardyn works with Affirm to provide You with the ability to make easy monthly payments over 6, 12, or 24 months to pay for our Products instead of having to pay the entire balance all at once. Affirm will need to collect Your Personal Information in order to determine Your eligibility for their payment program, and they will only share with us Your acceptance and payment schedule. You can learn more about Affirm’s privacy practices here:
https://www.affirm.com/privacy
.
Information Collected from or about You from Social Media
Customer Generated Content
We may collect Personal Information from content that You create and then share with us (and perhaps others), with your consent, by uploading it to our Website, such as from our Facebook fan pages or other related applications. Such Personal Information may include photos, videos, personal stories, or other similar media or content. This information may be considered or reveal Sensitive Personal Information as it could reveal Your race and gender, and depending on the type of content, could also potentially reveal political opinion and health information. Generally, such customer-generated content is collected from the third-party website’s community features, customer engagement information, and other social networking information.
Directly from Your Social Media Account
If You have consented on a third-party social media site to sharing Your Personal Information with other third-parties, then we may collect Your Personal Information that is part of Your profile or that You post publicly. Examples may include Your basic account information (e.g., name, email address, profile picture, gender, birthday, current city, user ID, list of friends, etc.) and any other additional information or activities that You permit the third-party social network to share with application developers or that You post publicly on our social networking page. For example, we may receive Your social network information (or parts of it) when You download or interact with a Gardyn Application on a social networking site (such as Facebook) or use a third party social networking feature that is integrated within our Website (such as Facebook Connect). This is Personal Information that is shared with us, and You should consult the third-party social media site that You use for more information on how they collect Your Personal Information and how to opt out of such collection and otherwise exercise Your rights.
Information Collected about You from Third Parties
Occasionally, we may obtain information about You from third-parties, such as a data aggregator or vendor to provide us with additional information about our existing Customers (this is known as “data appending”), which may include information from Your Gardyn Account profile or Your postings on a third-party social network. We may also receive information from third-party co-sponsors who we may partner with occasionally to run special promotions or giveaways and about Customers from other companies that we may acquire.
We may also receive information about You from Rakuten Advertising (“Rakuten”), which may collect Personal Information from You when You use their services and when You interact with their digital property. This information may include Your address digital identifiers, information about Your web browsing and app usage, and how You interact with Rakuten’s properties and ads for a variety of purposes, such as personalization of offers or advertisements, analytics about how You engage with websites or ads and other commercial purposes. For more information about Rakuten’s data collection and privacy practices, please review their privacy policy here: https://rakutenadvertising.com/legal-notices/services-privacy-policy/  and for information on how to exercise Your privacy rights with Rakuten, please click here:
https://rakutenadvertising.com/legal-notices/services-privacy-rights-request-form/
.
Customer Surveys and Feedback Forms
We may ask You to voluntarily share with us  comments about and aspects of Your experience in using our Products or services, including our Website, via customer surveys online and feedback forms that we may e-mail or mail to You. We may also collect comments and suggestions about our products and Website, testimonials, or other feedback You send us about what You may have liked (or disliked) about Your experience in using our products or services.
Gardyn Referral Program
Gardyn’s Referral Program provides rewards to Gardyn Customers who refer their friends to Gardyn for purchases. If You were referred by one of Your friends via this program, we did not receive Your information directly from the person that referred You, but instead will collect Your Personal Information if You decide to make a purchase. We will know that You have been referred because of the unique referral link that Your friend has provided to You or via the gift card information You provide to us. Thus, in addition to Your Personal Information collected as part of the normal course of purchasing our Products, we will also have collected the referral code which will associate You with the person that referred You.
Third-Party Devices
Gardyn may provide services that are specifically designed to be compatible with and used on third-party devices, such as mobile phones, smart TVs, and tablets. Gardyn will collect certain information that your device sends when you use such services, like a device identifier, user settings, location information, carrier, and the operating system of your device. Gardyn may enable you to download an application, widget, or other tools that can be used on mobile, tablet, or other devices. Some of these tools may store information on your devices. These tools may transmit personal information to Gardyn to enable you to access accounts and to enable Gardyn to track the use of these tools.
Why We Collect Your Information
We collect Your Personal Information and Sensitive Personal Information for various reasons, which are described below:
To Service Our Websites
We use information collected to ensure that our Website and App are working as intended and for analytics purposes, to understand how our Website and App are operating and learn how they can be improved. We also use this information as needed for auditing purposes as well.
To Fulfill Your Order and Provide Our Products to You and Facilitate any Exchanges and Returns
We use information collected to process and ship Your order(s), to inform You about the status of Your order(s), facilitate any exchanges or returns, and to follow up with You about Your satisfaction with the ordered products. We offer a 2-year warranty for new Products and if you purchased a used Product, the warranty will expire as of the date the original purchaser bought the Product.
To Maintain Your Account
We may use information collected to maintain Your accounts with us, including administering any programs associated with such accounts.
To Make Personalized Product Recommendations to You
We may use information collected to provide You with Gardyn product recommendations, offers, and rewards that are tailored to Your interests and profile.
For Our Marketing Purposes
If You have filled out a contact form with us, signed up to receive our alerts, or have otherwise signed up to receive our direct communications, we may use this information to send You marketing communications, such as email communications, mobile messages (including text and/or push notifications), and postal mailings. These communications may inform You about new products, special discounts and coupons, gardening tips, food information and recipes, and other news and special offers. On occasion, these communications may also contain information or offers about third-party products. In some instances (such as for mobile messages), we may use technical information or precise geolocation information obtained from Your mobile device to send You messages directly to Your mobile device, including offers and coupons based on Your location.
We may also use collected information to show You ads that are targeted to reach people (or people similar to people) who have visited our website or are identified in one or more of our databases (“Matched Ads”), including Gardyn ads on our sites or on other sites. This is done by Gardyn uploading a customer list to the third-party ad network or incorporating a pixel from the third-party ad network on our website, and the third-party ad network matching common factors between our data and their data. Some of these ads may try to entice You to come back and revisit our site for new offers and promotions. This type of advertising typically involves an ad network collecting and tracking certain technical information (such as Your IP address) and website usage information (such as Your browsing history) on our sites and across many other sites on the Internet.
To Evaluate and Improve our Customer Service
We may use this information to ensure we are providing the highest level of customer service, and to identify any potential gaps or potential improvements to the same. Customer service may be provided through various forms of communication, such as email correspondence and call center support.
To Evaluate, Improve, and Customize Our Products
We may use information collected to improve our Products, tailor them to Your needs, and come up with new product ideas.
To Administer Contest and Promotions
We may use information collected to administer a contest, sweepstakes, giveaway, competition, or other similar marketing campaign or promotion. To comply with sweepstakes laws, we may publish or share limited information about promotion winners (such as name and city of residence). For more information about our contests and other promotions, please see the official rules or details that will be posted with each promotion.
In Order to Respond from Requests from You
If You have requested further information or in any other way requested that we contact You, we will use Your Personal Information to respond to such a request.
To Provide a Personalized and Convenient Website Experience for You
We may use information collected to personalize Your experience and save You time when You visit our App or Website. For example, we might remember Your login ID or username so You can quickly login the next time You visit our App or so You can easily retrieve the items You previously placed in Your shopping cart. Based on this type of information, we might also show You specific Gardyn content or offers that are more relevant to Your interests.
To facilitate and enable Your Interactions with Third-party Social Media Providers
We may use information collected to support and run promotions, to allow You to share content (such as pictures of Your plants or recipes, articles, stories, etc.), and to allow You to sign up for certain Gardyn accounts, or for other stated purposes as disclosed via the relevant advertisement or promotion.
For Our Other General Purposes
We may use information collected other general business purposes, such as to maintain the day-to-day operation and security of our Website and App, and to conduct internal marketing and demographic studies.
For Our Legal Purposes
We also collect information in order to comply with certain legal rules and regulations that we are subject to.
How do we Secure and Protect Your Personal Information
Gardyn maintains a comprehensive Information Security Program that employs commercially available physical and IT securitization tools, including but not limited to:
Commercially available and sufficient firewalls;
Segmented Data Storage;
Encryption;
Multi-factor authentication;
Secure Socket Layer (SSL) software and similar encrypting systems to protect your information on our Website; and
Policies providing for least privileged access to data across our organization.
Unfortunately, however, there is no way to completely eliminate the risk of a data security incident. If we do suffer one that affects any of Your Personal Information, we will report the same to You as per applicable data breach notification laws.
We also ask that You do Your part to keep Your account information safe and secure, by asking that You create a sufficiently complex password for Your account and not share it with third parties, as outlined in our
Terms and Conditions
. If You have any questions about the cybersecurity for our Website, You can send an email to
support@mygardyn.com
.
How Long do We Store and Maintain Your Personal Information?
We only store and maintain Your Personal Information for as long as is necessary to fulfill the purpose for which it was collected. For example, if You sign up to receive our newsletters or on LinkedIn to receive job alerts, we will store and maintain Your Personal Information to continue to send You these materials until You opt out of receiving such communications. With regards to Your Personal Information collected for our analytics purposes and used to help maintain and improve our Website and App, we only store and maintain that information until it is aggregated and used to create a new anonymous data set that no longer contains Your Personal Information, and then delete the underlying Personal Information once that new data set has been created. If You are one of our valued Customers and have created an account with us, we store Your Information as long as Your account remains active, and then delete it when You delete the account, with the exception of any information that we are legally required to maintain longer. If You are a Customer and You do not have an account, we only store Your information as long as needed to support Your purchase and relationship with us. When we no longer have a legal need, or You close or delete Your account with us, or otherwise ask us to delete Your account, we will do so securely in accordance with our document retention policy.
We Do Not Sell Your Personal Information
Gardyn does not sell Your Personal Information that it has collected via our Website and App to any third parties. We do not sell Your Sensitive Personal Information to any third parties and only use Your Sensitive Personal Information to provide our products and services to You.
We do share Your Personal Information for cross-contextual advertising and You can opt out of the same by clicking the opt out link included in each email we send.
Who We Share Your Personal Information With
Generally, we share Your Personal Information as necessary to provide the services or Products that You request, including sharing information with certain third parties, such as service providers. We also may share Your Personal Information when required by law; to protect Your rights and safety, and with Your consent.
Specifically, we may share Your Personal Information with third parties, including:
Authorized service providers:
We may share Your Personal Information with our authorized service providers that perform certain services on our behalf. These services may include relationship management software; website hosting; evaluators, contractors and auditors; email marketing providers; customer service providers (including live chat operators); providers that perform business and operations analysis for us; and providers that support and maintain our Website and App, including providing analytics services for us.
Payment Processors:
As noted above, we need to share Your Personal Information and Your Sensitive Personal Information with our third-party payment processor in order to complete Your purchases. Generally, our payment processors collect this information from You directly, but we may also have to share certain Personal Information with them in order to facilitate the completion of the payment. Please see section IX for more information. You may also be able to store Your payment information with these providers via Your profile with us. We do not store any of Your financial information directly and any such storage or remembering of the same will be facilitated by our third-party payment processor.
Our Advertising Partners:
We may also allow third parties through an advertising network to target custom content and ads to You on our Website and App, and other websites. The information provided to these service providers is limited to only that which we deem appropriate for these service providers to carry out their functions, such as offering You certain promotions or customizing certain advertisements for You, and to enable Gardyn to market to You.
For a Legal Reason:
We may have to share Your Personal Information in response to a subpoena or similar investigative demand, a court order, or a request for cooperation from a law enforcement or other government agency; to establish or exercise our legal rights; to defend against legal claims; or as otherwise required by law. In such cases, we may raise or waive any legal objection or right available to us.
To Prevent Fraud or Illegal Conduct:
We may have to share Your Personal Information in situations where we believe disclosure is appropriate in connection with efforts to investigate, prevent, or take other action regarding illegal activity, suspected fraud or other wrongdoing; to protect and defend the rights, property, or safety of our company, our consumers, our employees, or others; or to enforce our Terms of Service or other agreements or policies.
For Corporate Reasons:
We may also share Your Personal Information as part of a sale, merger, or change in control or ownership of Gardyn or our Parent Company, or in the unlikely event of bankruptcy, or in preparation for any of these events. If such an event should happen, the new entity would have the right to continue to use Your information, but only in the manner that is set out in this Policy, unless You otherwise agree.
With Your Consent:
To other third parties that You provide consent to share Your information with or that You have requested that we share Your information with.
California Residents Legal Notice
Categories of Personal Information that we collect:
Categories of Personal Information
Categories of Sources of This Information
Identifiers (i.e., a legal name, nickname, physical home address, internet protocol address, email address, phone number, an online identifier, driver’s license number, etc.)
Information You provide directly to us or collected from our Website.
Biometric Information (i.e. photographs and video)
Information that may be  collected by our Website or that You provide directly to us. The App does not have a biometric lock feature.
Internet Activity (i.e., browsing history, WiFi use, and internet search history)
Information You provide directly to us, collected from You from our data analytics providers, or allow us to collect and use from Your devices.
Geolocation Data (i.e. data describing Your current and past whereabouts)
Information You provide directly to us or is collected from Your use of our Website.
Financial Information (i.e., Your payment information).
Information You provide directly to us or is collected when You purchase our products on our Website.
Other Sensitive Personal Information (i.e., Your race, and potentially Your sexual orientation information)
Information You provide directly to us or is collected in connection with a sale of our products on our Website.
Sale or sharing of the Personal Information and Sensitive Personal Information of Persons under the age of 16
Our website and products are not made for, marketed to, or directed at, children under the age of 16 years of age. While we do have programs available for schools and educators, these offerings are meant for the schools and educators directly and are not marketed to or directed at children. We do not sell or share the Personal Information of persons under 16 years of age.
Use and Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information
We do not use or disclose Your Sensitive Personal Information for any other purpose other than to perform business services, including to provide our Products and services to You.
Sale or sharing of Your Personal Information for Our Business Purposes
As noted above, we do not generally sell Your Personal Information. We do utilize Google Analytics as noted above, which can be considered a sale under California law, and thus would be the only way in which we “sell” your information.
We do need to share Your Personal Information with third parties for our business purposes, as noted above.
We do share Your Personal Information for cross-contextual advertising and You can opt out of the same by clicking the opt out link included in each email we send.
The categories of third parties that we need to share Your Personal Information with and the Categories of Personal Information that we share with those parties are:
Categories of Third Parties
Categories of Personal Information Shared with the Third Party
Our service providers in order to facilitate Your purchase of our products.
Identifiers, Geolocation Data, Internet Information, and Financial Information.
Data Service Providers
We do not share Your Personal Information or Sensitive Personal Information directly with these providers, but they may receive records that may contain Identifiers, Geolocation Data, Biometric Information, Internet Information, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
Legal Representatives
Depending on the need, we may need to share Your Identifiers, Geolocation Data, Biometric Information, Internet Information, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
IT Service Providers
Identifiers, Geolocation Data, and Internet Information.
Law Enforcement, Courts, or other related Legal third parties that are not our legal representatives
Depending on the need and related law, we may need to share Your Identifiers, Geolocation Data, Biometric Information, Internet Information, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
Auditors
Depending on the need, we may need to share Your Identifiers, Geolocation Data,  Biometric Information, Internet Information, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
Accounting Representatives
Depending on the need, we may need to share Your Identifiers, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
Why We Collect this information from You
We use this information from You to provide our services and offer our products to You and for our business purposes as outlined above in Section XII.
Categories of Our Business Purposes that are used to Share Your Personal Information:
As noted above, we share Your Personal Information and Sensitive Personal Information as needed in order to provide our services and products to You and for our business purposes. Specifically, these categories of business purposes are:
Auditing:
We may share this information with our third-party vendors, partners and service providers, and our own auditors related to an audit of our business.
Service Improvements:
We may share this information with our third-party vendors, other partners, and service providers in order to improve our services and products, create new services and products, offer new products, and to ensure that our Website is working as intended (to identify bugs and errors, and repair them).
Service Partners:
We may share this information with our third-party vendors, other partners, and service providers in order to have them perform their services for us, pursuant to a written contract that includes the notified purposes permitted by the CPRA.
Security and Legal Issues:
We may share this information with law enforcement or other individuals pursuant to a valid subpoena or other legal obligation, our third-party vendors, other partners, and service providers in order to detect, prevent, and investigate security incidents.
Notice of Financial Incentive for Promotions
Overview
From time to time, we may offer certain promotions both on our Website, and also at our in-person events. These promotions will vary and may include free samples of our products, free make-overs or trying on of our products, and other promotional giveaways. You can also sign-up to receive discounts and coupon codes from us on our Website as well. We are excited to offer these services to our Customers and potential Customers like You. All You have to do is follow the included instructions for the offered promotion.
What You Are Agreeing To
If You choose to participate in one of our promotions, You are agreeing to provide us with some of Your personal information (such as Your name, email address and possibly home address) and depending on the promotion, possibly also Your Sensitive Personal Information (such as Your gender, race, and possibly sexual orientation). You will also be given the opportunity to sign up to receive marketing and other communications from us.
How You Can Opt Out
You can opt out of our communications and marketing emails at any time, by clicking the opt out link included in each email we send.
The Relationship between our Promotions and Your Information
With regards to promotions that offer discounts to You in exchange for You signing up to receive our communications, including marketing communications. Because our discounts involve the collection of Personal Information, they might be interpreted as a “financial incentive” program under California law. The value of your personal information to us is related to the value of the free or discounted products or services, or other benefits that You obtain or that are provided as part of the applicable promotion, less the expense related to offering those products, services, and benefits to promotion participants.
Your Rights under the CCPA
You, or Your authorized agent, can request the specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected about You by emailing
privacy@mygardyn.com
. You can also request that we disclose how we have collected, used and shared Your personal information over the past 12 months, including the categories of personal information we collected and our purposes for doing so. You may also request the categories of the sources of that information, the categories of the third parties with whom we have shared this information with for a business purpose, and our business purpose for doing so.
You have the right to correct inaccurate Personal Information that we have collected or maintain about You. In fact, we ask that You do so as soon as You realize any Personal Information that we have collected is inaccurate as it could impact our provision of the services.
You have the right to opt out of Sale of Your Information, but as noted above, we do not sell Your information.
You have a right to be notified when we collect information from You, and we cannot collect new categories of information from You without notifying You first.
You have the right to limit our sharing of Your Personal Information.
You have the right to not be discriminated against for exercising these rights.
You have the right to ask us to delete Your Personal Information.
How to Exercise Your Rights
If You would like to exercise any of the rights listed above with regards to Your Personal Information, then please contact us, or have Your registered agent contact us, at
privacy@mygardyn.com
.
If You want to review and request changes to Your Personal Information, You may also email or call us as noted below, and we will then provide You with detailed instructions on how to do so.
Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (“VCDPA”) and Colorado Privacy Act (“CPA”) Privacy Notice
Categories of Personal Information that we process:
Categories of Personal Data
Identifiers (i.e., a legal name, nickname, physical home address, internet protocol address, email address, phone number, an online identifier, driver’s license number, etc.)
Biometric Information (i.e. photographs, and video)
Internet Activity (i.e., browsing history, WiFi use, and internet search history)
Geolocation Data (i.e. data describing Your current and past whereabouts)
Financial Information (i.e., Your payment information).
Other Sensitive Personal Information (i.e., Your race, and potentially Your sexual orientation information)
Purposes for Processing Your Personal Data
We Your Personal Data to provide our services and products to You and for our business purposes as described above.
Categories of Third Parties that we share Your Personal Data with and the Categories of Data that we share with them
Categories of Third Parties
Categories of Personal Information Shared with the Third Party
Our service providers in order to facilitate Your purchase of our products.
Identifiers, Geolocation Data, Internet Information, and Financial Information.
Data Service Providers
We do not share Your Personal Information or Sensitive Personal Information directly with these providers, but they may receive records that may contain Identifiers, Geolocation Data, Biometric Information, Internet Information, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
Legal Representatives
Depending on the need, we may need to share Your Identifiers, Geolocation Data, Biometric Information, Internet Information, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
IT Service Providers
Identifiers, Geolocation Data, and Internet Information.
Law Enforcement, Courts, or other related Legal third parties that are not our legal representatives
Depending on the need and related law, we may need to share Your Identifiers, Geolocation Data, Biometric Information, Internet Information, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
Auditors
Depending on the need, we may need to share Your Identifiers, Geolocation Data,  Biometric Information, Internet Information, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
Accounting Representatives
Depending on the need, we may need to share Your Identifiers, Financial Information, and Other Sensitive Personal Information.
We do not sell Your Personal Data for Targeted Advertising
How to Exercise Your Privacy Rights under the VCDPA and the CPA
If You would like to exercise any of Your rights under VCDPA and the CPA, then please contact us at
privacy@mygardyn.com
.
You can opt out of our communications and marketing emails at any time, by clicking the opt out link included in each email we send.
Connecticut Data Privacy Act (CTDPA) Privacy Notice
Categories of Personal Information that we process:
Categories of Personal Data
Identifiers (i.e., a legal name, nickname, physical home address, internet protocol address, email address, phone number, an online identifier, driver’s license number, etc.)
Biometric Information (i.e. photographs, and video)
Internet Activity (i.e., browsing history, WiFi use, and internet search history)
Geolocation Data (i.e. data describing Your current and past whereabouts)
Financial Information (i.e., Your payment information).
Other Sensitive Personal Information (i.e., Your race, and potentially Your sexual orientation information)
Purposes for Processing Your Personal Data
We Your Personal Data to provide our services and products to You and for our business purposes as described above.
Categories of Third Parties that we share Your Personal Data with and the Categories of Data that we share with them
Categories of Personal Data
Identifiers (i.e., a legal name, nickname, physical home address, internet protocol address, email address, phone number, an online identifier, driver’s license number, etc.)
Biometric Information (i.e. photographs, and video)
Internet Activity (i.e., browsing history, WiFi use, and internet search history)
Geolocation Data (i.e. data describing Your current and past whereabouts)
Financial Information (i.e., Your payment information).
Other Sensitive Personal Information (i.e., Your race, and potentially Your sexual orientation information)
How to Exercise Your Privacy Rights under the CTDPA
If You would like to exercise any of Your rights under CTDPA or have your designated agent access your rights for you, then please contact us at
privacy@mygardyn.com
.
You can opt out of our communications and marketing emails at any time, by clicking the opt out link included in each email we send.
We will respond to your request without undue delay and generally within 45 days of receiving the request. If we need to extent the response period, we will inform you of the need for such an extension and the reasons why we need to extend. If we deny your request, you will have the right to appeal as noted below. We will also include these instructions on how to appeal with any denial of your request.
How to Appeal a Denial of Your Request under the CTDPA
If we have denied your request under the CTDPA, you have the right to appeal our decision. In order to appeal, please email us at
privacy@mygardyn.com
and in the subject line list your reference number and the word “appeal.” In the body of the email, please state the reasons why you are appealing and any additional information that we should consider that was not presented or you feel wasn’t properly considered with the initial request. We will respond to your appeal via email to the same email address within 60 days from our receipt of your appeal.
If we deny your appeal, you can choose to submit a compliant to the Connecticut Attorney General regarding such denial.
Children’s Personal Information
Our website and products are not made for, marketed to or directed at children under the age of 16 years of age. We do not sell the Personal Information of persons under 16 years of age. In the event that we learn that the Personal Information of a person under 16 years of age has been collected, we will delete it immediately from our system.
Nevada Privacy Rights
We do not sell, rent, or otherwise share Your data to any third party in exchange for monetary or other valuable consideration under any circumstances unless You specifically consent to such disclosure. Pursuant to Section 603A of the Nevada Revised Statutes, residents of Nevada may, at any time, submit a request to an operator of a website in Nevada directing the operator not to make any sale of any personal information the operator has collected or will collect about the consumer. If You are a Nevada resident and want to opt-out of the sale of any personal information, please submit an email request to
privacy@mygardyn.com
. In Your request, please specify that You want to “Opt-Out of Sale of Personal Information in Nevada.” Please allow 60 days for a response.
California Shine the Light Law
Pursuant to Section 1798.83 of the California Civil Code, residents of California have the right to request from a business, with whom the California resident has an established business relationship, certain information with respect to the types of Personal Information the business shares with third parties for direct marketing purposes by such third party and the identities of the third parties with whom the business has shared such information during the immediately preceding calendar year. However, we do not sell, rent, or otherwise share Your data to any third party in exchange for monetary or other valuable consideration under any circumstances. If You are a California resident and want a copy of this notice, please submit an email request to
privacy@mygardyn.com
. In Your request, please specify that You want a “Your Gardyn California Privacy Rights Notice.” Please allow 30 days for a response.
If You are a minor under 18 but older than 16 years of age and have a profile on our Website or App, You may ask us to remove reviews or other content that You posted on the site by writing to
privacy@mygardyn.com
and to Gardyn, 8120 Woodmont Avenue #640, Bethesda, MD 20814. We will begin to process Your request within 30 days. Please note that processing Your request does not ensure complete or comprehensive removal of content that You posted.
Third-Party Tracking on Our Website
Third-parties may be using Cookies or other technologies to collect Your personal information as You navigate through the internet including from Our Website. As described above, You may decline these third-party Cookies by changing Your browser settings.
Third Party Applications and Sites
Our Website and App may provide links to, or features from, other third party sites (such as third party social networks) that we do not own or control. Although we choose our business partners carefully, when You visit these third-party sites and decide to share Your Personal Information with them, You are assuming the risk of doing so. Gardyn is not responsible for nor assumes any liability for the privacy practices of websites operated by any third parties, including those that may be linked to our Website and App, and including the content of those sites. You should check the applicable privacy notice and/or policy of the third-party website or application to understand how it collects and manages any information they collect from You.
As noted in our
Terms and Conditions
, Gardyn does not endorse or control any other websites or applications besides Our Website and App, nor does the act of providing a link to a third party website or application constitute an endorsement, promotion or approval of such website or application.
How to Opt Out of Receiving Our Communications
You can always opt-out from receiving marketing communications by following the unsubscribe instructions provided in each communication. If You have an online account with us, You may be given the option to change some of Your communication preferences under the relevant “My Account” section of our site or by contacting our  Customer Service team. Please note that even if You opt-out from receiving marketing communications, You may still receive other communications from us, such as order confirmations, notifications about account activities (e.g., account confirmations, password changes, website community postings, etc.), and other important announcements (e.g., product recalls, privacy policy changes, etc.).
You can opt out of our communications and marketing emails at any time, by clicking the opt out link included in each email we send.
Additionally, Gardyn may occasionally send you push notifications through our apps with updates, achievements, and other notices that may be of interest to you. You may at any time opt out from receiving these notifications by changing the settings on Your device.
Do Not Track (“DNT”) Settings
DNT is a setting on some web browsers or mobile devices that can be turned on to instruct websites to disable tracking of Your web browsing activities. DNT is not currently widely adopted and does not have clear standards or guidelines for how websites are to interpret it. Additionally, its signals can affect the functioning of certain websites. As such, Gardyn does not generally respond to these signals. To research enabling other privacy controls, please find information here:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/
.
Changes to this Policy
Any changes to the Policy will be posted directly on our Website and reflected with a new Effective Date at the top of this Policy. We encourage You to review the Policy each time You visit our Website to see if it has been updated since Your last visit.
Contact Us
If You have any questions or concerns about this Policy, please email Us at:
privacy@mygardyn.com
.
It's never been easier to get growing
Risk-free 60 day trial
Free rapid shipping
2 year limited warranty
Get growing now, pay later with Affirm
No products in the cart.
Close dialog
Want
$25 OFF
your Gardyn?
YES
NO THANKS
Sub-policy 8
https://maestra.io/documents/privacy-policy/:
Privacy & Legal
Privacy Policy
Last updated: 18.11.2024, Version 3.0
This Privacy Policy explains how information about you is collected, used and disclosed by Mindbox USA LLC (collectively, “
Maestra
,” “
we
” or “
us
”) when you use our website
maestra.io
(“
Website
”), online marketing automation platform services (“
Platform
”) (collectively, “
Services
”), or when you otherwise interact with us. This Privacy Policy also describes your choices regarding use, access and correction of personal information collected about you through our Services. Please read this Privacy Policy carefully and ensure that you understand it before you start to use our Services.
This Website is owned and operated by, or on behalf of, Maestra.
By accessing and using the Services, you acknowledge that you have read and understood the content of this Privacy Policy. We reserve the right to update this Privacy Policy from time to time. If we make changes, we will notify you by revising the date at the top of the Privacy Policy and, in some cases, we may provide you with additional notice (such as adding a statement to our homepage or sending you a notification). We encourage you to review the Privacy Policy whenever you access the Services or otherwise interact with us to stay informed about our information practices and the ways you can help protect your privacy.
Information you provide to us through the services
We collect and process the information you provide directly to us via the Services. Personal data submitted through the Services include the details you submit when you use our Website, Platform, fill out a form, request customer support or otherwise communicate with us. The types of information we may collect include your name, email address, company name, phone number and any other information you choose to provide.
Information we collect automatically when you use the services
When you access or use the Services, we automatically collect information about you, including:
Log Files: We gather certain information about your use of the Services, including the type of browser you use, access times, pages viewed, your IP address and the page you visited before navigating to the Services, and store it in log files. We do not monitor or log data collected from your servers when using the Services, but we may log or monitor information about your access to our Services.
Information Collected by Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies: We use various technologies to collect information, including cookies and web beacons. For more information about cookies, and how to disable them, please see our Cookie Policy page
here
.
Information we collect from other sources
We may also obtain information from other sources and combine that with information we collect through our Services for purposes of advertising and user authentication.
Use of information
We may use information about you to:
Enable you to have full access to the Services;
Provide, maintain and improve the Services;
Provide and deliver the products and services you request, process transactions and send you related information, including confirmations and invoices;
Send you technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
Respond to your comments, questions and requests, and provide customer support;
Create your Maestra account and identify you when you sign in to your account in accordance with your agreement with us
Communicate with you about products, services, offers, promotions, rewards, and events offered by Maestra and others, and provide news and information we think will be of interest to you;
Monitor and analyze trends, usage and activities in connection with the Services;
Detect, investigate and prevent fraud and other illegal activities and protect the rights and property of Maestra and others;
Personalize and improve the Services and provide advertisements, content or features that match user profiles or interests;
Notify you about important changes to the Services, including changes or updates to this Privacy Policy;
Link or combine with information we get from others to help understand your needs, and provide you with better service; and
Carry out any other purpose described to you at the time the information was collected.
Sharing of information
We may share your personal information as follows or as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy:
With vendors, consultants and other service providers we have vetted and approved who need access to such information to carry out work on our behalf. This includes companies providing the following services for our Website and/or Platform: hosting services, authentication services, cyber security and anti-fraud services, and advertising;
In response to a request for information if we believe disclosure is permitted by, in accordance with, or required by, any applicable law, regulation or legal process such as to comply with a subpoena or applicable court order;
With any person to whom disclosure is necessary to enable us to enforce our rights under this Privacy Policy or under any agreement we enter into with you or to protect the rights, property and safety of Maestra or third parties;
In connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of Maestra assets, financing or acquisition of all or a portion of our business by another company;
Between and among Maestra and all companies affiliated with Maestra who may act for us for any of the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy, including our current and future parents, affiliates, subsidiaries and other companies under common control and ownership;
With analytics and search engine providers that assist us in the improvement and optimization of our Website, subject to our Cookies Policy; and
With your consent or at your direction.
We may also share aggregated or de-identified information, which cannot reasonably be used to identify you.
Sale of personal information
If you are a resident of the state of California, you have the right to know whether your personal information is being sold. Your personal information is sold when it is shared with a third party for monetary or other valuable consideration for a purpose that is not a “business purpose” as set forth in the CCPA.
We do not sell your personal information. While we do not sell any personal information, we can provide information to partners to enable us to provide you with the interest-based advertising and communications with you. If you prefer not to receive interest-based advertising, you can opt-out or opt-in via
support@maestra.io
.
We share your personal information with:
Meta Platforms Inc. (Facebook), the U.S.
Privacy notice
. Personal information: email, phone number. Purpose: targeting advertising. The processing period: until the purpose is reached or consent is withdrawn.
LinkedIn Corporation, the U.S.
Privacy notice
. Personal information shared: email, phone number. Purpose: targeting advertising. The processing period: until the purpose is reached or consent is withdrawn.
Pipedrive Inc., the U.S.
Privacy notice
. Personal information shared: name, company, email, phone number. Purpose: storing customer databases for sales and marketing purposes, communications. The processing period: until the purpose is reached or consent is withdrawn.
Maestra B.V., the Netherlands.
Privacy notice
. Personal information shared: name, company, email, phone number. Purpose: storing customer database for sales and marketing purposes, communications. The processing period: until the purpose is reached or consent is withdrawn.
HubSpot Inc., the U.S.
Privacy policy
. Personal information shared: name, company, email, phone number. Purpose: storing customer databases for sales and marketing purposes, communications. The processing period: until the purpose is reached or consent is withdrawn.
Infobip, United Kingdom.
Privacy policy
. Personal information: first and last name, email address, physical address, phone number, or other information. Purpose: provide global mobile messaging and infrastructure services.
DO NOT TRACK DISCLOSURE
Do Not Track (DNT) is a feature that users can enable on website browsers to request that websites and ad companies don’t track their web browsing activities.
If you are a resident of the state of California, you have the right to know whether or not our website complies with Do Not Track requests.
Our website honors your Do Not Track requests. The third-party partners might not honor Do Not Track requests.
Lawful basis for processing your information
We are required to state the lawful basis under which we process the personal data of our users. Accordingly, the lawful bases upon which we process your personal information are as follows:
Where it is necessary to obtain your prior consent to the processing concerned in order for us to be allowed to do it, for instance in relation to direct marketing, we will obtain and rely on your consent in relation to the processing concerned;
Otherwise, we will process your personal data only where the processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are a subject; or
For the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us in promoting our business, providing the Platform to our business customers pursuant to or legal agreements with them, and in ensuring the security, accessibility and improvement of our Website and Platform and the development of new technology and services.
When we ask your consent
If you request a planform demo, you provide us with your personal information, including your name, company, email and phone. We ask your consent to process your personal information when you fill in the form with your data.
We do not offer services intended for children
We provide services intended for companies (B2B). We do not offer services intended for children and do not process their personal information.
We do not collect your sensitive information
Sensitive information is personal data which includes, for instance, political affiliation, racial or ethnic information, sexual preferences, health data, biometric information, precise geolocations, religious or philosophical beliefs, union membership, identification numbers and other sensitive data.
We do not collect and use your sensitive data and therefore do not offer to limit the use of your sensitive personal information.
External links
The Website may, from time to time, contain links to external sites. If you follow a link to any of these websites, please note that these websites have their own privacy policies and that we do not accept any responsibility or liability for these policies. Please check these policies before you submit any personal data to these websites. We are not responsible for the privacy policies or the content of such websites.
Advertising and analytics services provided by others
We allow the following companies to serve advertisements on our behalf across the Internet and in applications: Google Analytics & Google Tag Manager, Facebook, LinkedIn, using email addresses and cookies that are collected. These entities use technologies including cookies, web beacons, device identifiers and other tools to collect information about your use of the Services and other websites and applications, including your IP address, web browser, pages viewed, time spent on pages or in apps, links clicked and conversion information. This information may be used by Maestra and Maestra service providers to, among other things, analyze and track data, determine the popularity of certain content, deliver advertising and content targeted to your interests in our Services and other websites and better understand your online activity. For more information about cookies, please see below. For further information about interest-based ads, or to opt out of having your web browsing information used for behavioral advertising purposes, please see Maestra’s Cookie Policy
here
.
Information collected on behalf of customers in providing our platform
In the case of personal information we handle or receive on behalf of a customer in connection with their access to, and use of, our Platform (“
Customer PI
”), we have no direct relationship with the customer’s employees or other individuals with whom that customer may interact with respect to the Platform. If you are such an employee or individual and are seeking access to, or would like to correct, amend or delete, Customer PI, you should direct your query to the applicable customer. We will respond within a reasonable timeframe to a customer’s request to remove Customer PI.
We will not use Customer PI except for the purpose of providing and supporting the Services for the applicable customer. Customer PI will be retained for as long as needed for that purpose and as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our agreements.
Marketing
Where permitted in our legitimate interest or with your prior consent where required by law, we will use your personal information for marketing and to provide you with promotional updates and communications by email about our products/services. You can object to further marketing at any time by selecting the “unsubscribe” link at the end of all our marketing and promotional electronic communications to you, or by contacting us using the contact details set out in the “Your Choices” and “Your Rights” sections of this Privacy Policy.
Security
We take reasonable steps, including physical, technical and organizational measures, to protect your personal information from unauthorized access and against unlawful processing, accidental loss, destruction and damage. Unfortunately, transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure. Although we do our best to protect your personal information, we cannot guarantee the security of your personal information submitted to us.
Your personal information will be retained by Maestra for the duration of your account and may be retained for a period after this time as necessary and relevant to our legitimate interests, our terms of agreement with you and in accordance with applicable legal obligations. This may include retention necessary to meet our tax reporting requirements as well as time required to enforce the relevant terms of agreement or to identify, issue or resolve legal proceedings.
We may retain a record of your stated objection to the processing of your data, including in respect of an objection to receiving marketing communications, for the sole legitimate purpose of ensuring that we can continue to respect your wishes and not contact you further, during the term of your objection.
Transfer of information to the U.S. and other countries
Maestra is based in the United States. By accessing or using the Services or otherwise providing information to us, you understand that your information will be subject to processing, transfer and storage in and to the U.S. and other countries where you may not have the same rights and protections as you do under local law.
Your choices
Account Information
Our customers may access, update or change personal information they have provided by logging into the Services or emailing us at
support@maestra.io
.
Subject to the terms of their agreements with us, Customers may deactivate their accounts by emailing us at
support@maestra.io
, but note that we may retain certain personal information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations or for legitimate business purposes, such as to resolve disputes or enforce our agreements. We may also retain cached or archived copies of personal information for a certain period of time.
If you are an individual with whom one of our customers interacts with respect to the Services (e.g., an employee of a customer), as noted above, you should direct any requests regarding access, modification or deletion of personal information to the applicable customer.
Cookies
Most web browsers are set to accept cookies by default. If you prefer, you can usually choose to set your browser to remove or reject browser cookies. Please note that if you choose to remove or reject cookies, this could affect the availability and functionality of our Services. For more information, please see Maestra’s Cookie Policy
here
.
Promotional Communications
You may opt out of receiving promotional emails from Maestra by following the instructions in those emails or by emailing
support@maestra.io
. If you opt out, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as those about your account or our ongoing business relations.
Your rights under CCPA and VCDPA
Under the CCPA, you have the right to know what personal information about you Maestra collected, used or shared; to delete your personal information; to correct inaccurate personal information; to limit use and disclosure of sensitive personal information (if applicable); to opt out of the sale of your personal information (if applicable); to non-discriminatory treatment for exercising any rights; to contact the competent local supervisory authority, to initiate a private cause of action for data breaches.
Under the VCPDA, you have the following rights: to know, access, confirm, delete, correct personal information; to obtain a copy of personal information in a portable and readily usable format; to opt out of the processing of personal information for targeted advertising, sale, profiling; to not be discriminated against for exercising any of the foregoing rights.
Contact us
If you have questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy or you have a request in relation to your personal information, please contact us at: Mindbox USA LLC,
support@maestra.io
.
We use functional cookies to make this website work properly and analytical- and tracking cookies to enhance your experience, to share content via social media and to tailor advertisements to your preferences.
Click here to read our cookie policy
and how you can manage your cookie settings.
OK
Disagree
Sub-policy 9
https://openai.com/privacy/:
Application error: a client-side exception has occurred (see the browser console for more information).
Sub-policy 10
https://qonversion.io/page/privacy:
Qonversion Privacy Policy
Updated September 1, 2023
Your privacy is important to us, and we are committed to protecting your personal data. We want you to feel confident when using the Qonversion service and comfortable with how your data is used.
✓ We are committed to being transparent about the information we collect, how we use it, and how you can control the collection, correction and/or deletion of the information.
✓ We believe that you should have control over the data you transmit to Qonversion. We will never share your data without your permission (unless required by law) and will provide you with a clear means to be able to delete your data from our systems.
✓ We believe that you own and will always own all data you upload to the Qonversion Service. We will never claim ownership rights to any of your data and only ask you to grant us the rights necessary to provide the service.
Qonversion is a Software as a Service platform that can be used by mobile app owners, mobile app developers, or anyone else (“you”, “your”, “customers”) who can be interested in the provided service. By using this service, you agree to allow us to collect and process information as described below. If you have any questions or believe that some data has been transmitted into Qonversion that should not have been, please contact us at
compliance@qonversion.io
✓ Log-in Information: If you create a Qonversion account, you provide your email address, name and create a password that we store so you can access and use the Qonversion service.
✓ Website Use Information: Subject to your opt-out preferences, we use tools (including Google Analytics) to collect information from visitors in order to better understand how they use our website (e.g., browser type, domains, page views). You may opt out of Google Analytics cookies using Opt-Out Features on their website. We use session cookies to keep you logged in while you use features of our web application; these disappear after you close your browser. We also use persistent cookies, which stay in your browser and allow us to recognize you when you return to the site. You can change your internet browser settings to stop accepting cookies or to prompt you before accepting a cookie from the websites you visit. If you turn off cookies, parts of the Qonversion service may not work for you.
✓ Team Account Information: If your User Account is linked to a Team Account, the administrator of the Team Account will be able to see your name, user name and other personally identifiable information. Your organization’s privacy policy and terms, not Qonversion’s, will apply to their use and storage of your information.
✓ Purchase Information: If you purchase paid features of the Qonversion service, we collect your name, billing and shipping address, credit card information and any other information necessary to complete the transaction.
End user technical information can be received and processed by us if you are using Qonversion Software Development Kit (“SDK”) or other Qonversion products and services. We collectively refer to such information as the “End User Technical Information”. The End User Technical Information includes:
✓ End user’s mobile device type, operating system and version number
✓ IP address
✓ Advertiser ID
✓ App version
✓ Carrier
✓ Country
✓ Locale
✓ Time zone
✓ Device push token
✓ Qonversion SDK version
✓ Apple receipt file
✓ Google purchase token
✓ End user’s transaction information in your mobile or web app
✓ Time end user’s last used your app
✓ If you choose to enable User Properties information, you might send any additional metadata associated with a user.
USAGE: We may use information that we collect about you, including personal information, to:
✓ Provide the Qonversion service: We will use your information to provide the Qonversion service to you; to manage your account; to respond to your inquiries; and for other customer service and support purposes. We use the payment information you provide to us in order to alert you of past, current, and upcoming charges and to perform internal finance processes, such as looking up the status of a credit card charge. In the event of a credit card dispute, we may also share account information with your bank to verify the legitimacy of a charge.
✓ Understand and improve upon our products: We will perform research and analysis about your use of, or interest in, our products, services, or content, or products, services or content offered by others. We do this to help make the Qonversion Service better and to develop new products.
✓ Qonversion may use information derived from the aggregation of End User Technical Information for research and analytics purposes and improvement and marketing of the Services (“Aggregated Data”). Aggregated Data shall be anonymous and in no way reveal the identity of the customer or any end user.
✓ Communicate with you.
✓ Service-related communications: We may send you service and administrative emails to ensure the Qonversion service is working properly. These messages are considered part of the Qonversion service, and you may not opt out of these messages while you have an active account.
✓ Promotional: Subject to your opt-out preference, we may send you emails about new product features or other news about Qonversion or on topics we think would be relevant to you. You may opt-out of receiving these communications at any time. Please see the Your Rights and Choices section below for more information.
✓ Responding to your requests: We will use your information to respond to your questions, service issues, or comments.
✓ Administrative: We may contact you to inform you about the Qonversion service, changes in the Qonversion service, and other important service-related notices, such as changes to our Privacy Policy or security or fraud notices.
✓ Protecting Rights and Interests: We will use your information to protect our rights and interests, as well as the rights and interests of our users and any other person, as well as to enforce our Privacy Policy or our Terms of Service.
✓ Legal Compliance: We may use your information to comply with applicable legal or regulatory obligations, including informal requests from law enforcement or other governmental authorities.
TRANSFER: We may share your personally identifiable information with third parties for purposes of providing you with Qonversion services. These third parties may use your information to perform services on our behalf and to offer you other products or services that may be of interest to you. Except as described herein, Qonversion will only provide personally identifiable information collected on the website to a third party if required to do so by law or in the good-faith belief that such action is necessary to comply with state and federal laws or respond to a court order, subpoena, or search warrant. We may share aggregated, non-personally identifiable information (such as usage statistics or other information) with third parties at any time and for any reason.
Where we store your information
The information we collect from you will be stored in Microsoft Azure data centres in the UK in the following locations: London. Azure is certified in the international standard SOC 2 Type 2 and ISO. You can find detailed information on Azure’s certification
here
.
LEGAL BASIS: We rely on the following legal grounds to process your personal information:
✓ Consent: We may use your personal information as described in this Policy subject to your consent. To withdraw your consent, please contact us at
compliance@qonversion.io
. You may also refrain from providing or withdrawing your consent for cookies. Please see Your Rights and Choices below for more information on opt-outs.
✓ Performance of a Contract: We may need to collect and use your personal information, as applicable, to perform our contractual obligations to you.
✓ Legitimate Interests: We may use your personal information for our legitimate interests to provide and improve upon the Qonversion Service. We process the information on behalf of our customers who have legitimate interests in operating their businesses. We may use technical information as described in this Policy and use personal information for our marketing purposes consistent with our legitimate interests and any choices that we offer or consents that may be required under applicable law.
YOUR RIGHTS AND CHOICES:
✓ Account: In order to keep your personal information accurate and complete, you can log in to review and update your account information, including contact and billing information, via your account settings page. You may also contact us to request information about the personal data we have collected from you and to request the correction, modification or deletion of such personal information. We will do our best to honour your requests subject to any legal and contractual obligations. If you would like to make a request, cancel your account or request we delete or no longer use your account information to provide you with the Services, please contact us at
compliance@qonversion.io
. Subject to applicable law, we will retain and use your account information only as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our agreements.
✓ Email: If you do not wish to receive promotional emails from us, you may opt-out at any time by following the opt-out link contained in the email itself or by emailing us at
compliance@qonversion.io
. Please note that it may take up to ten (10) days to process your request. Please also note that if you opt out of receiving marketing communications from us, we may continue to send you service-related emails which are not available for opt-out. If you do not wish to receive any service-related emails from us, you have the option to deactivate your account.
✓ Cookies: You may also refrain from providing or withdrawing your consent for cookies. Your browser’s help function should contain instructions on how to set your computer to accept all cookies, notify you when a cookie is issued, or to not receive cookies at any time.
✓ Additional Rights: Subject to local law, you may have additional rights under the laws of your jurisdiction regarding your personal data, such as the right to complain to your local data protection authority.
✓ Qonversion also may inform the unlimited audience about the use of the Qonversion Service by any of our Customers, for example, in portfolio and advertising by using company names, logos, and app icons without acknowledgement or compensation to you.
GDPR
✓ Qonversion has no direct agreement with customers’ end users. Customers are responsible for ensuring that Users’ Personal Information has been collected in accordance with applicable law.
✓ Qonverion’s Customers install a Software Development Kit (“SDK”) on their mobile app(s) and site(s). The SDK facilitates the transfer of User Personal Information to Qonversion so that Qonversion can provide service to the Customers.
✓ Qonversion only receives User Personal Information that Customers have provided us for the business purposes of providing the Services. EU (European Union) individuals have rights in relation to their personal data, which is processed by Qonversion. If you are an EU data subject, you may by emailing us at
compliance@qonversion.io
:
– Request access to the personal data concerned.
– Request that any incorrect personal data about you that we are processing be rectified.
– Request that we erase the personal data concerned.
Withdraw your consent at any time where we are processing personal data relating to you on the basis of your prior consent to that processing, after which we shall stop the processing concerned.
Lodge a formal complaint with the Information Commissioner in Ireland (or your local EU supervisory authority if you live outside the UK) if you have a complaint about any processing of your personal data being conducted by us.
If the requested EU Data is User Personal Information, please include the name of the applicable customer in your request; we will refer the request to that customer to respond directly to you and will support them as needed to respond to your request.
CCPA
✓ Qonversion acts as a Service Provider under the California Consumer Protection Act (“CCPA”). Qonversion follows the Customer(s)’ instructions in processing the User Personal Information for the business purposes of providing the Services. Qonversion follows the Customer(s)’ instructions to delete any User Personal Information requested. Qonversion does not sell its Users’ Personal Information as defined under CCPA. Qonversion upholds Users’ right to non-discrimination as defined under CCPA.
SECURITY: Qonversion takes security very seriously. We use commercially standard methods to transmit your content securely, including HTTPS, SSL, and 128-bit encryption.
Qonversion is hosted in the UK. Qonversion uses the following sub-contractor:
Microsoft Azure (SOC 2 Type II certified and GDPR compliant provider)
Datacenter location: London, United Kingdom.
Children Under 13: The Qonversion service is not directed to children under the age of thirteen (13), and we do not knowingly collect personal information from such children. If you are a parent or guardian of a child under the age of thirteen (13) and you believe your child may have provided us with personal information, please notify us at
compliance@qonversion.io
.
Business Transitions: Upon the sale or transfer of the company and its assets, we will require a purchaser to treat our data under the privacy statement in place at the time of its collection.
Changes to Privacy Policy: Please note that this Privacy Policy may change from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. If we decide to change our privacy policy, then we will post those changes to this Privacy Notice and other places we deem appropriate so that you are aware of what information we collect, how we use it, and under what circumstances, if any, we disclose it. We will also keep prior versions of this Privacy Policy in an archive for your review.
Questions, Concerns and Comments: If you have any questions regarding our privacy policy, please contact us:
Qonversion Inc.
1160 Battery Street East
Suites 100
San Francisco
94111
Email:
compliance@qonversion.io
Sub-policy 11
https://www.stackcommerce.com/privacy/:
Publishers
Overview
Shops
Affiliate
StackMedia
Content Studio
StackAgency
Brands
Overview
Shops
StackMedia
StackAgency
About
About
Careers
Blog
Help
Contact
Sign In
Publishers
Overview
Shops
Affiliate
StackMedia
Content Studio
StackAgency
Brands
Overview
Shops
StackMedia
StackAgency
About
About
Careers
Blog
Help
Contact
Sign In
Sign Up
Privacy Policy
Last Updated
: August 1, 2024
This Privacy Policy describes how StackSocial, Inc. and its subsidiaries and affiliates (collectively, “
StackSocial
”, “
we
”, “
us
” or “
our
”) collect, use, store, and share your information when:
You access, use, and purchase products and services through our websites, applications, and other digital properties where this Privacy Policy is posted, including
www.stacksocial.com
,
www.stackcommerce.com
,
www.citizengoods.com
,
www.joyus.com
,
www.thefascination.com
, and
www.skillwise.com
(“
Websites
”);
You engage our services as an affiliate, brand, merchant, or publisher (“
Services
”);
You communicate with us in any manner, including by e-mail, text, social media, or telephone (“
Communications
”); and
We interact with our third party partners, brands, publishers, and service providers.
For California residents, please see our
California Privacy Notice
.
For residents of Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Texas, please see our
Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Texas Privacy Notice
.
For Nevada residents, please see our
Nevada Privacy Notice
.
If you are in the UK, EU, or other country outside of the United States, please see our
Non-US Privacy Notice
.
1. What Type Of Information Do We Collect About You?
Depending on how you interact with our Websites and Services, the nature of our Communications, and how we may interact with certain third parties, we may collect the following information about you:
Basic Identifying Information
: Information such as your full name, postal address, e-mail address, phone number, account name and password, username, and other similar identifiers.
Corporate Information
: Information such as your company name, brand, website, monthly website visitors, social media followers, newsletters, position in the marketplace, and other related business and professional information.
Device Identifier and other Unique Identifiers
: Information such as your device identifier, internet protocol (IP) address, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifier, and other unique identifiers.
Internet or Other Network Activity
: Information such as your browsing or search history, and other information regarding your interactions with our Websites, emails, and advertisements.
Geolocation Data
: Information that permits us to determine your location so that we can determine the best products and services to offer you.
Commercial Information
: Information such as the nature of the Services you’ve considered from us, and related information.
User Content
: Information such as your Communications with us and any other content you provide, such as social media profiles, photographs of receipts, images, videos, survey responses, comments, product reviews, testimonials, and other content.
Inferences
: Information such as inferences drawn from or created based on the information identified above.
2. How Do We Collect Your Information?
We collect your information in three ways: (1) directly from you when you use our Websites, Services, and Communicate with us; (2) automatically using online technologies when you engage with our Websites, Services, and Communications; and (3) from third parties.
Directly from you
: We collect information directly from you when you visit our Websites, purchase products through our Websites, engage in our Services, enter your information through our Websites, access our content, take a survey or a poll or enter a contest, engage in Communications with us, or sign-up to receive emails, text messages, or certain other Communications from us.
Automatically Using Online Technologies
: When you visit our Websites, open or click on emails we send you or related Communications, or interact with our advertisements, we or other third parties may automatically collect certain information about you using online tracking technologies such as cookies, pixels, web beacons, software developer kids, and related technologies. For more information, see
How Do We Use Cookies and Similar Online Tracking Technologies
below.
From Third Parties
: We collect information from our third party partners, such as distributors, suppliers, other members, partners, data analytics providers, marketing or advertising providers, fraud prevention service providers, and vendors that provide services.
3. Cookies and Related Online Tracking Technologies
We and our third-party partners use cookies, pixels, web beacons, software development kits, and other similar online tracking technologies to gather information about you when you use our Websites, interact with our Services, and engage with our Communications. These technologies may include payment processing, advertising, marketing, and related services. Others are used to maintain the security of our Websites, manage your account, prevent crashes, fix bugs, save your preferences, assist with basic Website functions.
Our Websites, for example, use Google Analytics for analytics purposes. You can learn more about Google Analytics by vising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
.
4. How Do We Use Your Information?
We use your information for a variety of purposes, including to:
Provide our Websites and Services to You
: We use your information to provide our Websites and Services to you, including to: (1) create and manage your account; (2) allow you to use the Websites and purchase products; (3) facilitate your use of our Services; (4) answer your Communications; and (5) perform other related business functions.
Communicate with You
: We use your information to engage in Communications with you, such as to respond to your requests, inquiries, issues, feedback, and to provide customer service.
Market and Advertise
: We use your information for marketing and advertising purposes, including sending marketing, advertising, and promotional communications to you by email, text message, or postal mail. We also use your information to show you advertisements for Services and on our Websites.
Conduct Analytics and Personalization
: We use your information to conduct research and analytics, including to improve our Websites and Services. We also use your information to understand your interaction with our Websites, advertisements, Services, and our Communications with you. We further use your information to personalize your experience, save you time when you visit our Websites and use our Services, better understand your needs, and provide personalized recommendations for our Services.
Security and Fraud Prevention
: We use your information to detect, investigate, prevent, or take action regarding possible malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, including fraudulent transactions. We also use your information to enforce our terms and procedures, prevent against security incidents, and prevent the harm to other users of our Services.
Legal Obligations
: We use your information to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations, to establish and exercise our rights, and to defend against legal claims.
Business Functions
: We use your information to support our core business functions, including to maintain records related to business management, loss prevention, collecting amounts owed, and identifying and repairing errors or problems in the Websites.
5. How Do We Disclose Your Information?
We may disclose or share your information with affiliated and non-affiliated third-parties, including in the following scenarios:
With your Consent
: We may disclose or share your information with your consent, which may be obtained in writing; online, through “click-through” agreements; when you accept the terms of use on our Websites; when you accept the setting of cookies and related tracking technologies; orally, either in person or on the phone; or by other means.
In a Business Transfer
: We may disclose or share your information as part of a corporate business transaction, such as a merger or acquisition, joint venture, corporate reorganization, financing, or sale of company assets, or in the unlikely event of insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership, in which such information could be transferred to third parties as a business asset in the transaction or otherwise during related proceedings.
To Non-Affiliated Third Parties
: We may disclose or share your information with certain non-affiliated third parties to facilitate your access and use of our Websites, our Services, to complete a transaction, and to provide us with certain business functions, including but not limited to sharing your information with partners, internet service providers, advertising networks, data analytics providers, governmental entities, operating systems and platforms, social media networks, and service providers who provide us a service (e.g., customer service, distribution, supply, auditing, marketing, shipping, debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality on our Websites, payment processing, and/or protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity).
For Legal Process And Protection
: We may disclose or share your information to satisfy any law, regulation, legal process, governmental request, or where we have a good faith belief that access, use, preservation or disclosure of such information is reasonably necessary to: (1) enforce or apply our agreements; (2) protect our interests, property, or safety of others; (3) in connection with claims, disputes, or litigation; and (4) to protect our Websites and Services.
6. How Do We Protect Your Information?
We take all commercially reasonable steps to ensure your information is protected in alignment with all applicable laws and regulations, as appropriate to the sensitivity of your information.
7. How Long Do We Keep Your Information?
We keep your information for as long as is necessary in accordance with the purpose for which it was collected, other noticed purposes, our business needs, and our legal and regulatory obligations. If we dispose of your information, we will do so in a way that is secure and appropriate to the nature of the information subject to disposal.
8. Links To Third Party Sites
Our Websites and Services may contain links to third party websites and services. Please note that these links are provided for your convenience and information, and the websites and services may operate independently from us and have their own privacy policies or notices, which we strongly suggest you review.
9. Do Not Track
Our Websites may, from time to time, collect information about your online activities, over time and across our different websites. When you use our Websites, third parties may also collect information about your online activities, over time and across different internet websites, online or cloud computing services, online applications, or mobile applications. Some browsers support a “Do Not Track” feature, which is intended to be a signal to websites that you do not wish to be tracked across different websites you visit. Our Websites do not currently change the way they operate based upon detection of a “Do Not Track” or similar signal.
10. Your Rights
For individuals in California, please see our
California Privacy Notice
below.
For individuals in Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Texas please see our
Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Texas
Privacy Notice below.
For individuals outside of the US, please see our
Non-US Resident
Privacy Notice below.
For all individuals, regardless of location, you have a right to stop receiving promotional e-mails or other related communications from us at any time by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of any promotional e-mail you receive from us.
For all individuals, regardless of location, you have a right to request thatwe delete your personal information, subject to certain exceptions.
You also have the right to manage your preferences as it relates to cookies and related technologies by utilizing our cookie banner and tool to manage your preferences.
11. California Privacy Notice
The following disclosures are made pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act and its implementing regulations (collectively, the “
CCPA
”).
Definitions
Personal information
: This is information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, to you or your household.
Sensitive personal information
: This is information such as your social security number, driver’s license number, state identification card, passport number, account log-in and password, financial account and password, debit or credit card number and access code, precise geolocation information, race, ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, union membership, the content of your mail, email or texts other than those communications you have with us, genetic data, biometric information, health information, or information that concerns your sex life or sexual orientation.
Sell, sale, or sold
: This means the selling, renting, releasing, disclosing, disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise communicating orally, in writing, or other means, your personal information to a third party for money or other valuable consideration.
Share, shared, or sharing
: This means the sharing, renting, releasing, disclosing, disseminating, making available, transferring, or otherwise communicating orally, in writing, or other means, your personal information to a third party for cross-context behavioral advertising, whether or not for monetary or other valuable consideration.
Your Rights
You or an authorized agent you designate on your behalf may submit the individual requests outlined below. Upon receipt, we will take reasonable steps to verify you and your authorized agent’s identity prior to responding to the request, which may include in certain circumstances you signing a declaration under penalty of perjury. If an authorized agent is submitting a request on your behalf, you must submit a copy of: (1) a written authorization demonstrating you have authorized the agent to submit a request on your behalf; and (2) provide separate proof verifying your identity.
Right to Know
: You have a have a right to request that we disclose, subject to certain exceptions, information concerning: (1) the categories of personal information we have collected from or about you; (2) the categories of sources from which we have collected that personal information, and the business or commercial purpose for the collection; (3) the categories of third parties with whom we have shared, sold, or disclosed your personal information, including the business or commercial purpose for said sharing, selling, or disclosure; and (4) specific pieces of your personal information, subject to appropriate exceptions.
Right to Delete
: You have a right to request that we delete your personal information, subject to certain exceptions.
Right to Correct
: You have a right to request that we correct your personal information, subject to certain exceptions.
Right to Non-Discrimination
: You have a right to exercise the above rights without being discriminated against under the CCPA.
Exercising Your Rights
: To submit a request, you may send an e-mail to
privacy@stackcommerce.com
. You may also designate an authorized agent to submit a request on your behalf by sending an e-mail with written proof of such authorization to
privacy@stackcommerce.com
.
Responding To Requests
: Once you have submitted your request, we will respond within the time frame permitted by applicable law.
Notice of Collection
To learn more about the categories of personal information we collect about California residents, please see
What Type Of Information Do We Collect?
above.
For more information about how we use those categories of personal information, please see
How Do We Use Your Information?
above.
For more information about how we collect categories of personal information, please see
How Do We Collect Your Information?
and
Cookies And Related Online Tracking Technologies
above.
To learn more about how we disclose categories of personal information, and the categories of third parties with whom we disclose such information, please see
How Do We Disclose Your Information?
above.
To learn more about how long we keep your information, please see
How Long Do We Keep Your Information?
above.
Notice of Disclosure for a Business Purpose
To learn more about the categories of personal information we have disclosed for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties with whom we’ve disclosed such information, please see
How Do We Disclose Your Information?
above.
Notice of Sale or Sharing of Personal Information
We do not sell or share the personal information of California residents. We have no actual knowledge that we sell the personal information of California residents who are under 16 years of age.
Notice of Use of Sensitive Personal Information
We do not use California resident sensitive personal information for any purpose other than is permissible under the CCPA. Specifically, we do not use sensitive personal information of California residents to derive characteristics about California residents.
12. Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Texas Privacy Notice
The following disclosures are made pursuant to the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act, Colorado Privacy Act, Connecticut Personal Data Privacy Online Monitoring Act, Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and the Texas Data Privacy and Security Act, as amended from time to time.
Definitions
Personal data
: Information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable individual.
Sell, sale, or sold
: The exchange of personal data for monetary consideration. For Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, and Texas, these terms also include the exchange of personal data for other valuable consideration.
Targeted advertising
: Displaying advertisements to a consumer where the advertisement is selected based on personal data obtained or inferred from that individual’s activities over time and across nonaffiliated Internet web sites or online applications to predict such individual’s preferences or interests.
Notice of Collection
To learn more about the categories of personal information we collect about you and how we use it, please see:
What Information Do We Collect?
How Do We Use Your Information?
To learn more about the categories of third parties with whom we may share your personal information, please see:
How Do We Disclose Your Information
?
Your Rights
We may take steps to verify your identity by matching the information you provide with your request with the information we have on file about you. Depending on the sensitivity of the information at issue, we may utilize more stringent verification methods. To exercise any rights outlined below, you may send an e-mail to
privacy@stackcommerce.com
.
Right to Know and Access
: You have a right to know whether we process your personal data, access such personal data subject to certain exceptions, and obtain a copy of the personal data in a portable format.
Right to Delete
: You have a right to request that we delete your personal information, subject to certain exceptions.
Right to Correct
: You have a right to ask that we correct your personal information, subject to certain exceptions.
Right to Non-Discrimination
: You have a right not to be discriminated against for the exercise of your rights described herein.
Right to Appeal
: You have a right to appeal our denial of any request above. We will respond to your appeal within the timeframe required by law, and provide a written explanation in support of our response and provide additional information as required by law.
Nevada Privacy Notice
If you are a Nevada resident, you have the right to submit a request directing us not to make any sale of your personal information. StackSocial does not sell your personal information as defined under Nevada law. However, to request email confirmation that we do not sell your personal information, please send an email to
privacy@stackcommerce.com
with “Nevada Opt-Out of Sale” in the subject line.
Non-US Privacy Notice
Data Controller
StackSocial, Inc. 73 Market Street, Venice, California, 90291
How Do We Use Your Personal Data?
Please see
How Do We Use Your Personal Data?
above.
What is our lawful basis for processing your personal data?
Your personal data is primarily used to provide you with our Websites and Services. Your personal data may also be used to comply with our legal obligations or to fulfill our legitimate interest, such as to personalize your experience, develop and improve our Websites and Services, or to detect illegal activity. With your consent, we may also use your information to send you offers and promotions.
Your Rights
We may take steps to verify your identity by matching the information you provide with your request with the information we have on file about you. Depending on the sensitivity of the information at issue, we may utilize more stringent verification methods.
You have a right to access the personal data we have processed about you, ask that certain of that data be removed (i.e., deleted), correct or change your personal data, or change your marketing preferences by withdrawing your consent at any time. To submit any of the requests below, please submit your request to
privacy@stackcommerce.com
.
We may take steps to verify your identity by matching the information you provide with your request with the information we have on file about you. Depending on the sensitivity of the information at issue, we may utilize more stringent verification methods.
Lodging Complaints
You may have a right to lodge a complaint with your local Data Protection Supervisory Authority concerning our data practices. To receive information about your local Data Protection Supervisory Authority, please
contact us
.
13. Children
Our Websites and Services are not intended for children under the age of 13. This includes any links to other websites that we provide for our convenience. We don’t knowingly collect the information of children under 13 for any reason.
14. Changes To Our Privacy Policy
We may change this Policy from time to time. Any and all changes will be reflected on this page, and where appropriate provided in person or by another electronic method. The effective date will be stated at the top of this Policy. You should regularly check this page for any changes to this Policy.
15. Accessibility
If you require a copy of this Privacy Policy in an alternative format, please
Contact Us
.
16. Contact Us
privacy@stackcommerce.com
Publishers
Shops
Affiliate
StackMedia
Content Studio
StackAgency
Brands
Shops
StackMedia
StackAgency
Company
About
Careers
Blog
Help
Contact
Award-Winning Content and Commerce Platform
©
2025
StackCommerce
Privacy Policy
|
Terms
Cookie Icon
We use cookies to optimize your browsing experience for the purpose of personalizing and measuring the effectiveness of ads. By clicking "Allow All", you consent to our use of cookies.
Privacy Policy ↗
Manage Cookies
Decline
Allow All
Accordion Toggle Close
Strictly Necessary
Always Active
Strictly Necessary cookies are absolutely necessary for core functions such as navigating the page or accessing secure areas. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
Accordion Toggle Close
Analytics
analytics Toggle
Analytics cookies serve to improve the performance and functionality of this website by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
Accordion Toggle Close
Marketing
marketing Toggle
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
As described in our Privacy Policy, we collect personal information from your interactions with us and our website, including through cookies and similar technologies. We may also share this personal information with third parties, including advertising partners. We do this in order to show you ads on other websites that are more relevant to your interests and for other reasons outlined in our privacy policy.
Sharing of personal information for targeted advertising based on your interaction on different websites may be considered “sales”, “sharing”, or “targeted advertising” under certain U.S. state privacy laws. Depending on where you live, you may have the right to opt out of these activities. If you would like to exercise this opt-out right, please follow the instructions below.
If you visit our website with the Global Privacy Control opt-out preference signal enabled, depending on where you are, we will treat this as a request to opt-out of activity that may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” of personal information or other uses that may be considered targeted advertising for the device and browser you used to visit our website.
By clicking “opt out”, the browser on this device will be opted out of sharing personal data.
You have opted out on this browser.
Sub-policy 12
https://www.salesforce.com/company/privacy/:
Skip to content
See Privacy Statement
How we protect our Customer’s data as a Processor
Our cloud services are designed to help customers comply with privacy laws around the world. Discover more about our commitment to protecting customer data as a processor.
Global Privacy Resources for Salesforce Products
Data Processing Addendum
Data Processing Addendum FAQ
Data Transfer Mechanisms FAQ
Salesforce's Notice of Data Privacy Framework Certification
Trust and Compliance Documentation
Salesforce Audience Studio Privacy Policy
Salesforce's Notice of APEC CBPR and PRP Certifications
Salesforce's EU Processor Binding Corporate Rules
Salesforce's UK Processor Binding Corporate Rules
Salesforce Group Affiliates for UK Binding Corporate Rules for Processors
How we protect data as a Controller
We continuously monitor the global privacy landscape and adapt our privacy program accordingly. Discover more about our commitment to compliance with global privacy laws as a controller
Salesforce Candidate Privacy Statement
Salesforce Apps, Add-ins and Extensions Privacy Statement
Contact Information
To exercise your rights relating to your personal data, or if you have questions regarding our privacy practices, please fill out
this form
, or email us at
privacy@salesforce.com.
For more information about contacting us, see the “Contacting Us” section below.
Learn more
Important Information
Salesforce’s full Privacy Statement contains more information about Salesforce’s privacy practices.
Responsible Salesforce Entity
Salesforce, Inc. and/or its affiliated entities act as the controllers of your Personal Data and are responsible for its processing, unless expressly specified otherwise in our full Privacy Statement. For the avoidance of doubt, our Privacy Statement does not apply to the extent we process Personal Data in the role of a processor on behalf of our customers. A reference to “Salesforce,” “we,” “us” or the “Company” is a reference to Salesforce, Inc. and its affiliates involved in the processing activity. A list of Salesforce’s affiliates can be found in the List of Subsidiaries section of Salesforce’s most recent Form 10-K, available under the SEC Filings tab by selecting the “Annual Filings” filter on the page located here. Please see the "Contacting us" section, below, for our contact information and details of our Data Protection Officer (and in India, our Grievance Officer).
Purposes for which we process Personal Data
We collect and process Personal Data for a variety of purposes, including:
to provide our websites and social media branded pages;
to display personalized advertisements and content;
to manage event registrations and attendance (including ensuring the health and safety of our visitors and employees);
to send communications;
to handle contact and user support requests;
to provide and optimize the performance of our services;
to bill for our services and manage our accounts (including usage and licensing compliance);
to administer surveys and conduct research; and
to comply with our legal obligations.
For the list of purposes for which we Process your Personal Data, please see the full Privacy Statement.
We only collect and process your Personal Data to the extent it is necessary for fulfilling these purposes and where we can rely on a legal basis for such processing as set out in our full Privacy Statement. Where required, we will ask you for your prior consent to processing.
Please review the "What Personal Data do we collect?" and "Purposes for which we process Personal Data and the legal bases on which we rely" sections in our full Privacy Statement for further details. Also, please review the "How long do we keep your Personal Data?" section to learn how long we store your Personal Data.
Who do we share Personal Data with
We may share Personal Data with various parties, including:
Our contracted service providers that process Personal Data on our behalf for IT and system administration, credit card processing, research and analytics, marketing, customer support and data enrichment;
Affiliates within our current or future corporate group that process Personal Data for customer support, marketing, event management, technical operations and account management;
If you are using our services as an authorized user, with the Salesforce customer responsible for your access to the services for verifying your account, and reviewing compliance with our usage terms and policies;
Sponsors of events, webinar or contests for which you register;
Third-party networks and websites so that we can advertise on their platforms;
Specifically in relation to our AppExchange website, with our third-party partners who may contact you regarding their products or services; and
Professional advisers who provide consultancy, banking, legal, insurance and accounting services.
Please review the "Who do we share Personal Data with" section in our full Privacy Statement for the full list and more detailed information.
International transfer of Personal Data
Your Personal Data may be collected, transferred to and stored by us in the United States and by our affiliates and third parties (as disclosed in the full Privacy Statement) in other countries. Therefore, your Personal Data may be processed outside your  country or jurisdiction, including in places that may not provide the same level of protection. As described in the "International transfer of Personal Data" section of our full Privacy Statement, we have implemented safeguards to ensure an adequate level of protection where your Personal Data is transferred.
Data Transfer Mechanisms FAQ
Your rights relating to Personal Data
You have certain rights relating to your Personal Data, subject to local data protection laws. Depending on the applicable laws, these rights may include the right to:
Access your Personal Data held by us;
Know more about how we process your Personal Data;
Rectify inaccurate Personal Data and, taking into account the purpose of processing the Personal Data, ensure it is complete;
Erase or delete your Personal Data;
Restrict our processing of your Personal Data;
Transfer your Personal Data to another controller, to the extent possible;
Object to any processing of your Personal Data;
Opt out of certain disclosures of your Personal Data to third parties;
Know what categories of Personal Data are shared for delivering advertisements on non Salesforce websites, applications, and services and the categories of recipients of such Personal Data;
Opt out of the sharing of your Personal Data for delivering advertisements on non-Salesforce websites, applications, and services;
If you’re under the age of 16, or such other applicable age of consent for privacy purposes in relevant individual jurisdictions, opt in to certain disclosures of your Personal Data to third parties;
Not be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects;
Withdraw your consent at any time (to the extent we base processing on consent); and
Not be discriminated against for exercising your rights as described above.
For more details on your rights and choices and how to exercise them, please review the "Your rights relating to your Personal Data" section in our full Privacy Statement.
Contacting us
To exercise your rights relating to your Personal Data, or if you have questions regarding our privacy practices, please fill out
this form
, email us at
privacy@salesforce.com
or
datasubjectrequest@salesforce.com
, call us at tel:1-855-938-3410 or write to us at:
Salesforce Data Protection Officer (Salesforce Privacy Team) (and in India, a Grievance Officer)
415 Mission St., 3rd Floor
San Francisco, CA 94105, USA
When you contact us, please indicate in which country and/or state you reside.
If you believe that we have not been able to assist with your complaint or concern, and you are located in the EEA or the UK, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the competent supervisory authority. If you work or reside in a country that is a member of the European Union or that is in the EEA, you may find the contact details for your appropriate data protection authority on the
following website
.
Situations
Categories of Personal Data
If you express an interest in obtaining additional information about our services; request customer support (including accessing the Help & Training Portal); use our “Contact Us” or similar features; register to use our websites or to receive communications; sign up for an event, webinar or contest; participate in a program, training, certification or survey; use our products and services; download certain content; or are employed by a customer of our products and services where your information has been shared with us
Contact information, such as your name, job title, company name, address, phone number, email address, username and password, other information you have voluntarily chosen to share
If you make purchases via our websites or register for an event or webinar
Contact information, financial and billing information, such as billing name and address, credit card number or bank account information
If you attend an event
Attendee badge information which may include name, title, company name, address, country, phone number and email address, image and video
If you give your explicit consent and only for specified events, your biometric information, such as an image of your facial features for identification purposes
During the Covid-19 pandemic, this may also include health status, including your temperature, COVID-19-related symptoms, exposure to COVID-19 positive individuals, vaccination status, testing results, and recent travel history
If you register with us for a variety of purposes, including joining a community that we host or participating in a program, training or certification
Username, photo, video or other biographical information, such as your occupation, location, social media profiles or usernames, company name, areas of expertise and interests
If you interact with our websites or emails
Information about your device and your usage of our websites or emails (such as Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or other identifiers), which may qualify as Personal Data (please see Section 4 below) using cookies, web beacons, or similar technologies
If you use and interact with our products and services
Information about your device and your usage of our services through log files and other technologies, some of which may qualify as Personal Data (including Usage Data) (please see Section 4 below)
If you communicate with us via a phone call
Information such as your name, voice and any other Personal Data voluntarily share
If you visit our offices
Name, email address, phone number, company name, time and date of arrival, image or video
During the Covid-19 pandemic, this may also include health status, including your temperature, COVID-19-related symptoms, exposure to COVID-19 positive individuals, vaccination status, testing results, and recent travel history
If you voluntarily submit certain information to us, such as filling out a survey, responding to a questionnaire or participating in other forms of research
Information you have provided as part of that request, which may include Personal Data and special categories of Personal Data, to the extent you voluntarily choose to provide it
If you are a supplier or service provider to Salesforce (or work for a supplier or service provider)
Contact information, payment and billing information
If you provide us, our service providers or our affiliates with any Personal Data relating to other individuals, you represent that you have the authority to do so, and where required, have obtained the necessary consent, and acknowledge that it may be used in accordance with this Privacy Statement. If you believe that your Personal Data has been provided to us improperly, or want to exercise your rights relating to your Personal Data, please contact us by using the information in Section 13 below.
3.2 Personal Data we collect from other sources
We also collect information about you from other sources including partners from whom we collect or purchase Personal Data or who provide us with publicly available information which may contain Personal Data. We may combine this information with Personal Data provided by you.
Provision of the services:
The Personal Data we collect to provide our products and services may include information you have made publicly available online (such as when using social media sites) or that is published by third parties and contains information about you (such as news articles). For a select number of services, we collect this Personal Data from partners who may receive this data when you visit or use their services or through the third parties they work with.
In addition, the Personal Data we collect to provide our products and services may include location information from third parties, which helps us offer features like identity management and multi-factor authentication.
Advertising: The Personal Data we collect from other sources for the purposes of tailored advertising includes identifiers, professional or employment-related information, education information, commercial information, visual information, internet activity information, and inferences about preferences and behaviors. We, collect this from third party providers of business contact information, including mailing addresses, job titles, email addresses, phone numbers, intent data (or user behavior data), IP addresses, social media profiles, LinkedIn URLs and custom profiles for purposes of targeted advertising, delivering relevant email content, event promotion and profiling, determining eligibility and verifying contact information. This helps us update, expand, and analyze our records, identify new customers, and create more tailored advertising to provide services that may be of interest to you.
Additional sources: In addition to the aforementioned, we collect Personal Data from the following sources:
Another individual at your organization who may provide us with your personal information, which may include Personal Data and special categories of Personal Data, to the extent you consent to providing it and sharing it, for the purposes of obtaining services and assessing our goals related to encouraging diversity within our vendors; and
Platforms such as GitHub to manage code check-ins and pull requests. If you participate in an open-source or community development project, we may associate your code repository username with your community account so we can inform you of program changes that are important to your participation or relate to additional security requirements.
Only where necessary for security purposes, we may collect information that is publicly available online (such as accessible through search engines or public social media sites), as well as images, physical descriptions and other pertinent information necessary to address a credible security threat to our employees, events or premises.
Type of Cookies
Description
Managing Settings
Required cookies
Required cookies are necessary for basic website functionality. Some examples include: session cookies needed to transmit the website, authentication cookies, and security cookies.
If you have chosen to identify yourself to us, we may place on your browser a cookie that allows us to uniquely identify you when you are logged into the websites and to process your online transactions and requests.
Because required cookies are essential to operate the websites, there is no option to opt out of these cookies.
Functional cookies
Functional cookies enhance functions, performance, and services on the website. Some examples include: cookies used to analyze site traffic, cookies used for market research, and cookies used to display advertising that is not directed to a particular individual.
Functional cookies may also be used to improve how our websites function and to help us provide you with more relevant communications, including marketing communications. These cookies collect information about how our websites are used, including which pages are viewed most often.
We may use our own technology or third-party technology to track and analyze usage information to provide enhanced interactions and more relevant communications, and to track the performance of our advertisements.
Salesforce may also use HTML5 local storage or Flash cookies for the above-mentioned purposes. These technologies differ from browser cookies in the amount and type of data they store, and how they store it.
We need your prior consent to use functional cookies. To change your cookie settings and preferences, including those for functional cookies, click the Cookie Preferences link in the footer of the page.
To learn how to control functional cookies via your individual browser settings, click
here
.
To learn how to manage privacy and storage settings for Flash cookies, click
here
.
Advertising cookies
Advertising cookies track activity across websites in order to understand a viewer’s interests and to direct marketing to them.
We sometimes use cookies delivered by us or by third parties to show you ads for our products that we think may interest you on devices you use and to track the performance of our advertisements. For example, these cookies collect information such as which browser you used when visiting our websites.
Salesforce also contracts with third-party advertising networks that collect IP addresses and other information from web beacons on our websites, from emails and on third-party websites. Advertising networks follow your online activities over time and across different websites or other online services by collecting certain data through automated means, including through the use of cookies. These technologies may recognize you across the different devices you use. When we work with third party advertising networks, we require them to restrict their data processing to only what is necessary to provide us with the advertising services we request.
We need your prior consent to use of targeting and advertising cookies. To change your cookie settings and preferences, including those for targeting and advertising cookies, click the Cookie Preferences link in the footer of the page.
See Section 4.3, below, to learn more about these and other advertising networks and your ability to opt out of collection by certain third parties.
For more information about Tableau and Slack’s use of cookies specifically, please see the
Tableau Cookie Policy
and the
Slack Cookie Policy
.
4.3 Notices on behavioral advertising and opt-out for website visitors
As described above, we or one of our authorized partners may place or read cookies on your device when you visit our websites for the purpose of serving you targeted advertising (also referred to as “online behavioral advertising” or “interest-based advertising”). To learn more about targeted advertising and advertising networks, please visit the opt-out pages of the Network Advertising Initiative,
here
, and the Digital Advertising Alliance,
here
. To opt-out of targeted advertising that is provided to us and to third parties by Salesforce Audience Studio, click
here
.
To manage the use of targeting and advertising cookies on this website, click the Cookie Preferences link in the footer of the page or consult your individual browser settings for cookies. To learn how to manage privacy and storage settings for Flash cookies, click
here
. Various browsers may also offer their own management tools for removing HTML5 local storage.
4.4 Opt-Out from the setting of cookies on your individual browser
In addition to using the user preference center, in many cases you may opt-out from the collection of non-essential device data on your web browser (see Section 4.1 above) by managing your cookies at the browser or device level. In addition, if you wish to opt-out of interest-based advertising, click
here
(or, if located in the European Union or United Kingdom, click
here
). To opt-out of targeted advertising that is provided to us and to third parties by Salesforce Audience Studio, click
here
. Please note, however, that by blocking or deleting cookies and similar technologies used on our websites, you may not be able to take full advantage of the websites.
While some internet browsers offer a “do not track” or “DNT” option that lets you tell websites that you do not want to have your online activities tracked, these features are not yet uniform and there is no common standard adopted by industry groups, technology companies, or regulators. Therefore, we do not currently commit to responding to browsers’ DNT signals with respect to our websites. Salesforce takes privacy and meaningful choice seriously and will make efforts to continue to monitor developments around DNT browser technology and the implementation of a standard.
4.5 Social Media Features
Our websites may use social media features, such as the “Tweet” button and other sharing widgets (“Social Media Features”). Social Media Features may allow you to post information about your activities on our website to outside platforms and social networks. Social Media Features may also allow you to like or highlight information we have posted on our website or our branded social media pages. Social Media Features are either hosted by each respective platform or hosted directly on our website. To the extent the Social Media Features are hosted by the platforms themselves, and you click through to these from our websites, the platform may receive information showing that you have visited our websites. If you are logged in to your social media account, it is possible that the respective social media network can link your visit to our websites with your social media profile.
Salesforce also allows you to log in to certain of our websites using sign-in services. These services authenticate your identity and provide you the option to share certain Personal Data from these services with us such as your name and email address to pre-populate our sign-up form.
Your interactions with Social Media Features are governed by the privacy policies of the companies providing them.
4.6 Telephony log information
If you use certain features of our services on a mobile device, we may also collect telephony log information (like phone numbers, time and date of calls, duration of calls, SMS routing information and types of calls), device event information (such as crashes, system activity, hardware settings, browser language), and location information (through IP address, GPS, and other sensors that may, for example, provide us with information on nearby devices, Wi-Fi access points and cell towers).
Purpose
Description
Legal basis
Providing our websites (including our social media pages)
We process your Personal Data to operate and administer our websites and to provide you with the content you access and request
Our legitimate interest in providing online content to our customers and prospective customers regarding our service offering and related information
Improving our websites
We process your Personal Data to analyze overall trends and help us improve the user experience on our websites
Our legitimate interest in providing a relevant and well-functioning website for the benefit of our website visitors
Promoting the security of our websites
We process your Personal Data by tracking use of our websites and verifying and investigating activity
Our legitimate interest in promoting the safety and security of our websites and in protecting our rights and the rights of others
Displaying personalized advertisements and content
We process your Personal Data to conduct market research, advertise to you, provide personalized information about us on and off our websites and to provide other personalized content based upon your activities and interests
Our legitimate interest in advertising our products and services or, where necessary, to the extent you have provided your prior consent
Please see Section 10 below, to learn how you can control the processing of your Personal Data by Salesforce for personalized advertising purposes
Registering visitors
We process your Personal Data, including registration information and associated non-disclosure information, for security reasons
Our legitimate interest in protecting our offices, staff, visitors and our confidential information against unauthorized access
Managing event registrations and attendance
Managing event registrations and attendance
We process your Personal Data to plan and host events or webinars for which you have registered or that you attend, including sending related communications to you
Where you explicitly consent, we also may process your biometric Personal Data to facilitate event registration and for security reasons
Performance of a contract or where we receive your explicit consent
Ensuring the health of our visitors and employees
We process your Personal Data (which may include special categories of Personal Data) (where legally permitted) during office visits and at events during the COVID-19 pandemic to ensure the health and safety of our visitors and employees
Consent and explicit consent or in our legitimate interest to ensure the health of our employees and visitors where necessary for reasons of public interest in the area of public health
Ensuring the safety and security of our employees, events and premises
We process your Personal Data where necessary based on a credible threat to our employees, events or premises
Our legitimate interest in protecting our employees, events and premises
Sending communications
We process your Personal Data to send you marketing information, product recommendations and other non-transactional communications (e.g., marketing newsletters, telemarketing calls, SMS or push notifications, information about our products, news or events) about us, our affiliates and partners
Our legitimate interest in conducting direct marketing or where you have provided your prior consent (please see Section 10 below to learn how you can control the processing of your Personal Data by Salesforce for marketing purposes)
Recording phone calls
We process your Personal Data, including recording phone calls (in accordance with applicable laws) for training, quality assurance, and administration purposes
If required under applicable law, we will give you the option to object to a call being recorded
Consent or our legitimate interest in maintaining the high quality of our phone calls with users
Handling contact and user support requests
We process your Personal Data, if you fill out a “Contact Me” web form or request user support, or if you contact us by other means including but not limited to via phone
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in fulfilling your requests and communicating with you
Providing our services
We process your Personal Data to perform our contract with you for the provision of our services and to satisfy our obligations under the applicable terms of use
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest to provide and administer our services
Developing and optimizing the performance of the services
We process your Personal Data to
develop, optimize, and improve
the performance of the services
Legitimate interest to develop services and ensure that the services are performing in line with customer expectations; if special categories of Personal Data are processed, where the Personal Data is manifestly made public by the data subject
Providing personalized interactions
We process your Personal Data to customize our interactions with you
Legitimate interest to offer the best-in class services to our customers
Managing our customer and user accounts
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) to manage customer and user accounts generally, such as billing, customer correspondence and customer relationship management
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in the management of customer and user accounts
Managing usage and licensing compliance
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) to assess and manage usage and licensing compliance with the applicable terms of use of our services
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in managing the provision of our services to customers
Preparing internal reports and business modeling
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) for internal reporting and business modeling purposes (e.g., forecasting, revenue, capacity planning, product strategy)
Our legitimate interest in the management of our business operations
Maintaining our security
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of maintaining Salesforce’s own security, including investigating, detecting and preventing suspicious activity, fraud and cybercrime that may affect Salesforce or its services
Our legitimate interest in promoting the safety and security of Salesforce generally and to protect our rights and the rights of others
Managing compensation for employees
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of determining compensation for Salesforce employees, such as commission
Necessary for the performance of a contract with an employee or our legitimate interest in fairly compensating our employees
Undertaking financial reporting
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of financial reporting
Our legitimate interest in meeting our obligations associated with the reporting of our finances
Aggregating data
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of aggregating this information to ensure that it is no longer identifying
Our legitimate interest in minimizing the amount of Personal Data processed as part of the noted processing activity
Managing, and participating in, webinars, contests, programs, training, certifications or promotions
We process your Personal Data if you register for a webinar, contest, promotion, training, certification or a program.
In some cases where the training or certification is through your employer, we will share your we will share your Personal Data with your employer
Some webinars, contests, programs, trainings, certifications and promotions have additional rules containing information about how we will process your Personal Data
Consent, necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in providing the webinar, contest, promotion, training, certification or promotion
Managing payments
If you have provided financial information to us, we process your Personal Data to verify that information and to collect payments to the extent that doing so is necessary to complete a transaction and perform our contract with you
Necessary for the performance of a contract
Administering surveys and conducting research
We process your Personal Data (including, where legally permitted, special categories of Personal Data) in order to meet the goals set out in surveys or research as well as to analyze our compliance with internal policies
Consent or explicit consent (if required under applicable law) or our legitimate interest in conducting the survey or research based on its stated goals (where no special categories of Personal Data are in scope)
Participating in a Salesforce community, such as that focused on open-source development
We process your Personal Data, such as your username associated with your community account, in order to host and maintain the community for the benefit of its members
Our legitimate interest in hosting and maintaining such a community for the benefits of its members, as well as in order to inform you of program changes that are important to your participation or relate to additional security measures
Collecting diversity information
We process your Personal Data (including special categories of Personal Data) to the extent you voluntarily consent to provide it to meet our broader community goals related to diversity and equality of opportunity
Consent or explicit consent (if required under applicable law)
Complying with legal obligations
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) when cooperating with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with our legal obligations under applicable laws to the extent this requires the processing or disclosure of Personal Data to protect our rights
Legal obligation or our legitimate interest in protecting against misuse or abuse of our websites or services, protecting personal property or safety, pursuing remedies available to us and limiting our damages, complying with judicial proceedings, court orders or legal processes, responding to lawful requests, or for auditing purposes
If we need to collect and process Personal Data by law, or under a contract we have entered into with you, and you fail to provide the required Personal Data when requested, we may not be able to perform our contract with you.
Requests Submitted
Requests Fulfilled in Whole Or In Part*
Average Days to Respond
Average Days to Complete a Request**
Requests for access to Personal Data
44
32
1
49
Requests to delete Personal Data
210
143
1
29
Requests to correct Personal Data
4
0
1
3
Objections to processing Personal Data
7
4
1
15
Requests to opt-out of Sharing
2,064
2,064
n/A
5
*Requests may be unable to be completed due to factors like duplicate requests, the inability to verify the resident’s identity or lack of response.
**Time to complete a request may depend in part on receipt of information from the person making the request, such as information to verify the person’s identity or information about the action requested.  Data is for all requests received by the Salesforce Family Affiliates from California residents between January 1 and December 31, 2023.
Contact us